Table of Contents
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☒  ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended: December 31, 2019
OR
☐  TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from                        to                       
Commission File Number: 1-14066
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware     13-3849074
(State or other jurisdiction of
incorporation or organization)(I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.)
1440 East Missouri Avenue Suite 160 Phoenix, AZ     85014
(Address of principal executive offices) (Zip code)
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code: (602) 264-1375
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class:     Trading Symbol     Name of each exchange on which registered:
Common stock, par value $0.01 per share SCCO New York Stock Exchange
Lima Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes ⌧ No ◻
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ◻ No ⌧
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been
subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ⌧ No ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant
to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§ 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to
submit such files). Yes ⌧ No ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, smaller reporting
company, or an emerging growth company. See definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company” and “emerging
growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer ⌧ Accelerated filer ◻ Non-accelerated filer ◻ Smaller reporting company ☐
Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act).  Yes ☐  No ⌧
At February 26, 2020, there were of record 773,058,869 shares of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, outstanding.
The aggregate market value of the shares of common stock (based upon the closing price at June 30, 2019 as reported on the New York
Stock Exchange-Composite Transactions) of Southern Copper Corporation held by non-affiliates was approximately $3,332.7 million.
PORTIONS OF THE FOLLOWING DOCUMENTS ARE INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE:
Part III:     Proxy statement for 2020 Annual Meeting of Stockholders
Part IV: Exhibit Index is on Page 161 through 163

Table of Contents
2Southern Copper Corporation (“SCC”)
INDEX TO FORM 10-K
Page No.
PART I.
Item 1 Business 3 - 12
Item 1A Risk factors 12 - 21
Item 1B Unresolved Staff Comments 21
Item 2 Properties 21 - 60
Item 3 Legal Proceedings 60
Item 4 Mine Safety Disclosure 60
PART II.
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities 61 - 63
Item 6. Selected Financial Data 64 - 65
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations 66 - 92
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk 93 - 93
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 94 - 158
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountant on Accounting and Financial
Disclosure 159
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 159 - 161
Item 9B. Other Information 161
PART III.
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 162 - 164
Item 11. Executive Compensation 162 - 164
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters 162
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence 164
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services 164
PART IV.
Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedule 164 - 166
Supplemental information 167 - 169
Signatures 170
Table of Contents
3PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
THE COMPANY
Southern Copper Corporation (“SCC”, “Southern Copper” or the “Company”) is one of the largest
integrated copper producers in the world. Our major production includes copper, molybdenum, zinc and
silver. All of our mining, smelting and refining facilities are located in Peru and Mexico and we conduct
exploration activities in those countries and in Argentina, Chile and Ecuador. See Item 2 “Properties—
Review of Operations” for maps of our principal mines, smelting facilities and refineries. Our operations
make us one of the largest mining companies in Peru and Mexico. We believe we have the largest copper
reserves in the world. We were incorporated in Delaware in 1952 and have conducted copper mining
operations since 1960. Since 1996, our common stock has been listed on both the New York and Lima
Stock Exchanges.
Our Peruvian copper operations involve mining, milling and flotation of copper ore to produce copper
concentrates and molybdenum concentrates; the smelting of copper concentrates to produce blister and
anode copper; and the refining of anode copper to produce copper cathodes. As part of this production
process, we also produce significant amounts of molybdenum concentrate and sulfuric acid. Our precious
metals plant at the Ilo refinery produces refined silver, gold, and other materials. Additionally, we
produce refined copper using solvent extraction/electrowinning technology (“SX-EW”). We operate the
Toquepala and Cuajone open-pit mines high in the Andes Mountains, approximately 860 kilometers
southeast of the city of Lima, Peru. We also operate a smelter and refinery west of the Toquepala and
Cuajone mines in the coastal city of Ilo, Peru.
Our Mexican operations are conducted through our subsidiary, Minera Mexico, S.A. de C.V. (“Minera
Mexico”), which we acquired in 2005. Minera Mexico engages primarily in the mining and processing of
copper, molybdenum, zinc, silver, gold and lead. Minera Mexico operates through subsidiaries that are
grouped into three separate units. Mexicana de Cobre, S.A. de C.V. (together with its subsidiaries, the
“La Caridad” unit) operates La Caridad, an open-pit copper mine, a copper ore concentrator, a SX-EW
plant, a smelter, refinery and a rod plant. The La Caridad refinery has a precious metals plant which
produces refined silver, gold and other materials. Operadora de Minas e Instalaciones Mineras, S.A de
C.V. (the “Buenavista unit”) operates Buenavista, an open-pit copper mine, which is located at the site of
one of the world’s largest copper ore deposits, two copper concentrators and three SX-EW plants.
Industrial Minera Mexico, S.A. de C.V. (together with its subsidiaries, the “IMMSA unit”) operates five
underground mines that produce zinc, lead, copper, silver and gold, a coal mine and a zinc refinery.
We utilize modern, state of the art mining and processing methods, including global positioning systems
and computerized mining processes. Our operations have a high level of vertical integration that allows
us to manage the entire production process, from the mining of the ore to the production of refined
copper rod and other products and most related transport and logistics functions, using our own facilities,
employees and equipment.
The sales prices for our products are largely determined by market forces beyond our control. Our
management, therefore, focuses on cost control and production enhancement to remain profitable. We
endeavor to achieve these goals through capital spending programs, exploration efforts and cost reduction
programs. Our focus is to remain profitable during periods of low copper prices and on maximizing
results in periods of high copper prices. For additional information on the sale prices of the metals we
produce, please see “Metal Prices” in this Item 1.
Currency Information:
Unless stated otherwise, all our financial information is presented in U.S. dollars and any reference
herein to “U.S. dollars”, “dollars”, or “$” are to U.S. dollars; references to “sol”, “soles” or “S/”, are to
Peruvian soles; and references to “peso”, “pesos”, or “Ps.”, are to Mexican pesos.
Table of Contents
4Unit Information:
Unless otherwise noted, all tonnages are in metric tons. To convert to short tons, multiply by 1.102. All
ounces are troy ounces. All distances are in kilometers. To convert to miles, multiply by 0.621. To
convert hectares to acres, multiply by 2.47.
ORGANIZATIONAL STRUCTURE
The following chart describes our organizational structure, starting with our controlling stockholders, as
of December 31, 2019. For clarity of presentation, the chart identifies only our main subsidiaries and
eliminates intermediate holding companies.
We are a majority-owned, indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico S.A.B. de C.V. (“Grupo Mexico”). At
December 31, 2019, Grupo Mexico through its wholly-owned subsidiary Americas Mining Corporation
(“AMC”) owned 88.9% of our capital stock. Grupo Mexico’s principal business is to act as a holding
company for the shares of other corporations engaged in the mining, processing, purchase and sale of
minerals and other products and railway and other related services.
We conduct our operations in Peru through a registered branch (the “SPCC Peru Branch”, “Branch” or
“Peruvian Branch”). The SPCC Peru Branch comprises substantially all of our assets and liabilities
associated with our copper operations in Peru. The SPCC Peru Branch is not a corporation separate from
us and, therefore, obligations of SPCC Peru Branch are direct obligations of SCC and vice-versa. It is,
however, an establishment, registered pursuant to Peruvian law, through which we hold assets, incur
liabilities and conduct operations in Peru. Although it has neither its own capital nor liability separate
from us, it is deemed to have equity capital for purposes of determining the economic interests of holders
of our investment shares (See Note 14 “Stockholders´ Equity” of our consolidated financial statements).
In April 2005, we acquired Minera Mexico, from Americas Mining Corporation (“AMC”), a subsidiary
of Grupo Mexico, our controlling stockholder. Minera Mexico is a holding company and all of its
operations are conducted through subsidiaries that are grouped into three units: (i) the La Caridad unit
(ii) the Buenavista unit and (iii) the IMMSA unit. We own 99.96% of Minera Mexico.

Table of Contents
5In 2008, our Board of Directors (“BOD”) authorized a $500 million share repurchase program that has
since been increased by the BOD and is currently authorized to $3 billion. Pursuant to this program,
through December 31, 2019 we have purchased 119.5 million shares of our common stock at a cost of
$2.9 billion. These shares are available for general corporate purposes. We may purchase additional
shares from time to time, based on market conditions and other factors. This repurchase program has no
expiration date and may be modified or discontinued at any time.
REPUBLIC OF PERU AND MEXICO
Our revenues are derived primarily from our operations in Peru and Mexico. Risks related to our
operations in both countries include those associated with economic and political conditions, the effects
of currency fluctuations and inflation, the effects of government regulations and the geographic
concentration of our operations.
AVAILABLE INFORMATION
We file annual, quarterly and current reports, proxy statements and other information with the U.S.
Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”). You may read and copy any document we file at the
SEC’s Public Reference Room at 100 F Street NE, Washington, D.C. 20549. The SEC maintains a
website that contains annual, quarterly and current reports, proxy statements and other information that
issuers (including Southern Copper Corporation) file electronically with the SEC. The SEC’s website is
www.sec.gov.
Our website is www.southerncoppercorp.com. Beginning with the Form 8-K dated March 14, 2003, we
have made available on this website, free of charge, our annual, quarterly and current reports, as soon as
reasonably practical after we electronically file such material with, or furnish it to, the SEC. Our website
also includes the Company’s Corporate Governance guidelines and the charters of our principal Board
Committees. However, the information found on our website is not part of this or any other report.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT
Forward-looking statements in this report and in other Company statements include information
regarding expected commencement dates of mining or metal production operations, projected quantities
of future metal production, anticipated production rates, operating efficiencies, costs and expenditures,
including taxes, as well as projected demand or supply for the Company’s products. Actual results could
differ materially depending upon certain factors, including the risks and uncertainties relating to general
U.S. and international economic and political conditions, the cyclical and volatile prices of copper, other
commodities and supplies, including fuel and electricity, the availability of materials, insurance coverage,
equipment, required permits or approvals and financing, the occurrence of unusual weather or operating
conditions, lower than expected ore grades, water and geological problems, the failure of equipment or
processes to operate in accordance with specifications, failure to obtain financial assurance to meet
closure and remediation obligations, labor relations, litigation and environmental risks, as well as
political and economic risk associated with foreign operations. Results of operations are directly affected
by metal prices on commodity exchanges, which can be volatile.
Additional business information follows:
COPPER BUSINESS
Copper is an important component in the world’s infrastructure. It is the third most widely used metal,
after iron and aluminum. Copper has unique chemical and physical properties, including high ductility,
malleability, thermal and electrical conductivity, and resistance to corrosion that has made it a superior
material for use in electrical and electronic products, including power transmission and generation, which
accounts for about three quarters of copper global use, telecommunications, building construction,
transportation and industrial machinery. Copper is also an important metal in non-electrical applications
such as plumbing and roofing and, when alloyed with zinc to form brass, in many industrial and
consumer applications.
Table of Contents
6Copper is an internationally traded commodity with prices principally determined by the major metal
exchanges, the Commodities Exchange, or “COMEX”, in New York and the London Metal Exchange or
“LME.” Copper is usually found in nature in association with sulfur. Pure copper metal is generally
produced from a multistage process, beginning with the mining and concentrating of low-grade ores
containing copper sulfide minerals, and followed by smelting and electrolytic refining to produce a pure
copper cathode. An increasing share of copper is produced from acid leaching of oxidized ores. Copper is
one of the oldest metals ever used and has been one of the most important materials in the development
of civilization.
BUSINESS REPORTING SEGMENTS:
Our management views Southern Copper as having three reportable segments and manages it on the basis
of these segments.
The three segments identified are groups of individual mines, each of which constitutes an operating
segment with similar economic characteristics, type of products, processes and support facilities,
regulatory environments, employee bargaining contracts and currency risks. In addition, each mine
within the individual group earns revenues from similar types of customers for their products and
services and each group incurs expenses independently, including commercial transactions between
groups.
Inter-segment sales are based on arm’s length prices at the time of sale. These may not be reflective of
actual prices realized by the Company due to various factors, including additional processing, timing of
sales to outside customers and transportation cost. Added to the segment data is information regarding the
Company’s sales. The segments identified by the Company are:
1. Peruvian operations, which include the Toquepala and Cuajone mine complexes and the
smelting and refining plants, including a precious metals plant, industrial railroad and port
facilities that service both mines. Sales of its products are recorded as revenue of our Peruvian
mines. The Peruvian operations produce copper, with production of by-products of
molybdenum, silver and other materials.
2. Mexican open-pit operations, which include the La Caridad and Buenavista mine complexes and
the smelting and refining plants, including a precious metals plant and a copper rod plant and
support facilities that service both mines. Sales of its products are recorded as revenue of our
Mexican mines. The Mexican open-pit operations produce copper, with production of by-
products of molybdenum, silver and other materials.
3. Mexican underground mining operations, which include five underground mines that produce
zinc, copper, lead, silver and gold, a coal mine that produces coal and coke, and a zinc refinery.
This group is identified as the IMMSA unit and sales of its products are recorded as revenue of
the IMMSA unit.
Financial information is regularly prepared for each of the three segments and the results are reported to
Senior management on a segment basis. Senior management focuses on operating income and on total
assets as measures of performance to evaluate different segments and to make decisions to allocate
resources to the reported segments. These are common measures in the mining industry.
Segment information is included in Item 2 “Properties,” under the captions—“Metal Production by
Segments” and “Ore Reserves.” More information on business segment and segment financial
information is included in Note 18 “Segment and Related Information” of our consolidated financial
statements.
CAPITAL INVESTMENT PROGRAM AND EXPLORATION ACTIVITIES
For a description of our capital investment program, see Item 7 “Management’s Discussion and Analysis
of Financial Condition and Results of Operations—Capital Investment Program” and for our exploration
activities, see Item 2 “Properties—Explorations Activities.”
Table of Contents
PRINCIPAL PRODUCTS AND MARKETS
Copper is primarily used in the building and construction industries, in the power generation and
transmission industry, in electrical and electronic products and, to a lesser extent, in industrial machinery
and equipment, consumer products and in the automotive and transportation industries. Molybdenum is
used to toughen alloy steels and soften tungsten alloy and is also used in fertilizers, dyes, enamels and
reagents. Silver is used for photographic, electrical and electronic products and, to a lesser extent, in
brazing alloys and solder, jewelry, coinage, silverware and catalysts. Zinc is primarily used as a coating
on iron and steel to protect against corrosion and is also used to make die cast parts, in the manufacturing
of batteries and in the form of sheets for architectural purposes.
Our marketing strategy and annual sales planning emphasize developing and maintaining long-term
customer relationships. Thus acquiring annual or other long-term contracts for the sale of our products is
a high priority. Generally, 80% to 90% of our metal production is sold under annual or longer-term
contracts. Sales prices are determined based on the prevailing commodity prices for the quotation period
according to the terms of the contract.
We focus on the ultimate end-user customers as opposed to selling on the spot market or to trading
companies. In addition, we devote significant marketing efforts to diversifying our sales both by region
and by customer base. We also strive to provide superior customer service, including timely deliveries of
our products. Our ability to consistently fulfill customer demand is supported by our substantial
production capacity.
For additional information on sales please see “Revenue recognition” in Note 2 “Summary of Significant
Accounting Policies” and Note 18 “Segment and Related Information” of our consolidated financial
statements.
METALS PRICES
Prices for our products are principally a function of supply and demand and, with the exception of
molybdenum, are established on COMEX and LME. Prices for our molybdenum products are established
by reference to the publication Platt’s Metals Week. Our contract prices also reflect any negotiated
premiums and the costs of freight and other factors. From time to time, we have entered into hedging
transactions to provide partial protection against future decreases in the market price of metals and we
may do so under certain market conditions. For a further discussion of our products market prices, please
see Item 7 “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations—
Metal Prices.”
The table below shows the high, low and average COMEX and LME per pound copper prices during the
last 10 years:
 Copper (COMEX)  Copper (LME)
Year     High    Low    Average    High    Low    Average
2010   4.44  2.76  3.43  4.42  2.76  3.42
2011   4.62  3.05  4.01  4.60  3.08  4.00
2012   3.97  3.28  3.61  3.93  3.29  3.61
2013   3.78  3.03  3.34  3.74  3.01  3.32
2014   3.43  2.84  3.12  3.37  2.86  3.11
2015   2.95  2.02  2.51  2.92  2.05  2.50
2016   2.69  1.94  2.20  2.69  1.96  2.21
2017   3.29  2.48  2.80  3.27  2.48  2.80
2018   3.29  2.56  2.93  3.29  2.64  2.96
2019—1st Q   2.96 2.57  2.81 2.98 2.64  2.82
2019—2nd Q   2.98 2.63  2.78 2.95 2.61  2.77
2019—3rd Q   2.74 2.51  2.62 2.75 2.51  2.63
2019—4th Q   2.86 2.55  2.68 2.82 2.54  2.67
2019   2.98 2.51  2.72 2.98 2.51  2.72
The per pound COMEX copper price during the last 5 and 10 year periods averaged $2.63 and $3.07,
respectively. The per pound LME copper price during the last 5 and 10 year periods averaged $2.64 and
$3.06, respectively.
7
Table of Contents
The table below shows the high, low and average per-pound, except silver, which is per ounce, market
prices for our three principal by-products during the last 10 years:
  Molybdenum (Dealer 
 Oxide Platt’s
Silver (COMEX)  Metals Week) Zinc (LME)
Year     High    Low    Average    High    Low    Average    High    Low    Average
2010   
30.91  
14.82  
20.18  
18.60  
11.75  
15.60  
1.14  
0.72  0.98
2011   
48.58  
26.81  
35.18  
17.88  
12.70  
15.33  
1.15  
0.79  0.99
2012   
37.14  
26.25  
31.19  
14.80  
10.90  
12.62  
0.99  
0.80  0.88
2013   
32.41  
18.53  
23.82  
11.95  9.12  
10.26  
0.99  
0.81  0.87
2014   
22.05  
15.39  
19.04  
15.05  8.75  11.30  
1.10  
0.88  0.98
2015   
18.35  
13.67  
15.68  9.40  4.30  6.59  
1.09  
0.66  0.88
2016   
20.67  
13.74  
17.10  8.60  5.10  6.42  
1.32  
0.73  0.95
2017   
18.49  
15.37  
17.03  
10.25  6.85  8.13  
1.53  
1.00  1.31
2018   
17.55  
13.95  
15.65  
13.00  
10.60  11.86  
1.64  
1.04  1.33
2019—1st Q   
16.16 
14.92 
15.52 
12.70 
10.70 11.70 
1.27 
0.90  1.23
2019—2nd Q   
15.47 
14.28 
14.85 
12.38 
11.85 
12.13 
1.37 
1.14  1.25
2019—3rd Q   
19.39 
14.92 
16.98 
12.00 
11.53 11.76 
1.15 
1.00  1.06
2019—4th Q   
18.01 
16.48 
17.27 
11.70 8.28  9.49 
1.18 
1.01  1.08
2019   
19.39 
14.28 
16.16 
12.70 8.28 11.27 
1.37 
0.90  1.16
The per ounce COMEX silver price during the last 5 and 10 year periods averaged $16.32 and $21.10,
respectively. The per pound Platt’s Metals Week Dealer Oxide molybdenum price during the last 5 and
10 year periods averaged $8.85 and $10.94, respectively. The per pound LME zinc price during the last 5
and 10 year periods averaged $1.12 and $1.03, respectively.
COMPETITIVE CONDITIONS
Competition in the copper market is based primarily on price and service basis, with price being the most
important factor when supplies of copper are ample. Our products compete with other materials,
including aluminum and plastics. For additional information, see Item 1A “Risk Factors—The copper
mining industry is highly competitive.”
LABOR FORCE
As of December 31, 2019, we had 14,301 employees, approximately 71% of whom are unionized and
represented by nine different labor unions. Despite the three strikes in 2017 at our Peruvian operations,
we believe the Company has a positive labor environment in our operations in Mexico and Peru, which is
allowing us to increase productivity as well as helping us achieve the goals of our capital expansion
program.
Peru
65% of our 4,890 Peruvian employees were unionized at December 31, 2019. Currently, there are six
separate unions, one large union and five smaller unions. In June 2018, the Company signed a three-year
collective bargaining agreement with one of the smaller unions. This agreement includes, among other
things, annual salary increases of 5% for each year starting September 2018, and a signing bonus of S/
45,000 (approximately $13,600) which was recorded as labor expense. In August 2018, the Company
8signed a three-year collective bargaining agreement with three additional unions. This agreement
includes, among other things, annual salary increases of 5% for each year starting December 2018, and a
signing bonus of S/ 45,000 (approximately $13,600) which was recorded as labor expense. In March
2019, the Company signed an agreement with one additional union. The agreement also included annual
salary increases of 5% for each year starting September 2018, and a signing bonus of S/45,000
(approximately $13,600) which was recorded as labor expense in the first quarter of 2019.
In November 2019, the Company signed two agreements with the remaining union, one of them for one
year and the other one consisting of a three-year collective bargaining agreement. The agreements also
included annual salary
Table of Contents
9increases of 5% for each year starting September 2018, and a signing bonus of S/15,000 (approximately
$4,500) for the one-year agreement and S/45,000 for the three-year agreement (approximately $13,600),
which were recorded as labor expense in the fourth quarter of 2019.
Employees of the Toquepala and Cuajone units reside in townsites, where we have built 3,700 houses and
apartments. We also have 90 houses at Ilo for staff personnel. Housing, together with maintenance and
utility services, is provided at minimal cost to most of our employees. Our townsite and housing
complexes include schools, medical facilities, churches, social clubs and recreational facilities. We also
provide shopping, banking and other services at the townsites.
Mexico
73.9% of our 9,358 Mexican employees were unionized at December 31, 2019, represented by three
separate unions. Under Mexican law, the terms of employment for unionized workers are set forth in
collective bargaining agreements. Mexican companies negotiate the salary provisions of collective
bargaining agreements with the labor unions annually and negotiate other benefits every two years. We
conduct negotiations separately at each mining complex and each processing plant.
Our Taxco mine in Mexico has been on strike since July 2007. For a discussion of labor matters, refer to
the information contained under the caption “Labor matters” in Note 13 “Commitments and
Contingencies” of the consolidated financial statements.
Employees of La Caridad and Buenavista units reside in townsites at Nacozari and Cananea, where we
have built approximately 1,800 houses and apartments. Most of the employees of the IMMSA unit reside
on the grounds of the mining or processing complexes in which they work and where we have built
approximately 356 houses and apartments. Housing, together with maintenance and utility services, is
provided at minimal cost to most of our employees. Our townsites and housing complexes include
educational and medical facilities, churches, social clubs, shopping centers, banking and other services.
Through 2007, the Buenavista unit provided health care services to employees and retired unionized
employees and their families through its own hospital at the Buenavista unit. In 2010, the Company
signed an agreement with the Secretary of Health of the State of Sonora to provide these services to its
retired workers and their families. The new workers of Buenavista receive health services through the
Mexican Institute of Social Security as is the case for all Mexican workers.
FUEL, ELECTRICITY AND WATER SUPPLIES
The principal raw materials used in our operations are fuel, electricity and water. We use natural gas to
power boilers and generators, and for metallurgical processes at our Mexican operations and diesel fuel to
power mining equipment. We believe that sources of fuel, electricity and water are readily available. The
prices of these raw materials may fluctuate outside of our control, therefore we focus our efforts to reduce
these costs through cost and energy saving measures.
Energy is the principal cost in mining, so the concern for its conservation and efficient usage is critical.
We have energy management committees at most of our mines, which meet periodically to discuss
consumption and to develop measures directed at saving energy. Also, alternative sources are being
analyzed at the corporate level, from both traditional and renewable energy sources. This has helped us to
develop a culture of energy conservation directed at the sustainability of our operations.
Peru:
Fuel:  In Peru, we obtain fuel primarily from local companies. The Company believes that adequate 
supplies of fuel are available in Peru.
Electricity:  In June 2014, we entered into a power purchase agreement for 120 megawatt (“MW”) with 
the state company Electroperu S.A., which began supplying energy for our Peruvian operations for 
twenty years starting on April 17, 2017. In July 2014, we entered into a power purchase agreement for 
120MW with a private power generator 
Table of Contents
Kallpa Generacion S.A. (“Kallpa”), which began supplying energy to our Peruvian operations for 
ten years starting on April 17, 2017. In May 2016, we signed an additional power purchase agreement for 
a maximum of 80MW with Kallpa, under which Kallpa will supply energy for the operations related to 
the Toquepala Expansion and other minor projects for ten years starting on May 1, 2017 and ending after 
ten years of commercial operation of the Toquepala Expansion or on April 30, 2029; whichever occurs 
first. In addition, we feel confident that additional power can be obtained from the Peruvian national grid, 
should the need arise.
Additionally, we have nine megawatts of power generation capacity from two small hydro-generating
installations at Cuajone. Power is distributed over a 224-kilometer closed loop transmission circuit,
which is interconnected with the Peruvian network.
Water:  We have water rights or licenses for up to 1,950 liters per second from well fields at the Huaitire, 
Vizcachas and Titijones aquifers and surface water rights from the Suches lake and two small water 
courses, Quebrada Honda and Quebrada Tacalaya. We believe these water sources are sufficient to supply 
the needs of our operating units at Toquepala and Cuajone, including the Toquepala expansion. At Ilo, we 
have two desalination plants that produce water for industrial use and domestic consumption that we 
believe are sufficient for our current and projected needs.
Mexico:
Fuel:  In Mexico, since 2018, we have purchased fuel from Petroleos Mexicanos (“PEMEX”), the state 
producer, and from private suppliers.
The La Caridad unit imports natural gas from the United States through its pipeline (between Douglas,
Arizona and Nacozari, Sonora), which allows us to import natural gas from the United States at market
prices and thereby reduce operating costs. Several contracts with PEMEX and the United States provide
us with the option of using a monthly or daily fixed price for our natural gas purchases.
Natural gas is used for metallurgical processes, to power furnaces, converters, casting wheels, boilers and
electric generators. Diesel oil is a backup for all these uses. We use diesel oil to power mining equipment
at our operations.
Electricity:  Electricity is used as the main energy source at our mining complexes. We purchase most of 
our electricity from Mexico Generadora de Energia S. de R. L. (“MGE”), a subsidiary of Grupo Mexico 
which has two power plants designed to supply power to La Caridad and Buenavista units. MGE is 
supplying 5.2% of its power output to third party energy users. These plants are natural gas-fired 
combined cycle power generating units, with a net total capacity of 516.2 megawatts. In 2012, we entered 
into a power supply agreement with MGE through 2032. The first plant was completed in 2013 and the 
second was completed in the second quarter of 2014. The first plant began to supply power to the 
Company in December 2013, and the second plant began to supply power in June 2015.
We also purchase electricity from the Comision Federal de Electricidad (the Federal Electricity
Commission or the “CFE”), the state’s electrical power producer. In addition, we recover some energy
from waste heat boilers at the La Caridad smelter. Accordingly, a significant portion of our operating
costs in Mexico is dependent upon the pricing policies of CFE, as well as PEMEX, which reflect
government policy, as well as international market prices for crude oil, natural gas and conditions in the
refinery markets.
Some mining operations of IMMSA also purchase electricity from Eolica el Retiro, S.A.P.I de C.V.
(“Eolica”), a windfarm energy producer that is an indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico. In August 2013,
IMMSA and other of the mining operations of the Company entered into a purchase agreement and in
late 2014 started to purchase electricity from Eolica. Due to the nature of the production process there is
not a fixed power capacity contracted. In 2019, the total purchases were approximately 28.64 million
kilowatt hours.
Water:  In Mexico, water is deemed a public property and industries not connected to a public service 
water supply must obtain a water concession from Comision Nacional del Agua (the National Water
Commission or the “CNA”). Water usage fees are established in the Ley Federal de Derechos (the
Federal Rights Law), which distinguishes several availability zones with different fees per unit of volume
according to each zone, with the exception of Mexicana de
10
Table of Contents
Cobre. All of our operations have one or several water concessions and pump out the required water from
wells. Mexicana de Cobre pumps water from the La Angostura dam, which is close to the mine and
plants. At our Buenavista facility, we maintain our own wells and pay the CNA for water usage. Water
conservation committees have been established in each plant in order to conserve and recycle water.
Water usage fees are updated on a yearly basis and have been increasing in recent years.
ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS
For a discussion of environmental matters reference is made to the information contained under the
caption “Environmental matters” in Note 13 “Commitments and Contingencies” of the consolidated
financial statements.
MINING RIGHTS AND CONCESSIONS
Peru:
We have 159,430 hectares in concessions from the Peruvian government for our exploration, exploitation,
extraction and production operations, at various sites, as follows:
    Toquepala    Cuajone    Ilo    Other    Total
 (hectares)
Plants   360  919  421  —  1,700
Operations   23,781 
21,555 
4,483 36,759  86,578
Exploration   —  —  —  71,152  71,152
Total   24,141  
22,474  
4,904  
107,911  
159,430
We believe that our Peruvian concessions are in full force and in effect under applicable Peruvian laws
and that we are in compliance with all material terms and requirements applicable to these concessions.
The concessions have indefinite terms, subject to our payment of concession fees of up to $3.00 per
hectare annually for the mining concessions and a fee based on nominal capacity for the processing
concessions. Fees paid during 2019, 2018 and 2017, were approximately $1.8 million, $1.5 million and
$1.2 million, respectively. We have two types of mining concessions in Peru: metallic and non-metallic
concessions.
In 2011, the Peruvian Congress approved an amendment to the mining royalty charge. The new mining
royalty charge is based on operating income margins with graduated rates ranging from 1% to 12% of
operating profits, with a minimum royalty charge assessed at 1% of net sales. If the operating income
margin is 10% or less, the royalty charge is 1% and for each 5% increment in the operating income
margin, the royalty charge rate increases by 0.75%, up to a maximum of 12%. In 2019, 2018 and 2017,
we made provisions of $42.3 million, $32.9 million and $23.4 million, respectively.
At the same time the Peruvian Congress amended the mining royalty charge, it enacted a new tax for the
mining industry. This tax is also based on operating income and its rates range from 2% to 8.4%. For
additional information see Note 7 “Income Taxes” to the consolidated financial statements.
Mexico:
In Mexico we have 534,400 hectares in concessions from the Mexican government for our exploration
and exploitation activities as outlined on the table below:
    IMMSA    La Caridad    Buenavista    Projects    Total
 (hectares)
Mine concessions   
188,899 103,821  93,706 
147,974  
534,400
We believe that our Mexican concessions are in full force and in effect under applicable Mexican laws
and that we are in compliance with all material terms and requirements applicable to these concessions.
Under Mexican law, mineral resources belong to the Mexican nation and a concession from the Mexican
federal government is required to explore or mine mineral reserves. Mining concessions have a 50-year
term that can be renewed for another 50 years. Holding fees for mining concessions can be from $0.39 to
$8.58 per hectare depending on the beginning date of the mining concession. Fees paid during 2019,
2018 and 2017 were approximately $7.1 million, $6.3 million and $5.8 million,
11
Table of Contents
12respectively. In addition, all of our operating units in Mexico have water concessions that are in full force
and effect. Although ownership is not required in order to explore or mine a concession, we generally
own the land related to our Mexican concessions. We also own all of the processing facilities of our
Mexican operations and the land on which they are constructed.
In December 2013, the Mexican government enacted a new law which, among other things, established a
mining royalty charge of 7.5% on earnings before taxes as defined by Mexican tax regulations and an
additional royalty charge of 0.5% over gross income from sales of gold, silver and platinum. These
charges were effective January 2014 and are deductible for income tax purposes.
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Every investor or potential investor in Southern Copper Corporation should carefully consider the
following risk factors.
Financial risks
Our financial performance is highly dependent on the price of copper and the other metals we
produce.
Our financial performance is significantly affected by the market prices of the metals that we produce,
particularly the market prices of copper, molybdenum, zinc and silver. Historically, these prices have
been subject to wide fluctuations and are affected by numerous factors out of our control, including
international economic and political conditions, levels of supply and demand, the availability and costs of
substitutes, inventory levels maintained by users, actions of participants in the commodities markets and
currency exchange rates. In addition, the market prices of copper and certain other metals have on
occasion been subject to rapid short-term changes.
In the last three years, approximately 81% of our revenues came from the sale of copper, 7% from
molybdenum and 8% from silver and zinc. Please see the distribution of our revenues per product on
Item 8 “Financial Statements and Supplementary Data” Note 18 “Segment and Related Information—
Sales value per segment” on page 152.
See also historical average price of our products on Item 1 Business caption “Metals prices”.
We cannot speculate whether metals prices will rise or fall in the future. Future declines in metals prices,
and in particular copper, will have an adverse impact on our results of operations and financial condition.
In very adverse market conditions, we might consider curtailing or modifying some of our mining and
processing operations.
Our business requires levels of capital investments which we may not be able to maintain.
Our business is capital intensive. Specifically, the exploration and exploitation of copper and other metal
reserves, mining, smelting and refining costs, the maintenance of machinery and equipment and
compliance with laws and regulations require significant capital investments. We must continue to invest
capital to maintain or increase the amount of copper reserves that we exploit and the amount of copper
and other metals we produce. We cannot assure you that we will be able to maintain our production levels
to generate sufficient cash, or that we have access to sufficient financing to continue our exploration,
exploitation and refining activities at or above present levels.
Restrictive covenants in the agreements governing our indebtedness and the indebtedness of our
Minera Mexico subsidiary may restrict our ability to pursue our business strategies.
Our financing instruments and those of our Minera Mexico subsidiary include financial and other
restrictive covenants that, among other things, limit our and Minera Mexico’s abilities to incur additional
debt and sell assets. If either we or our Minera Mexico subsidiary do not comply with these obligations,
we could be in default under the applicable agreements which, if not addressed or waived, could require
repayment of the indebtedness immediately. Our Minera Mexico subsidiary is further limited by the
terms of its outstanding notes, which also restrict the Company’s applicable
Table of Contents
incurrence of debt and liens. In addition, future credit facilities may contain limitations on our incurrence
of additional debt and liens, on our ability to dispose of assets, or on our ability to pay dividends to our
common stockholders.
We may not pay a significant amount of our net income as cash dividends on our common stock in the
future.
We distributed a significant amount of our net income as dividends since 1996. Our dividend practice is
subject to change at the discretion of our Board of Directors at any time. The amount that we pay in
dividends is subject to a number of factors, including our results of operations, financial condition, cash
requirements, tax considerations, future prospects, legal restrictions, contractual restrictions in credit
agreements, limitations imposed by the government of Peru, Mexico or other countries where we have
significant operations and other factors that our Board of Directors may deem relevant. In light of our
capital investment program and global economic conditions, it is possible that future dividend
distributions will be reduced from the levels of recent years.
Our ability to recognize the benefits of deferred tax assets is dependent on future cash flows and
taxable income.
Through 2019, the Company recognized the expected future tax benefit from deferred tax assets when the
tax benefit was considered to be more likely than not of being realized, otherwise, a valuation allowance
was applied against deferred tax assets. Assessing the recoverability of deferred tax assets requires
management to make significant estimates related to expectations of future taxable income and existing
tax laws and there can be no assurance that the Company will be able to recognize the expected future
benefits of deferred tax assets; such inability could have a material adverse effect on the Company’s
results of operations. For more information on the effects of U.S. Tax Reform, please see Note 7 “Income
Taxes”.
Operational risks
Our actual reserves may not conform to our current estimates of our ore deposits and we depend on
our ability to replenish ore reserves for our long-term viability.
There is a degree of uncertainty attributable to the calculation of reserves. Until reserves are actually
mined and processed, the quantity of ore and grades must be considered as estimates only. The proven
and probable ore reserves data included in this report are estimates prepared by us based on evaluation
methods generally used in the mining industry. We may be required in the future to revise our reserves
estimates based on our actual production. We cannot assure you that our actual reserves conform to
geological, metallurgical or other expectations or that the estimated volume and grade of ore will be
recovered. Market prices of our metals, increased production costs, reduced recovery rates, short-term
operating factors, royalty charges and other factors may render proven and probable reserves uneconomic
to exploit and may result in revisions of reserves data from time to time. Reserves data are not indicative
of future results of operations. Our reserves are depleted as we mine. We depend on our ability to
replenish our ore reserves for our long-term viability. We use several strategies to replenish and increase
our ore reserves, including exploration and investment in properties located near our existing mine sites
and investing in technology that could extend the life of a mine by allowing us to cost-effectively process
ore types that were previously considered uneconomic. Acquisitions may also contribute to increase ore
reserves and we review potential acquisition opportunities on a regular basis. However, we cannot assure
you that we will be able to continue with our strategy to replenish reserves indefinitely.
Our operations are subject to risks, some of which are not insurable.
The business of mining, smelting and refining copper, zinc and other metals is subject to a number of
risks and hazards, including industrial accidents, labor disputes, unusual or unexpected geological
conditions, changes in the regulatory environment, environmental hazards, weather and other natural
phenomena, such as seismic activity, wall failures and rock slides in our open-pit mines, structural
collapses of our underground mines or tailings impoundments, and lower than expected ore grades or
recovery rates. The Company’s operations may also be affected by mudslides and flash floods caused by
torrential rains.
Such occurrences could result in damage to, or destruction of, mining operations resulting in monetary
losses and possible legal liability. In particular, surface and underground mining and related processing
activities present inherent risks of injury to personnel, loss of life and damage to equipment.
13
Table of Contents
14The waste rock and tailings produced in our mining operations represent our largest volume of waste
material. Managing the volume of waste rock and tailings presents significant environmental, safety and
engineering challenges and risks. We maintain large tailings impoundments containing sand of ground
rock, moistened with water, which are effectively large dams that must be engineered, constructed and
monitored to assure structural stability and avoid leakages or structural collapse. The failure of tailings
and other impoundments at any of our mining operations could cause severe property and environmental
damage and loss of life. The importance of careful design, management and monitoring of large
impoundments was emphasized in recent years by large scale tailings dam failures at unaffiliated mines,
which caused extensive property and environmental damage and resulted in the loss of life. For more
information regarding our tailing dams, please see Item 2 “Properties—Slope Stability—Tailing Dams.”
We maintain insurance against many of these and other risks, which in certain circumstances may not
provide adequate coverage. Insurance against certain risks, including certain liabilities for environmental
damage or hazards as a result of exploration and production, is not generally available to us or other
companies within the mining industry. Nevertheless recent environmental legal initiatives have
considered future regulations regarding environmental damage insurance. In case such regulations come
into force, we will have to analyze the need to obtain such insurance. We do not have, and do not intend
to obtain, political risk insurance. We cannot assure you that these and other uninsured events will not
have an adverse effect on our business, properties, operating results, financial condition or prospects.
Changes in the demand level for our products and copper sales agreements could adversely affect our
revenues.
Our financial results are subject to fluctuations on the level of industrial and consumer demand for the
refined, semi-refined metal products and concentrates we sell, as well as global economic slow-downs or
recessions. Also, changes in technology, industrial processes, concerns over weaknesses in the global
economy and consumer habits may affect the level of demand to the extent that those increase or
decrease the need for our metal products. Likewise, our revenues could be adversely affected by events of
force majeure that could have a negative impact on our sales agreements. These events include acts of
nature, labor strikes, fires, floods, wars, transportation delays, government actions or other events that are
beyond the control of the parties of the agreement.
Interruptions of energy supply or increases in energy costs, shortages of water supply, critical parts,
equipment, skilled labor and other production costs may adversely affect our results of operations.
We require substantial amounts of fuel oil, electricity, water and other resources for our operations. Fuel,
gas and power costs constituted approximately 28%, 29% and 31% of our total production cost in 2019,
2018 and 2017, respectively. We rely upon third parties for our supply of the energy resources consumed
in our operations so that prices for and availability of energy resources may be subject to change or
curtailment, due to, among other things, new laws or regulations, imposition of new taxes or tariffs,
interruptions in production by suppliers, worldwide price levels and market conditions. Regarding water
consumption, although each operation currently has sufficient water rights to cover its operational
demands, the loss of some or all water rights for any of our mines or operations, in whole or in part, or
shortages of water to which we have rights could require us to curtail or shut down mining production
and could prevent us from pursuing expansion opportunities. In addition, future shortages of critical
parts, equipment and skilled labor could adversely affect our operations and development projects.
Our Company is subject to health and safety laws which may restrict our operations, result in
operational delays or increase our operating costs and adversely affect our financial results of
operations.
We are required to comply with occupational health and safety laws and regulations in Peru and Mexico
where our operations are subject to periodic inspections by the relevant governmental authorities. These
laws and regulations govern, among others, health and safety work place conditions, including high risk
labor and the handling, storage and disposal of chemical and other hazardous substances. We believe our
operations are in compliance in all material respects with applicable health and safety laws and
regulations in the countries in which we operate. Compliance with these laws and regulations and new or
existing regulations that may be applicable to us in the future could increase our operating costs and
adversely affect our financial results of operations and cash flows.
Table of Contents
15Our efforts are focused on the health and safety of our workforce in order to consistently improve
performance and compliance through the implementation of occupational health programs, adequate
training and safety incentives at our operations. Despite the Company’s efforts, we are not exempt from
accidents. These are reported to Mexican and Peruvian authorities as required. Regarding non-fatal
accidents, in the last three years, the Company’s Dart rate (rate to measure workplace injuries severe
enough to warrant Day Away from work, job Restrictions and/or job Transfers) was much lower than the
MSHA Dart rate (the MSHA Dart rate is published by the U.S.’s Mine Safety and Health Administration,
and is used as an industry benchmark).
Unfortunately, in 2019 we had four fatalities in Mexico and Peru. In 2018, we did not have fatalities; but
in 2017, we had two fatalities in Mexico and Peru. The amounts paid to the Mexican and Peruvian
authorities for reportable accidents did not have an adverse effect on our results. Under Mexican and
Peruvian law penalties and fines for safety violations are generally monetary, but in certain cases may
lead to the temporary or permanent shutdown of the affected facility or the suspension or revocation of
permits or licenses. Also, violations of security and safety laws and regulations in our Peruvian
operations can be considered a crime, punishable with a sentence of up to 10 years of prison.
Our metals exploration efforts are highly speculative in nature and may be unsuccessful.
Metals exploration is highly speculative in nature. It involves many risks and is frequently unsuccessful.
Once mineralization is discovered, it may take a number of years from the initial phases of drilling until
production is possible, during which time the economic feasibility of production may change. Substantial
expenditures are required to establish proven and probable ore reserves through drilling, to determine
metallurgical processes to extract the metals from the ore and, in the case of new properties, to construct
mining and processing facilities. We cannot assure you that our exploration programs will result in the
expansion or replacement of current production with new proven and probable ore reserves.
Development projects have no operating history upon which we can base estimates of proven and
probable ore reserves and estimates of future cash operating costs. Estimates are, to a large extent, based
upon the interpretation of geological data obtained from drill holes and other sampling techniques, and
feasibility studies that derive estimates of cash operating costs based upon anticipated tonnage and grades
of ore to be mined and processed, the configuration of the ore body, expected recovery rates of the
mineral from the ore, comparable facility and equipment operating costs, anticipated climatic conditions
and other factors. As a result, actual cash operating costs and economic returns based upon development
of proven and probable ore reserves may differ significantly from those originally estimated. Moreover,
significant decreases in actual or expected prices may mean reserves, once found, will be uneconomical
to produce.
We may be adversely affected by challenges relating to slope stability.
Our open-pit mines get deeper as we mine them, presenting certain geotechnical challenges including the
possibility of slope failure. If we are required to decrease pit slope angles or provide additional road
access to prevent such a failure, our stated reserves could be negatively affected. Furthermore,
hydrological conditions relating to pit slopes, renewal of material displaced by slope failures and
increased stripping requirements could also negatively affect our stated reserves. We have taken actions
in order to maintain slope stability, but we cannot assure you that we will not have to take additional
action in the future or that our actions taken to date will be sufficient. Unexpected failure or additional
requirements to prevent slope failure may negatively affect our results of operations and financial
condition, as well as have the effect of diminishing our stated ore reserves.
We may be adversely affected by labor disputes.
In the last several years we have experienced a number of strikes or other labor disruptions that have had
an adverse impact on our operations and operating results. As of December 31, 2019, unions represented
approximately 71% of our workforce. Currently, we have labor agreements in effect for our Mexican and
Peruvian operations.
Table of Contents
16During 2017, the Unified Labor Union of SPCC workers and one of Toquepala’s unions held three
separate strikes. The Company estimates that the loss of copper production resulting from the 2017
strikes was not significant and our sales contracts were not affected.
Our Taxco mine in Mexico has been on strike since July 2007. It is expected that operations at this mine
will remain suspended until these labor issues are resolved. In addition, the workers of the San Martin
mine were on strike from July 2007 to August 2018. After eleven years of an illegal stoppage, we
resumed control of the San Martin mine in August 2018. The San Martin facilities deteriorated during
this period and we undertook a major renovation in order to restart operations during the second quarter
of 2019, with an estimated capital budget of $97.7 million. For additional information, see Item 2,
“Properties—Mexican IMMSA Unit—San Martin and Taxco”, and Note 13, “Commitments and
Contingencies—Labor matters”, to our consolidated financial statements.
We cannot assure you when the pending strike will be settled, or that in the future we will not experience
strikes or other labor related work stoppages that could have a material adverse effect on our financial
condition and results of operations.
Our mining or metal production projects may be subject to additional costs due to community actions
and other factors.
In recent years, worldwide mining activity has been pressured by neighboring communities for financial
commitments to fund social benefit programs and infrastructure improvements. Our projects in Peru are
not exempt from these pressures. Our Tia Maria project in Peru has experienced delays while trying to
resolve issues with community groups.
It appears that it is becoming a part of the Peruvian mining environment that in order to obtain
acceptance from local communities for projects in their localities, demands for substantial investments in
community infrastructure and upgrades must be met in order to proceed with the mining projects.
We are confident that we will move forward with the Tia Maria project. However, we cannot assure you
when and that we will not continue to incur additional costs for community infrastructure and upgrades in
order to obtain the approval of current or future mining projects.
In addition, there are a number of collective action lawsuits and civil action lawsuits, filed against the
Company in Mexico´s federal courts and the state courts of Sonora. A number of constitutional lawsuits
have also been filed against various governmental authorities and against the Company. These lawsuits
are seeking damages and requesting remedial actions to restore the environment. The Company believes
that it is not possible to determine the extent of the damages sought and considers the lawsuits without
merit. However the Company cannot offer any assurances that the outcome of these lawsuits will not
have an adverse effect on the Company.
Environmental, regulatory response to climate change, and other regulations may increase our costs
of doing business, restrict our operations or result in operational delays.
Our exploration, mining, milling, smelting and refining activities are subject to a number of Peruvian and
Mexican laws and regulations, including environmental laws and regulations, and certain industry
technical standards. Additional matters subject to regulation include, but are not limited to, concession
fees, transportation, production, water use and discharge, power use and generation, use and storage of
explosives, surface rights, housing and other facilities for workers, reclamation, taxation, labor standards,
mine safety and occupational health.
Environmental regulations in Peru and Mexico have become increasingly stringent over the last decade
and we have been required to dedicate more time and money to compliance and remediation activities.
Furthermore, the Mexican authorities have become more rigorous and strict in enforcing Mexican
environmental laws. We expect additional laws and regulations will be enacted over time with respect to
environmental matters.
Please refer to Note 13 “Commitments and Contingencies—Environmental matters” of our financial
statements for further information on this subject.
Table of Contents
17The potential physical impacts of climate change on our operations are highly uncertain, and would be
particular to the geographic location of our facilities. These may include changes in rainfall patterns,
water shortages, changing sea levels, changing storm patterns and intensities, and changing temperatures.
These effects may adversely impact the cost, production and financial performance of our operations.
We are aware of fluctuations in weather patterns in the areas where we operate. Aligned with government
efforts, we are working in measuring its carbon footprint in order to reduce any contribution to
greenhouse gases generated by our operations. Similarly, we evaluate our water demand, as weather
changes may result in increase/decrease scenarios that affect our needs.
The development of more stringent environmental protection programs in Peru and Mexico and in
relevant trade agreements could impose constraints and additional costs on our operations requiring us to
make significant investments in the future. We cannot assure you that current or future legislative,
regulatory or trade developments will not have an adverse effect on our business, properties, operating
results, financial condition or prospects.
Our mining and metal production projects may subject us to new risks.
Our Company is in the midst of a large expansion program, which may subject us to additional risks of
industrial accidents. While we believe our contractors employ safety standards and other procedures to
ensure these projects are completed with proper governance, it is possible that the increased activity
occurring at our sites could cause accidents of an environmental nature or danger to human life.
Our business depends upon information technology systems which may be adversely affected by
disruptions, damage, failure and risks associated with implementation and integration.
Our operations depend upon information technology systems which may be subject to disruption, damage
or failure from different sources, including, without limitation, installation of malicious software,
computer viruses, security breaches, cyber-attacks and defects in design. In recent years, cybersecurity
incidents have increased in frequency and include, but are not limited to, malicious software, attempts to
gain unauthorized access to data and other electronic security breaches that could lead to disruptions in
systems, unauthorized release of confidential or otherwise protected information and the corruption of
data.
However, given the unpredictability of the timing, nature and scope of information technology
disruptions, we could potentially be subject to manipulation or improper use of our systems and
networks, operational delays, the compromising of confidential or otherwise protected information,
destruction or corruption of data, security breaches, financial losses from remedial actions, any of which
could have a material adverse effect on our cash flows, competitive position, financial condition or
results of operations.
Other risks
Applicable law restricts the payment of dividends from our Minera Mexico subsidiary to us.
Our subsidiary, Minera Mexico, is a Mexican company and, as such, may pay dividends only out of net
income that has been approved by the shareholders. Shareholders must also approve the actual dividend
payment, after mandatory legal reserves have been created and losses for prior fiscal years have been
satisfied. These legal constraints may limit the ability of Minera Mexico to pay dividends to us, which in
turn, may have an impact on our ability to pay stockholder dividends or to service debt.
Global and local market conditions, including the high competitiveness in the copper mining industry,
may adversely affect our profitability.
Our industry is cyclical by nature and fluctuates with economic cycles. Therefore, we are subject to the
risks arising from adverse changes in domestic and global economic and political conditions, such as
lower levels of consumer and corporate confidence, decreased business investment, increased
unemployment, reduced income and asset values in
Table of Contents
18many areas, currency volatility and limited availability of credit and access to capital. Additionally, we
face competition from other copper mining and producing companies around the world; significant
competition exists to acquire properties producing or capable of producing copper and other metals as
well as consolidation among some of our main competitors that make them more diversified than we are.
We cannot assure you that changes in market conditions, including competition, will not adversely affect
us to compete in the future on the basis of price or other factors with companies that may benefit from
future favorable trading or other arrangements.
We are controlled by Grupo Mexico, which exercises control over our affairs and policies and whose
interests may be different from yours.
At December 31, 2019, Grupo Mexico owned indirectly 88.9% of our capital stock. Certain of our and
Minera Mexico’s officers and directors are also directors and/or officers of Grupo Mexico and/or of its
affiliates. We cannot assure you that the interests of Grupo Mexico will not conflict with our minority
stockholders.
Grupo Mexico has the ability to determine the outcome of substantially all matters submitted for a vote to
our stockholders and thus exercises control over our business policies and affairs, including the
following:
●the composition of our Board of Directors and, as a result, any determinations of our Board with
respect to our business direction and policy, including the appointment and removal of our officers;
●determinations with respect to mergers and other business combinations, including those that may
result in a change of control;
●whether dividends are paid or other distributions are made and the amount of any dividends or other
distributions;
●sales and dispositions of our assets;
●the amount of debt financing that we incur; and
●the approval of capital projects.
We cannot assure you that increased financial obligations of Grupo Mexico or AMC resulting from
financings or for other reasons will not result in our parent corporations obtaining loans, increased
dividends or other funding from us.
In addition, we have in the past engaged in, and expect to continue to engage in, transactions with Grupo
Mexico and its other affiliates which are related party transactions and may present conflicts of interest.
For additional information regarding the share ownership of, and our relationships with, Grupo Mexico
and its affiliates, see Note 17 “Related Party Transactions.”
Unanticipated litigation or negative developments in pending litigation or with respect to other
contingencies may adversely affect our financial condition and results of operations.
We are currently, and may in the future become, subject to litigation, arbitration or other legal
proceedings with other parties. If decided adversely to the Company, these legal proceedings, or others
that could be brought against us in the future, may adversely affect our financial position or prospects.
For further detailed discussion of pending litigation, please see Note 13 “Commitment and Contingencies
—Litigation matters”.
Developments in the United States, Europe and emerging market countries may adversely affect the
Company business, our common stock price and our debt securities.
The business and market value of securities of companies with significant operations in Peru and Mexico
is, to varying degrees, affected by the economic policies and market conditions in the United States,
Europe and emerging market countries. Although economic policies and conditions in such countries may
significantly differ from economic conditions in Peru or Mexico, as the case may be, the business
community reactions to developments in any of these countries may adversely effect the Company
business or the market value or trading price of the securities, including debt securities, of issuers that
have significant operations in Peru or Mexico.
Table of Contents
In addition, in recent years economic conditions in Mexico have increasingly become correlated to U.S.
economic conditions. Therefore, changes in economic policies and conditions in the United States could
also have a significant adverse effect on Mexican economic conditions, affecting our business, the price
of our common stock or debt securities. In 2017, the United States, Canada and Mexico began a
discussion leading towards an update of the North American Free Trade Agreement (“NAFTA”). In
September 2018, the three countries reached an agreement on a new trade deal, which will be known as
the United States—Mexico—Canada Agreement (“USMCA”). In June 2019, Mexico’s senate ratified the
UMSCA. During December 2019, the three countries agreed to a new revision of its regional trade pact,
also concluding that the USMCA would replace NAFTA. On January 29, 2020, the U.S. ratified the
USMCA and its President signed the USMCA into law. The ratification process by the Canadian
parliament continues.
In addition, rising trade tensions between the U.S. and China and efforts by the Chinese government to
reduce debt levels contributed to a recent slowdown in China’s growth. A continued slowing in China’s
economic growth and copper demand and continued trade tensions between the U.S. and China could
result in lower copper prices which could have a material adverse impact on our business and results of
operations. The adoption and expansion of trade restrictions, changes in the state of China-U.S. relations,
including the current trade tensions, or other governmental action related to tariffs or trade agreements or
policies are difficult to predict and could adversely affect demand for our products, our costs, our
customers, our suppliers, and the U.S. economy, which in turn could have a material adverse effect on our
cash flows, competitive position, financial condition or results of operations.
Additionally, there is uncertainty in global markets arising from the June 2016 referendum in the United
Kingdom, the
result of which was a vote to leave the European Union (“Brexit”) which has resulted in the United
Kingdom leaving the
European Union after an 11-month transition period, that started in January. Brexit may adversely affect
global political, regulatory, economic and market conditions, including capital markets and foreign
exchange markets, which could adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of
operations. It is likely that there will continue to be a period of instability and volatility in global financial
markets until the terms and timing of Brexit are clear.
We cannot assure you that the market value or trading prices of our common stock and debt securities,
will not be adversely affected by events in the United States or elsewhere, including in emerging market
countries.
Other international risks.
We are a company with substantial assets located outside of the United States. We conduct production
operations in Peru and Mexico and exploration activities in these countries as well as in Chile, Argentina
and Ecuador. Accordingly, in addition to the usual risks associated with conducting business in foreign
countries, our business may be adversely affected by political, economic and social uncertainties in each
of these countries. Such risks include possible expropriation or nationalization of property, confiscatory
taxes or royalties, possible foreign exchange controls, changes in the national policy toward foreign
investors, extreme environmental standards, etc.
Our international operations must comply with the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and similar anti-
corruption and anti-bribery laws of the other jurisdictions in which we operate. There has been a
substantial increase in the global enforcement of these laws in recent years. As such, our corporate
policies and processes may not prevent or detect all potential breaches of law. Any violation of those laws
could result in significant criminal or civil fines and penalties, litigation, and loss of operating licenses or
permits, and may damage our reputation, which could have a material adverse effect on our cash flows,
results of operations and financial condition.
Our insurance does not cover most losses caused by the above described risks. Consequently, our
production, development and exploration activities in these countries could be substantially affected by
factors out of control, some of which could materially and adversely affect our financial position or
results of operations.
We may be adversely affected by natural disasters, pandemics (including the recent coronavirus
outbreak) and other catastrophic events, and by man-made problems such as terrorism, that could
disrupt our business operations, and our business continuity and disaster recovery plans may not
adequately protect us from a serious disaster.
19
Table of Contents
20Natural disasters, adverse weather conditions, floods, pandemics (including the recent coronavirus
outbreak), acts of terrorism and other catastrophic or geo-political events may cause damage or disruption
to our operations, international commerce, and the global economy, and could have an adverse effect on
our business, operating results, and financial
condition.
Risks Associated with Doing Business in Peru and Mexico
There is uncertainty as to the termination and renewal of our mining concessions.
Under the laws of Peru and Mexico, mineral resources belong to the state and government and
concessions are required in both countries to explore for or exploit mineral reserves. In Peru, our mineral
rights derive from concessions from Ministry of Energy and Mines (“MINEM”) for our exploration,
exploitation, extraction and/or production operations. In Mexico, our mineral rights derive from
concessions granted, on a discretionary basis, by the Ministry of Economy, pursuant to Mexican mining
law and regulations thereunder.
Mining concessions in both Peru and Mexico may be terminated if the obligations of the concessioner are
not satisfied. In Peru, we are obligated to pay certain fees for our mining concession. In Mexico, we are
obligated, among other things, to explore or exploit the relevant concession, to pay any relevant fees, to
comply with all environmental and safety standards, to provide information to the Ministry of Economy
and to allow inspections by the Ministry of Economy. Any termination or unfavorable modification of the
terms of one or more of our concessions, or failure to obtain renewals of such concessions subject to
renewal or extensions, could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition and prospects.
Peruvian economic and political conditions may have an adverse impact on our business.
A significant part of our operations are conducted in Peru. Accordingly, our business, financial condition
or results of operations could be affected by changes in economic or other policies of the Peruvian
government or other political, regulatory or economic developments in the country. During the past
several decades, Peru has had a succession of regimes with differing policies and programs. Past
governments have frequently intervened in the nation’s economy and social structure. Among other
actions, past governments have imposed controls on prices, exchange rates and local and foreign
investments, as well as limitations on imports, have restricted the ability of companies to dismiss
employees and have prohibited the remittance of profits to foreign investors.
In 2019 Peru continued experiencing heightened political instability derived from various currently
ongoing investigations into allegations of money laundering and corruption linked to the Operation Car
Wash investigation that was initiated by Brazilian authorities. Because we have significant operations in
Peru, we cannot provide any assurance that political developments and economic conditions, including
any changes to economic policies or the adoption of other reforms proposed by existing or future
administrations, in Peru and/or other factors will not have a material adverse effect on market conditions,
prices of our securities, our ability to obtain financing and our results of operations and financial
condition.
Mexican economic and political conditions, as well as drug-related violence, may have an adverse
impact on our business.
The Mexican economy is highly sensitive to economic developments in the United States, mainly
because of its high level of exports to this market. Other risks in Mexico are increases in taxes on the
mining sector and higher royalties as were enacted in 2013. As has occurred in other metal producing
countries, the mining industry may be perceived as a source of additional fiscal revenue.
In addition, security institutions in Mexico are under significant stress, as a result of drug-related
violence. This situation creates potential risks especially for transportation of minerals and finished
products, which affect a small part of our production. However, drug-related violence has had a limited
impact on our operations as it has tended to concentrate outside our areas of production. The potential
risks to our operations might increase if the violence was to spread to our areas of production.
Table of Contents
21Because we have significant operations in Mexico, we cannot provide any assurance that political
developments and economic conditions, including any changes to economic policies or the adoption of
other reforms proposed by existing or future administrations, or drug-related violence, in Mexico will not
have a material adverse effect on market conditions, prices of our securities, on our ability to obtain
financing, and on our results of operations and financial condition.
Peruvian inflation and fluctuations in the sol exchange rate may adversely affect our financial
condition and results of operations.
Although the U.S. dollar is our functional currency and our revenues are primarily denominated in U.S.
dollars, as we operate in Peru, portions of our operating costs are denominated in Peruvian soles.
Accordingly, when inflation or deflation in Peru is not offset by a change in the exchange rate of the sol,
our financial position, results of operations, cash flows and the market price of our common stock could
be affected.
Inflation in Peru in 2019, 2018 and 2017 was 1.9%, 2.5% and 1.5%, respectively. The value of the sol
appreciated against the U.S. dollar 1.8% and 3.4% in 2019 and 2017, respectively, and it depreciated
4.1% in 2018. Although the Peruvian government’s economic policy reduced inflation and the economy
has experienced significant growth in recent years, we cannot assure you that inflation will not increase
from its current level or that such growth will continue in the future at similar rates or at all. Additionally
a global financial economic crisis could negatively affect the Peruvian economy.
To manage the volatility related to the risk of currency rate fluctuations, we may enter into forward
exchange contracts. We cannot assure you, however, that currency fluctuations will not have an impact on
our financial condition and results of operations.
Mexican inflation, restrictive exchange control policies and fluctuations in the peso exchange rate
may adversely affect our financial condition and results of operations.
Although all of our Mexican operations’ sales of metals are priced and invoiced in U.S. dollars, a
substantial portion of its costs are denominated in pesos. Accordingly, when inflation in Mexico increases
without a corresponding depreciation of the peso, the net income generated by our Mexican operations is
adversely affected. The annual inflation rate in Mexico was 2.8% in 2019, 4.8% in 2018 and 6.8% in
2017.
At the same time, the peso has been subject in the past to significant volatility, which may not have been
proportionate to the inflation rate and may not be proportionate to the inflation rate in the future. The
value of the peso relative to the U.S. dollar increased by 4.3%, 0.3% and 4.5% in 2019, 2018 and 2017,
respectively.
The Mexican government does not currently restrict the ability of Mexican companies or individuals to
convert pesos into dollars or other currencies. While we do not expect the Mexican government to
impose any restriction or exchange control policies in the future, it is an area we closely monitor. We
cannot assure you the Mexican government will maintain its current policies with regard to the peso or
that the peso’s value will not fluctuate significantly in the future. The imposition of exchange control
policies could impair Minera Mexico’s ability to obtain imported goods and to meet its U.S. dollar
denominated obligations and could have an adverse effect on our business and financial condition.
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
None.
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES
We were incorporated in Delaware in 1952. Our corporate offices in the United States are located at 1440
East Missouri Avenue Suite 160, Phoenix, Arizona 85014. Our Phoenix telephone number is (602) 264-
1375. Our corporate offices in Mexico are located in Mexico City and our corporate offices in Peru are
located in Lima. Our website is
Table of Contents
22www.southerncoppercorp.com. We believe that our existing properties are in good condition and suitable
for the conduct of our business.
REVIEW OF OPERATIONS
The following maps set forth the locations of our principal mines, smelting facilities and refineries. We
operate open-pit copper mines in the southern part of Peru—at Toquepala and Cuajone—and in Mexico,
at La Caridad and Buenavista. We also operate five underground mines that produce zinc, copper, silver
and gold, as well as a coal mine and a coke oven.
EXTRACTION, SMELTING AND REFINING PROCESSES
Our operations include open-pit and underground mining, concentrating, copper smelting, copper
refining, copper rod production, solvent extraction/electrowinning (“SX-EW”), zinc refining, sulfuric
acid production, molybdenum concentrate production and silver and gold refining. The extraction and
production process are summarized below.
OPEN-PIT MINING
In an open-pit mine, the production process begins at the mine pit, where waste rock, leaching ore and
copper ore are drilled and blasted and then loaded onto diesel-electric trucks by electric shovels. Waste is
hauled to dump areas and leaching ore is hauled to leaching dumps. The ore to be milled is transported to
the primary crushers.
UNDERGROUND MINING
In an underground mine, the production process begins at the stopes, where copper, zinc and lead veins
are drilled and blasted and the ore is hauled to the underground crusher station. The crushed ore is then
hoisted to the surface for processing.
CONCENTRATING
The copper ore with a copper grade over 0.4% from the primary crusher or the copper, zinc and lead-
bearing ore from the underground mines is transported to a concentrator plant where gyratory crushers
break the ore into sizes no larger than three-quarter of an inch. The ore is then sent to a mill section where
it is ground to the consistency of fine powder. The finely ground ore is mixed with water and chemical
reagents and pumped as a slurry to the flotation separator where

Table of Contents
23it is mixed with certain chemicals. In the flotation separator, reagent solutions and air pumped into the
flotation cells cause the minerals to separate from the waste rock and bubble to the surface where they are
collected and dried.
If the bulk concentrated copper contains molybdenum, it is first processed in a molybdenum plant as
described below under “Molybdenum Production.”
COPPER SMELTING
Copper concentrates are transported to a smelter, where they are smelted using a furnace, converter and
anode furnace to produce either blister copper (which is in the form of cakes with air pockets) or copper
anodes (which are cleaned of air pockets). At the smelter, the concentrates are mixed with flux (a
chemical substance intentionally included for high temperature processing) and then sent to reverberatory
furnaces producing copper matte and slag (a mixture of iron and other impurities). Copper matte contains
approximately 65% copper. Copper matte is then sent to the converters, where the material is oxidized in
two steps: (i) the iron sulfides in the matte are oxidized with silica, producing slag that is returned to the
reverberatory furnaces, and (ii) the copper contained in the matte sulfides is then oxidized to produce
copper that, after casting, is called blister copper, containing approximately 98% to 99% copper, or
anodes, containing approximately 99.7% copper. Most of the blister and anode production is sent to the
refinery and the remainder is sold to customers.
COPPER REFINING
Anodes are suspended in tanks with a solution containing water, sulfuric acid and copper sulfate. A weak
electrical current is passed through the anodes and chemical solution and the dissolved copper is
deposited on very thin starting sheets to produce copper cathodes containing approximately 99.99%
copper. During this process, silver, gold and other metals (for example, palladium, platinum and
selenium), along with other impurities, settle on the bottom of the tank (anodic muds). This anodic mud is
processed at a precious metal plant where selenium, silver and gold are recovered.
COPPER ROD PLANT
To produce copper rod, copper cathodes are first smelted in a furnace and then dosified in a casting
machine. The dosified copper is then extruded and passed through a cooling system that begins
solidification of copper into a 60×50 millimeter copper bar. The resulting copper bar is gradually
stretched in a rolling mill to achieve the desired diameter. The rolled bar is then cooled and sprayed with
wax as a preservation agent and collected into a rod coil that is compacted and sent to market.
SOLVENT EXTRACTION/ELECTROWINNING (“SX-EW”)
A complementary processing method is the leaching and SX-EW process. During the SX-EW process,
low-grade sulfides ore and copper oxides are leached with sulfuric acid to allow copper content recovery.
The acid and copper solution is then agitated with a solvent that contains chemical additives that attract
copper ions. As the solvent is lighter than water, it floats to the surface carrying with it the copper
content. The solvent is then separated using an acid solution, freeing the copper. The acid solution
containing the copper is then moved to electrolytic extraction tanks to produce copper cathodes.
MOLYBDENUM PRODUCTION
Molybdenum is recovered from copper-molybdenum concentrates produced at the concentrator. The
copper-molybdenum concentrate is first treated with a thickener until it becomes slurry with 60% solids.
The slurry is then agitated in a chemical and water solution and pumped to the flotation separator. The
separator creates a froth that carries molybdenum to the surface but not the copper mineral (which is later
filtered to produce copper concentrates containing approximately 27% copper). The molybdenum froth is
skimmed off, filtered and dried to produce molybdenum concentrates of approximately 58% contained
molybdenum.
Table of Contents
24ZINC REFINING
Metallic zinc is produced through electrolysis using zinc concentrates and zinc oxides. Sulfur is
eliminated from the concentrates by roasting and the zinc oxide is dissolved in sulfuric acid solution to
eliminate solid impurities. The purified zinc sulfide solution is treated by electrolysis to produce refined
zinc and to separate silver and gold, which are recovered as concentrates.
SULFURIC ACID PRODUCTION
Sulfur dioxide gases are produced in the copper smelting and zinc roasting processes. As a part of our
environmental preservation program, we treat the sulfur dioxide emissions at two of our Mexican plants
and at our Peruvian processing facilities to produce sulfuric acid, some of which is, in turn, used for the
copper leaching process, with the balance sold to mining and fertilizer companies located principally in
Mexico, Peru, United States and Chile.
SILVER AND GOLD REFINING
Silver and gold are recovered from copper, zinc and lead concentrates in the smelters and refineries, and
from slimes through electrolytic refining.
KEY PRODUCTION CAPACITY DATA
All production facilities are owned by us. The following table sets forth as of December 31, 2019, the
locations of production facilities by reportable segment, the processes used, as well as the key production
and capacity data for each location:
Table of Contents
                2019     2019 Capacity  
Facility Name Location Process Nominal Capacity(1) Production Use(4)  
PERUVIAN
OPEN ‑PIT UNIT  
Mining
Operations            
Cuajone open ‑pit
mine
 Cuajone (Peru)
 Copper ore milling
and recovery , copper
and molybdenum
concentrate
production  90.0 ktpd—ore milled
  83.1  92.3 %
Toquepala
open ‑pit mine;
Concentrator I
 Toquepala (Peru)
 Copper ore milling
and recovery , copper
and molybdenum
concentrate
production  60.0 ktpd—ore milled
  63.9  106.4 %
Concentrator II   60.0 ktpd—ore milled  57.9  96.5 %  
Toquepala
SX‑EW plant
 Toquepala (Peru)
 Leaching, solvent
extraction and
cathode
electrowinning  56.0 ktpy—refined
  26.3  47.0 %
Processing
Operations    
      
 
Ilo copper smelter
 Ilo (Peru)
 Copper smelting,
blister , anodes
production  1,200.0 ktpy—concentrate feed
  1,075.5  89.6 %
Ilo copper refinery  Ilo (Peru)  Copper refining  280 ktpy—refined cathodes   256.7  91.7 %
Ilo acid plants  Ilo (Peru)  Sulfuric acid  1,050 ktpy—sulfuric acid   1,072.6  102.2 %
Ilo precious
metals refinery
 Ilo (Peru)
 Slime recovery &
processing, gold &
silver refining  320 tpy
  342.0  106.9 %
MEXICAN
OPEN ‑PIT UNIT    
      
 
Mining
Operations    
      
 
Buenavista
open ‑pit mine;
Concentrator I
 Sonora (Mexico)
 Copper ore milling &
recovery , copper
concentrate
production  82.0 ktpd—milling
  81.0  98.8 %
Concentrator II   100.0 ktpd—milling  111.8  111.8%  
Buenavista:
SX‑EW plant I
 Sonora (Mexico)
 Leaching, solvent
extraction & refined
cathode
electrowinning  11.0 ktpy—refined
  —  —%
SX‑EW plant II   43.8 ktpy—refined  21.5  49.2 %  
SX‑EW plant III   120.0 ktpy—refined  78.6  65.5 %  
La Caridad
open ‑pit mine
 Sonora (Mexico)
 Copper ore milling &
recovery , copper &
molybdenum
concentrate
production  94.5 ktpd—milling
  94.9  100.5 %
La Caridad
SX‑EW plant
 Sonora (Mexico)
 Leaching, solvent
extraction & cathode
electrowinning  21.9 ktpy—refined
  25.9  118.4 %
Processing
Operations    
      
 
La Caridad copper
smelter  Sonora (Mexico)
 Concentrate smelting,
anode production  1,000 ktpy—concentrate feed
  1,011.4  101.1 %
La Caridad copper
refinery  Sonora (Mexico)
 Copper refining  300 ktpy copper cathode
  231.6  77.2 %
La Caridad copper
rod plant  Sonora (Mexico)
 Copper rod
production  150 ktpy copper rod
  142.7  95.2 %
La Caridad
precious metals
refinery  Sonora (Mexico)
 Slime recovery &
processing, gold &
silver refining  1.8 ktpy—slime
  1.0  57.6 %
La Caridad
sulfuric acid plant  Sonora (Mexico)
 Sulfuric acid  1,565.5 ktpy—sulfuric acid
  966.2  61.7 %
IMMSA  UNIT           
Undergr ound
mines    
      
 
Charcas
 San Luis Potosi (Mexico)
 Copper , zinc, lead
milling, recovery &
concentrate
production  1,460 ktpy—ore milled
  1,293.1  88.6 %
San Martin
 Zacatecas (Mexico)
 Lead, zinc, copper &
silver mining, milling
recovery &
concentrate
production  1,606 ktpy—ore milled
  653.7  40.7 %
Santa Barbara
 Chihuahua (Mexico)
 Lead, copper and zinc
mining &
concentrates
production  2,190 ktpy—ore milled
  1,636.6  74.7 %
25Santa Eulalia
 Chihuahua (Mexico)
 Lead & zinc mining
and milling recovery
& concentrate
production  547.5 ktpy—ore milled
  327.1  59.7 %
Taxco(2)
 Guerrero (Mexico)
 Lead, zinc silver &
gold mining recovery
& concentrate
production  730 ktpy—ore milled
  —  —%
Nueva Rosita coal
& coke
complex(3)  Coahuila (Mexico)
 Clean coal production  900 ktpy clean coal
  25.2  2.8%
  100 ktpy coke  —  —%  
Processing
Operations    
      
 
San Luis Potosi
zinc refinery  San Luis Potosi (Mexico)
 Zinc concentrates
refining  105.0 ktpy zinc cathode
  105.0  100.0 %
San Luis Potosi
sulfuric acid plant  San Luis Potosi (Mexico)
 Sulfuric acid  180.0 ktpy sulfuric acid
  187.2  104.0 %
Table of Contents
26ktpd = thousands of tons per day
ktpy = thousands of tons per year
Tpy = tons per year
(1) Our estimates of actual capacity under normal operating conditions with allowance for normal downtime
for repairs and maintenance and based on the average metal content for the relevant period.
(2) The Taxco mine has been on strike since July 2007. The Company restored production from the San Martin
mine in the second quarter of 2019.
(3) At December 31, 2019, the coal reserves for the Nueva Rosita coal plant were 94.8 million tons with
average sulfur content of 1.38% and a BTU content of 10,022 per pound.
(4) In some cases, real production exceeds the nominal capacity due to higher grades and recovery rates.
PROPERTY BOOK VALUE
At December 31, 2019, net book values of property and mine development are as follows (in millions):
Peruvian operations:         
Cuajone $ 730.3
Toquepala   
2,084.4
Tia Maria project   336.3
Ilo and other support facilities   660.3
Construction in progress   544.7
Total Peru $ 
4,356.0
Mexican open‑pit operations:  
Buenavista mine and concentrator plants $ 
2,310.6
Buenavista SX‑EW and Quebalix  987.5
La Caridad mine and concentrator plant   335.2
La Caridad support facilities   377.7
Construction in progress   282.5
Total Mexico Open Pit $ 
4,293.5
Mexican IMMSA unit:    
San Luis Potosi $ 96.8
Zinc electrolytic refinery   74.5
Charcas   65.8
San Martin   71.3
Santa Barbara   59.9
Taxco   1.9
Santa Eulalia   41.2
Nueva Rosita   7.9
Construction in progress and other facilities   73.5
Total IMMSA Unit $ 492.8
Other property:    
El Pilar $ 87.1
Mexicana del Arco   39.1
Total $ 126.2
Mexican administrative offices $ 102.5
Total Mexico $ 
5,015.0
Total Southern Copper Corporation $ 
9,371.0
Table of Contents
27SUMMARY OPERATING DATA
The following table sets out certain operating data underlying our financial and operating information for
each of the periods indicated.
 Variance
 Year Ended December 31,  2019 -2018  2018 -2017
    2019     2018     2017     Volume    %     Volume    %
COPPER (thousand
pounds):                      
Mined                      
Peru open‑pit                      
Toquepala   510,752  316,849  271,056  193,903  61.2%   45,793  16.9%
Cuajone   344,787  354,016  348,562  (9,229)  (2.6)%   5,454  1.6%
SX‑EW Toquepala   58,045  58,480  55,320  (435)  (0.7)%   3,160  5.7%
Mexico open‑pit                    
La Caridad   236,249  233,882  234,287  2,367  1.0%   (405)  (0.2)%
Buenavista   745,073  716,239  703,074  28,834  4.0%   13,165  1.9%
SX‑EW La Caridad   57,160  58,232  62,586  (1,072)  (1.8)%   (4,354)  (7.0)%
SX‑EW Buenavista   220,711  196,788  246,426  23,923  12.2%   (49,638)  (20.1)%
IMMSA unit   18,222  13,715  12,093  4,507  32.9%   1,622  13.4%
Total Mined   2,190,999  1,948,201  1,933,404  242,798  12.5%   14,797  0.8%
Smelted                      
Peru open‑pit                      
Blister Ilo   —  5,799  3,953  (5,799)  (100.0)%   1,846  46.7%
Anodes Ilo   700,009  760,060  762,460  (60,051)  (7.9)%   (2,400)  (0.3)%
Mexico open‑pit                    
Anodes La Caridad   612,122  631,056  595,717  (18,934)  (3.0)%   35,339  5.9%
Total Smelted   1,312,131  1,396,915  1,362,130  (84,784)  (6.1)%   34,785  2.6%
Refined                      
Peru Open‑pit                      
Cathodes Ilo   565,810  645,191  642,367  (79,381)  (12.3)%   2,824  0.4%
SX‑EW Toquepala   58,045  58,480  55,320  (435)  (0.7)%   3,160  5.7%
Mexico Open‑pit                    
Cathodes La Caridad   510,602  527,306  502,783  (16,704)  (3.2)%   24,523  4.9%
SX‑EW La Caridad   57,160  58,232  62,586  (1,072)  (1.8)%   (4,354)  (7.0)%
SX‑EW Buenavista   220,712  196,788  246,426  23,924  12.2%   (49,638)  (20.1)%
Total Refined   1,412,329  1,485,997  1,509,482  (73,668)  (5.0)%   (23,485)  (1.6)%
Rod Mexico Open‑pit—
La Caridad  314,661  324,403  293,435  (9,742)  (3.0)%   30,968  10.6%
SILVER (thousand
ounces)                      
Mined                      
Peru Open‑pit                      
Toquepala   3,421  2,132  1,779  1,289  60.5%   353  19.8%
Cuajone   2,207  2,280  2,390  (73)  (3.2)%   (110)  (4.6)%
Mexico Open‑pit                    
La Caridad   1,947  2,085  2,009  (138)  (6.6)%   76  3.8%
Buenavista   5,755  5,162  4,988  593  11.5%   174  3.5%
IMMSA unit   6,943  5,649  4,760  1,294  22.9%   889  18.7%
Total Mined   20,273  17,308  15,926  2,965  17.1%   1,382  8.7%
Refined                      
Peru—Ilo   3,344  3,884  3,953  (540)  (13.9)%   (69)  (1.7)%
Mexico—La Caridad   8,049  8,496  7,152  (447)  (5.3)%   1,344  18.8%
IMMSA unit   1,195  1,203  2,583  (8)  (0.7)%   (1,380)  (53.4)%
Total Refined   12,588  13,583  13,688  (995)  (7.3)%   (105)  (0.8)%
MOLYBDENUM
(thousand pounds)                      
Mined                      
Toquepala   16,043  9,169  9,224  6,874  75.0%   (55)  (0.6)%
Cuajone   7,242  6,832  8,259  410  6.0%   (1,427)  (17.3)%
Buenavista   13,487  10,842  7,636  2,645  24.4%   3,206  42.0%
La Caridad   22,500  21,626  21,900  874  4.0%   (274)  (1.3)%
Total Mined   59,272  48,469  47,019  10,803  22.3%   1,450  3.1%
ZINC (thousand pounds)                     
Mined IMMSA   162,970  156,038  151,380  6,932  4.4%   4,658  3.1%
Refined IMMSA   231,435  237,076  230,166  (5,641)  (2.4)%   6,910  3.0%
Table of Contents
SLOPE STABILITY:
Peruvian Operations
The Toquepala and Cuajone pits are each approximately 930 meters deep. Under the present mine plan
configuration the Toquepala pit will reach a depth of 1,605 meters and the Cuajone pit will reach a depth
of 1,380 meters. The deepening pits present us with a number of geotechnical challenges. Perhaps the
foremost concern is the possibility of slope failure, a possibility that all open-pit mines face. In the past,
in order to maintain slope stability, we have decreased pit slope angles, installed additional or duplicate
haul road access, and increased stripping requirements. We have also responded to hydrological
conditions and removed material displaced by slope failures. To meet the geotechnical challenges relating
to slope stability of the open-pit mines, we have taken the following steps:
In the late 1990s, we hosted round table meetings with a group of specialists to review pit designs for
mines with greater than 700 meter depth. Based on the concepts defined at these meetings, we initiated
slope stability studies to define the mining of reserves by optimum design. The studies were completed in
2000 and we believe we implemented the study recommendations. One of the major changes
implemented was slope angle reduction at both mines.
Since 1998, a wall depressurization program has been in place in both pits. This consists of a horizontal
drilling program, which improves drainage thereby reducing saturation and increasing wall stability.
Additionally, a new blasting control program was put in place and a new slope monitoring system was
implemented.
Toquepala:
In 2007, we installed 20 meter wide geotechnical berms every 10 benches at the Toquepala mine. We
believe this will further strengthen the stability of the Toquepala pit. In October 2012, two interferometric
radars were put in place to monitor slope stability at the Toquepala mine, and in September 2013, new
full monitoring software (FMS360) was installed. These systems improve the reliability of
instrumentation, the information quality for assessing the behavior of the slopes and anticipates the risks
of instability.
In 2013, a mining consulting group began a study of dump stability at the Toquepala mine. This study
assessed the current stability of the dumps and is developing a geotechnical campaign to obtain
information to assess the stability of the future and final stages of the dumps. In 2016, the stability study
was resumed by executing geophysical test and test pits for the characterization of the dumps. The
execution of sonic perforations and complementary geophysical tests are currently pending. On
December 2016, the consultants also presented the report “Slope Stability Analysis in Deposits of Waste
and Leachable Material”.
In 2016, the mining consultants presented the final report “Physical Stability of the Quebrada Honda
tailings dam”. This study consisted in the development of geotechnical investigations, static, seismic and
post-seismic stability analysis, filtration analysis, deformation analysis, liquefaction potential analysis
and dynamic analysis.
In 2016, as part of the slope stability upgrade study, a geotechnical and hydrological oriented drill
program of 3,470 meters was executed at the Toquepala mine. This program was conducted in order to
complement the study and to get a better understanding of the behavior of the rock mass. The
geotechnical drilling program involved 11 diamond drill holes, six geotechnical drills and five
hydrogeological drills, all of them with geological and geotechnical logging. During the execution of
these hydrogeological drills, permeability tests in the rock were executed as well as slug tests and
constant load tests. Additionally, instrumentation was implemented with five vibrating wire piezometers
for the monitoring of water table and to give support to the hydrogeological model. Also in 2016, the
external mining consultants began the report for phase three of this study, which was concluded in 2017.
They submitted and updated the block models of inter-ramp angles, the model of rock mass, the
hydrogeological model and the 3D structural model. In addition, fieldwork continued on the “Slope
Stability Analysis in Deposits of Waste and Leachable Material” study by executing geophysical tests,
sampling and laboratory tests of soil mechanics. This study was concluded and submitted by the external
consultants in 2018.
28
Table of Contents
29Additionally, in 2018 we dedicated efforts to update the geotechnical pit models, which are essential to
perform the analysis of slope stability. Related to this, we have carried out actions, including the
completion of the geotechnical database implementation, laboratory testing, training, and other important
aspects. In 2019, external consultants performed the “2019 Update of Slope Stability Analysis in Deposits
of Waste and Leachable Material” study. In addition, an IBIS ArcSAR radar was incorporated into the pit
slope monitoring system; this radar equipment gives greater coverage, five kilometers of maximum range
and reduced scanning time. Sub- horizontal drains were also implemented for pit slope depressurization.
In recent years, we have destined efforts for the development of stability studies of slopes of the pit,
dumps and leachable deposits and tailings; thus guaranteeing the safety of personnel and equipment, the
continuity of the operation, and complying with Peruvian regulations.
Cuajone:
At the Cuajone mine, in 2007 in order to minimize the damage to the slopes caused by production blast
vibrations, blasting control using three pre-split drills was implemented. Also, the slope monitoring
system with reflection prisms has been replaced by a system using slope monitoring radar. In
February 2012, the first radar equipment was put in service followed in August 2013 with the second
radar installation and a geotechnical surveillance camera was added. This system improved the reliability
and continuity of monitoring, improved the quality of information used to evaluate the performance of
the slopes and helped better anticipate the risk of instability. The sub-surface deformation and the water
level are still monitored with inclinometers and piezometers. In September 2012, we completed a
program of oriented geotechnical drilling totaling 17,938 meters, and in May 2013 we completed a
program of vertical geotechnical drilling totaling 2,814 meters, with hydraulic tests performed on rock
and subsequently instrumented with inclinometers/piezometers. The geotechnical and hydraulic
information obtained from the two programs will be used in the development of a geotechnical study for
the new 15 year mine development plan (2015-2029). Also during 2013, we drilled 772 meters of sub-
horizontal holes in order to drain the east slope of the pit. The geotechnical study for the new 15-year
mine development plan was completed at the end of 2015 and the result of this study is the increase by an
average of three degrees of the inter ramp angle and include 40 meters wide geotechnical berms for inter
ramp heights above 150 meters. This study also contains recommendations for improving the stability of
the pit slopes.
In 2013, the Board of Directors approved a project to improve slope stability at the south area of the
Cuajone mine, which will remove approximately 148 million tons of waste material in order to improve
the mine design without reducing our actual production level. As of December 31, 2019, 129.1 million
tons of waste material have been removed. For further information see Item 7 “Management Discussion
and Analysis—Capital Investment Program.”
In 2017, we installed three vibration monitoring stations and ten digital extensometers to monitor surface
deformations on waste dumps in real time. We also completed the detailed engineering for the
construction of the coronation channel in the west Torata waste dump. In 2018, we began to operate the
first radar for monitoring blasting vibrations and a second geotechnical surveillance camera. This
equipment will allow us to improve control over the walls of the pit and to anticipate possible damages.
To increase the possibility of mining in the event of a slide, we have provided for two extraction ramps
for each open-pit mine. While these measures cannot guarantee that a slope failure will not occur, we
believe that our mining practices are sound and that the steps taken and the ongoing reviews performed
are a prudent methodology for open-pit mining.
Mexican operations
In 2004, our 15-year mine plan study for the La Caridad mine was awarded to an independent consulting
firm to conduct a geotechnical evaluation. The purpose of the plan was to develop a program of optimum
bench design and inter-ramp slope angles for the open-pit. The results of the evaluation presented by the
consultants included a recommendation of a maximum average bench face angle of 72 degrees.
Additionally, single benching was recommended for the upper sections of the west, south and east walls
of the main pit. Likewise, double benching was recommended for the lower levels of the main pit and
single benching for the upper slope segments that consist of either alluvial material, mine waste dumps or
mineralized stockpile material. Alternatively, slopes in these types of materials, may be designed with
Table of Contents
an overall 37 degree slope. The geostructural and geotechnical parameters recommended were applied in
the pit design for the new life of the mine plan for La Caridad mine prepared in 2015. This mine plan
replaced the 15-year mine plan prepared in 2010. However, since final pit limits have not been yet
established at La Caridad, all current pit walls are effectively working slopes. Geostructural and
geotechnical data collected at the open-pit mine from cell-mapping and oriented-core drilling databases
provided the basis for the geotechnical evaluation and recommendations. We continue to collect new
information related to geotechnical data and other geology features from the mine pit and diamond drill
hole, in order to ensure the structural security and also to improve the geotechnical data base for future
studies.
In 2019, we assigned an independent consulting firm to conduct a geotechnical study of La Caridad,
which included the Bella Union area, based on a 15-year mining plan. We expect to receive the results of
this study during 2020.
At the Buenavista mine, we are following the recommendations of a geotechnical evaluation of design
slope for the 15-year pit plan. This evaluation was prepared by an independent mine consulting firm. This
evaluation included the determination of optimum pit slope design angles and bench design parameters
for the proposed mine plan. The objective of the study was: (1) to determine optimum inter-ramp slope
angles and bench design parameters for the 15-year plan and (2) to identify and analyze any potential
major instability that could adversely impact mine operation. In 2012, we installed a radar system to
monitor the walls of the mine.
The following recommendations were made for the Buenavista mine: inter-ramp slope design angles for
the 15-year pit plan, for all of the 21 design sectors, defined on a rock-fabric-based catch bench analysis,
using double bench, can range from 48° and 55°, and the inter-ramp slope angles are based on geometries
that resulted from the back-break analysis using 80% reliability of achieving the required 7.5 meter catch
bench width for a single bench configuration and 10.6 meter catch bench width for a double bench
configuration. Preliminary observations suggest the 15-year pit walls may be relative free-draining, the
back-break analysis assumed depressurized conditions of mine benches, and the inter-ramp stability
analysis were performed for both, saturated and depressurized conditions.
A pit dewatering/depressurization plan for the Buenavista mine was also recommended to address the
issues of open-pit drainage, dewatering plan and future slope depressurization. Phase I of the
geohydrological study was completed by an independent consultant. The analysis included a preliminary
assessment and work plan implementations.
In 2011, five wells for extraction and monitoring were drilled close to the mine. Also, we began a drilling
program to monitor possible water filtration beyond the limits of the open-pit mine. All the information
obtained from these well drilling programs has been analyzed and included in the hydrologic model. The
open-pit dewatering program from the bottom benches also continued during 2012 with a drilling
program of 3,797 meters in several monitoring wells in order to allow us to continue with the current
mining plan.
In 2013, Buenavista continued the drilling program monitoring the extraction wells in the area of
Increment (Phase) five of the mine and beyond the current limits of the open pit mine.
During 2013, the program to dewater the Buenavista pit bottom was continued in accordance with the
short and medium term mine plans. Pumping from sumps located in Increment five, permitted mining of
high grade copper blocks. Concurrent with this operational task, a geophysical study was conducted to
determine the best locations for water extraction wells to control the inflow of water to the pit bottom and
thus allow us to continue our mining operations. The water extracted is being used for various purposes,
including road irrigation for dust mitigation. The geophysical investigation also permitted the location of
underground workings and the filtration and seepage through fractures.
A total of 7,339 meters were drilled during 2013 for 30 extraction wells, three of these wells are located
in the area of Increment (Phase) five. The rest were drilled at various locations outside of the current
open pit mine limit.
In 2014, we continued collecting new geotechnical information from two exploration drilling projects;
this data is available to analyze the geotechnical data base for new studies in accordance with slope angle
for the open pit excavations. In the free face benches at the open pit mine operations, the cell-mapping
were prepared to increment the geotechnical data base. Following the recommendations of geotechnical
evaluation we continued monitoring the walls using the radar system.
30
Table of Contents
31Various studies are now being conducted by outside specialized consultants in order to establish long-
range mine water management objectives and to implement recommendations for the efficient use of this
resource. We are also conducting a geotechnical study and a diamond drilling program with an
independent consulting firm in order to obtain additional geotechnical information, which will allow us to
verify the slope stability for the long-term mine plan. In addition, slope monitoring continues with the
SSR 160 radar.
Tailings Dams
Tailings are comprised of solid particles originating at the concentrator plants during the grinding process
that, combined with water, are sent to specially built structures where they are impounded. The water is
recovered to be reused in the process.
Tailings dams are basically built in two manners: by using the coarse fraction from the same tailings or
by using external material, often known as “borrowed material” such as rock, clay etc. We believe SCC’s
tailings dams are built with the highest quality standards and engineering practices. We comply with and
at times exceed the national norms and recommendations of the International Commission on Large
Dams (ICOLD). In addition we maintain a committee including both internal and external specialists,
which periodically review the safety and operation of each dam.
We have six tailings dams in operation in Mexico and one in Peru as follows:
Country     Operation     Name     Current Height    Material     Method
Mexico  Buenavista Tailings dam # 3 90 meters Borrowed  Downstream
Mexico  Buenavista New tailings dam 70 meters Borrowed  Downstream
Mexico  La Caridad Tailings dam # 7 168 meters Borrowed  Downstream
Mexico  Charcas  Tailings dam  50 meters Coarse tailings Upstream
Mexico  Santa Barbara Noriega dam  45 meters Coarse tailings Upstream
Mexico  Santa Eulalia Tailings dam  70 meters Coarse tailings Upstream
Peru
 Cuajone and
Toquepala  Quebrada Honda
 128 meters Coarse tailings Downstream
Table of Contents
32METAL PRODUCTION BY SEGMENTS
Set forth below are descriptions of the operations and other information relating to the operations
included in each of our three segments.
PERUVIAN OPERATIONS
Our Peruvian segment operations include the Cuajone and Toquepala mine complexes and the smelting
and refining plants, industrial railroad which links Ilo, Toquepala and Cuajone and the port facilities.
Following is a map indicating the approximate location of, and access to, our Cuajone and Toquepala
mine complexes, as well as our Ilo processing facilities:
We have ongoing maintenance and improvement programs to ensure the satisfactory performance of our
equipment. We believe all our Peruvian plant’s equipment is in good physical condition and suitable for
our operations.
Cuajone
Our Cuajone operations consist of an open-pit copper mine and a concentrator located in southern Peru,
30 kilometers from the city of Moquegua and 840 kilometers from Lima, at an altitude of 3,430 meters
above sea level. Access to the Cuajone property is by plane from Lima to Tacna (1:40 hours) and then by
highway to Moquegua and Cuajone (3:30 hours). The concentrator has a milling capacity of 90,000 tons
per day. Overburden removal commenced in 1970 and ore production commenced in 1976. Our Cuajone
operations utilize a conventional open-pit mining method to collect copper ore for further processing at
the concentrator.
Table of Contents
The table below sets forth 2019, 2018 and 2017 production information for our Cuajone operations:
  Variance 2019 -
 2018
        2019    2018    2017    Volume    %
Mine annual operating days      365  365  365      
Mine                 
Total ore mined  (kt)  29,017  29,571  29,769  (554)  (1.9)%
Copper grade  (%)  0.644  0.651  0.617  (0.007)  (1.1)%
Leach material mined  (kt)  1,513  1,122  —  391  34.8%
Leach material grade  (%)  0.483  0.456  —  0.027  5.9%
Stripping ratio  (x)  4.04  4.71  4.01  (0.67)  
(14.2)%
Total material mined  (kt)  
153,911  
175,177  
149,265  
(21,266)  
(12.1)%
Concentrator                 
Total material milled  (kt)  29,056  29,575  29,751  (519)  (1.8)%
Copper recovery  (%)  83.65  83.40  86.10  0.25  0.3%
Copper concentrate  (kt)  625.5  660.7  607.5  (35.2)  (5.3)%
Copper in concentrate  (kt)  156.4  160.6  158.1  (4.2)  (2.6)%
Copper concentrates average grade  (%)  25.00  24.31  26.03  0.69  2.8%
Molybdenum                 
Molybdenum grade  (%)  0.019  0.019  0.019  —  —
Molybdenum recovery  (%)  59.23  55.63  66.62  3.60  6.5%
Molybdenum concentrate  (kt)  6.1  5.8  6.9  0.3  5.2%
Molybdenum concentrate average grade  (%)  54.03  53.30  54.16  0.73  1.4%
Molybdenum in concentrate  (kt)  3.3  3.1  3.7  0.2  6.0%
Key: kt = thousand tons
x = Stripping ratio obtained dividing waste by leachable material plus ore mined.
Copper and molybdenum grades are referred to as total copper grade and total molybdenum grade,
respectively.
Geology
The Cuajone porphyry copper deposit is located on the western flank of Cordillera Occidental, in the
southern-most region of the Andes mountains range of Peru. The deposit is part of a mineral district that
contains two additional known deposits, Toquepala and Quellaveco. The copper mineralization at
Cuajone is typical of porphyry copper deposits.
The Cuajone deposit is located approximately 30 kilometers north-west from the Toquepala deposit and
is part of the Toquepala Group dated approximately 60 to 100 million years (Upper Cretaceous to Lower
Tertiary). The Cuajone lithology contains volcanic rocks from the Cretaceous to the Quaternary period.
The deposit contains 50 rock types including, pre-mineral rocks, basaltic andesite, porphyritic rhyolite,
Toquepala dolerite, Toquepala rhyolite and intrusive rocks, including diorite, porphyritic latite, breccias
and dikes. In addition, the following post-mineral rocks are present: the Huaylillas and Chuntacala
formations that have been formed by conglomerates, tuffs sequence, traquites and agglomerates. These
formations date from nine to 23 million years. There is also the occurrence of Quaternary rocks formed
by alluvial and colluvial mainly located in slopes of hills and streams.
The mineralogy is simple and is evenly distributed. It is mainly composed of minerals such as
chalcopyrite (CuFeS2), chalcosine (Cu2S) and molybdenite (MoS2) with occasional presence of galena,
enargite and tetraedrite without economic value.
Mine exploration
Exploration activities during the drill campaign in 2019 were as follows:
Studies     Meters     Holes     Notes
Infill drilling
  7,000  16 To obtain additional information to improve confidence in our
block model.
Geotechnical
  3,001  11 To confirm the continuity of major structures and the quality of
rock mass.
33
Table of Contents
34Concentrator
Our Cuajone operations use state-of-the-art computer monitoring systems at the concentrator, the
crushing plant and the flotation circuit in order to coordinate inflows and optimize operations. Material
with a copper grade over 0.35% is loaded onto an overland conveyor belt and sent to the milling circuit,
where giant rotating crushers reduce the size of the rocks to approximately one-half of an inch. The ore is
then sent to the ball mills, which grind it to the consistency of fine powder. The finely ground powder is
agitated in a water and reagents solution and is then transported to flotation cells. Air is pumped into the
cells to produce foam for floating the copper and molybdenum minerals, but separating waste material
called tailings. This copper-molybdenum bulk concentrate is then treated by inverse flotation where
molybdenum is floated and copper is depressed. The copper concentrate is shipped by rail to the smelter
at Ilo and the molybdenum concentrate is packaged for shipment to customers. Sulfides under 0.35%
copper are considered waste.
Tailings are sent to thickeners where water is recovered. The remaining tailings are sent to the Quebrada
Honda dam, our principal tailings storage facility.
A major mill expansion was completed in 1999 and the eleventh primary mill was put in operation in
January 2008. In December 2013, the high pressure grinding roll was put in operation. At the end of
2016, the Larox filter press for molybdenum concentrate began operations. The overland primary crusher
began operations in May 2018. The new tailings thickener began operations in September 2019.
Toquepala
Our Toquepala operations consist of an open-pit copper mine and two concentrators. We also refine
copper at the SX-EW facility through a leaching process. Toquepala is located in southern Peru, 30
kilometers from Cuajone and 870 kilometers from Lima, at an altitude of 3,220 meters above sea level.
Access is by plane from Lima to the city of Tacna (1:40 hours) and then by the Pan-American highway to
Camiara (1:20 hours) and by road to Toquepala (1 hour). Each concentrator has a milling capacity of
60,000 tons per day. The SX-EW facility has a production capacity of 56,000 tons per year of LME grade
A copper cathodes. Overburden removal commenced in 1957 and ore production commenced in 1960.
Our Toquepala operations utilize a conventional open-pit mining method to collect copper ore for further
processing in our concentrators. The second concentrator began operations in the fourth quarter of 2018.
Table of Contents
35The table below sets forth 2019, 2018 and 2017 production information for our Toquepala operations:
  Variance 2019 -
 2018
         2019    2018    2017    Volume    %
Mine annual operating days      365  365  365      
Mine                 
Total ore mined  (kt)  38,248  22,701  20,411  
15,547  68.5%
Copper grade  (%)  0.682  0.686  0.663  
(0.004)  (0.6)%
Leach material mined  (kt)  96,700  
104,126  85,048  
(7,426)  (7.1)%
Leach material grade  (%)  0.161  0.160  0.201  0.001  0.6%
Stripping ratio  (x)  0.85  0.90  0.93  (0.05)  (5.6)%
Total material mined  (kt)  
249,083  
241,514  
203,778  7,569  3.1%
Concentrator                 
Total material milled  (kt)  38,121  23,060  20,392  
15,061  65.3%
Copper recovery  (%)  89.64  90.99  90.94  (1.35)  (1.5)%
Copper concentrate  (kt)  885.2  528.2  451.9  357.0  67.6%
Copper in concentrate  (kt)  231.7  143.7  122.9  88.0  61.2%
Copper concentrate average grade  (%)  26.20  27.21  27.21  (1.01)  (3.7)%
SX‑EW plant                 
Estimated leach recovery  (%)  23.72  24.11  24.62  (0.39)  (1.6)%
SX‑EW cathode production  (kt)  26.3  26.5  25.1  (0.2)  (0.8)%
Molybdenum                 
Molybdenum grade  (%)  0.033  0.028  0.029  0.005  17.9%
Molybdenum recovery  (%)  57.84  68.42  69.69  
(10.58)  
(15.5)%
Molybdenum concentrate  (kt)  13.1  7.5  7.5  5.6  74.7%
Molybdenum concentrate average grade  (%)  55.64  55.54  55.76  0.10  0.2%
Molybdenum in concentrate  (kt)  7.3  4.2  4.2  3.1  73.3%
Key: kt = thousand tons
x = Stripping ratio obtained dividing waste by leachable material plus ore mined.
Copper and molybdenum grades are referred to as total copper grade and total molybdenum grade,
respectively.
Geology
The Toquepala porphyry deposit is located on the western slopes of Cordillera Occidental, in the
southern-most region of the Andes mountains range of Peru, approximately 120 kilometers from the
border with Chile. This region extends into Chile and is home to many of the world’s most significant
known copper deposits. The deposit is part of a mineral district that contains two additional known
deposits, Cuajone and Quellaveco. The deposit is in a territory with intrusive and eruptive activities of
rhyolitic and andesitic rocks which are 70 million years old (Cretaceous-Tertiary) and which created a
series of volcanic lava. The lava is composed of rhyolites, andesites and volcanic agglomerates with a
western dip and at an altitude of 1,500 meters. These series are known as the Toquepala Group.
Subsequently, different intrusive activities occurred which broke and smelted the rocks of the Toquepala
Group. These intrusive activities resulted in diorites, granodiorites and dikes of porphyritic dacite.
Toquepala has a simple mineralogy with regular copper grade distribution. Economic ore is found as
disseminated sulfurs throughout the deposit as veinlets, replenishing empty places or as small aggregates.
Ore minerals include chalcopyrite (CuFeS2), chalcosine (Cu2S) and molybdenite (MoS2). A secondary
enrichment zone is also found with thicknesses between 0 and 150 meters.
Table of Contents
36Mine Exploration
Exploration activities during the drill campaign in 2019 were as follows:
Studies     Meters     Holes     Notes
Ore and leach confirmation to reserves and
phases   24,479  30 To confirm the continuity of the ore and leach
material.
Study of Slopes Stability Instability‑W est
Sector   1,500  8 For slope depressurization.
Exploration geotechnical and
hydrogeological drill   7,931  15 To define rock mass quality and verify the
continuity of the major faults.
Total   33,910   53   
Concentrator
Our Toquepala concentrator operations use state-of-the-art computer monitoring systems in order to
coordinate inflows and optimize operations. Material with a copper grade over 0.22% is loaded onto an
overland conveyor belt and sent to the crushing circuit, where rotating crushers reduce the size of the
rocks by approximately 85%, to less than one-half of an inch. The ore is then sent to the rod and ball
mills, which grind it in a mix with water to the consistency of fine powder. The finely ground powder
mixed with water is then transported to flotation cells. Air is pumped into the cells producing a froth,
which carries the copper mineral to the surface but not the waste rock, or tailings. The bulk concentrate
with sufficient molybdenum content is processed to recover molybdenum by inverse flotation. This final
copper concentrate with a content of approximately 26.5% of copper is filtered in order to reduce
moisture to 8.5% or less. Concentrates are then shipped by rail to the Ilo smelter.
Tailings are sent to thickeners where water is recovered. The remaining tailings are sent to the Quebrada
Honda dam, our principal tailings storage facility.
SX-EW Plant
The SX-EW facility at Toquepala produces grade A LME electrowon copper cathodes of 99.999% purity
from solutions obtained by leaching low-grade ore stored at the Toquepala and Cuajone mines. The leach
plant commenced operations in 1995 with a design capacity of 35,629 tons per year of copper cathodes.
In 1999, the capacity was expanded to 56,000 tons per year.
Copper oxides from Cuajone with a copper grade higher than 0.467%, with an acid solubility index
higher than 50% and a cyanide solubility index higher than 23% are leached. In Toquepala, the copper
sulfides cutoff grade is 0.041% and therefore material with a total copper grade between 0.080% and
0.295% are leached. Copper in solution produced at Cuajone is sent to Toquepala through an eight-inch
pipe laid alongside the Cuajone-Toquepala railroad track.
Plant and equipment are supported by a maintenance plan and a quality management system to assure
good physical condition and high availability. The SX-EW plant management quality system (including
leaching operations) has been audited periodically since 2002 by an external audit company, and found to
be in compliance with the requirements of the ISO 9001-2008 standard. In 2012, we obtained the
certification OHSAS 18001-2007 of our occupational health and safety system and the ISO14001-2015
for our environmental standards at the SX-EW plant.
Processing Facilities—Ilo
Our Ilo smelter and refinery complex is located in the southern part of Peru, 17 kilometers north of the
city of Ilo, 121 kilometers from Toquepala, 147 kilometers from Cuajone and 1,240 kilometers from the
city of Lima. Access is by plane from Lima to Tacna (1:40 hours) and then by highway to the city of Ilo
(2:00 hours). Additionally, we maintain a port facility in Ilo, from which we ship our products and
receive supplies. Products shipped and supplies received are moved between Toquepala, Cuajone and Ilo
on our industrial railroad.
Table of Contents
Smelter
Our Ilo smelter produces copper anodes for the refinery we operate as part of the same facility. When the
copper produced by the smelter exceeds the refinery’s capacity, the excess is sold to other refineries
around the world. In 2007, we completed a major modernization of the smelter. The nominal installed
capacity of the smelter is 1,200,000 tons of copper concentrate per year. Copper concentrates from
Toquepala and Cuajone are transported by railroad to the smelter, where they are smelted using an
ISASMELT furnace, converters and anode furnaces to produce copper anodes with 99.7% copper. At the
smelter, the concentrates are mixed with flux and other material and sent to the ISASMELT furnace
producing a mixture of copper matte and slag, which is tapped through a taphole to either of two rotary
holding furnaces, where these smelted phases will be separated. Copper matte contains approximately
63% copper. Copper matte is then sent to the four Pierce Smith converters, where the material is oxidized
in two steps: (1) the iron sulfides in the matte are oxidized with oxygen enriched air and silica is added
producing slag that is sent to the slag cleaning furnaces, and (2) the copper contained in the matte sulfides
is then oxidized to produce blister copper, containing approximately 99.3% copper. The blister copper is
refined in two anode furnaces by oxidation to remove sulfur with compressed air injected into the bath.
Finally, the oxygen content of the molten copper is adjusted by reduction with injection of liquefied
petroleum gas with steam into the bath. Anodes, containing approximately 99.7% copper, are cast in two
casting wheels. The smelter also can produce blister copper bars, especially when an anode furnace is in
general repair.
The table below sets forth 2019, 2018 and 2017 production and sales information for our Ilo smelter
plant:
  Variance 2019 -
 2018
Smelter          2019    2018    2017    Volume    %
Concentrate smelted  (kt)  
1,075.5  
1,187.7  
1,153.5  
(112.2)      
(9.4)%
Average copper recovery  (%)  97.4  97.4  97.4  —  —
Anode production  (kt)  318.2  345.6  346.6  (27.4)  (7.9)%
Average anode grade  (%)  99.78  99.77  99.77  0.01  —%
Blister production  kt  —  2.7  1.8  (2.7)  
(100.0)%
Average blister grade  (%)  —  99.24  99.32  
(99.24)  
(100.0)%
Sulfuric acid produced  (kt)  
1,072.6  
1,169.1  
1,119.6  (96.5)  (8.3)%
Key: kt = thousand tons
The off gases from the smelter are treated to recover over 92% of the incoming sulfur received in the
concentrates producing 98.5% sulfuric acid. The gas stream from the smelter with 11.34% SO2 is split
between two plants: The No. 1 acid plant (single absorption/single contact) and the No. 2 plant (double
absorption/double contact). Approximately, 16% of the acid produced is used at our facilities with the
balance sold to third parties. We anticipate that our internal usage will be over 80% when the Tia Maria
project begins operation. The smelter also has two oxygen plants. Plant No. 1, with 272 tons per day of
production capacity, and Plant No.2, with 1,045 tons per day of capacity.
In 2010, the Ilo smelter marine trestle started operation. This facility allows us to offload directly to
offshore ships the sulfuric acid produced, avoiding hauling cargo through the city of Ilo. The 500 meter
long marine trestle is the last part of the Ilo smelter modernization project. Currently all overseas
shipments of sulfuric acid are being made using the marine trestle.
Refinery
The Ilo refinery consists of an electrolytic plant, a precious metal plant and a number of ancillary
installations. The refinery is producing grade A copper cathode of 99.998% purity. The nominal capacity
is 280,000 tons per year. Anodic slimes are recovered from the refining process and then sent to the
precious metals facility to produce refined silver, refined gold and commercial grade selenium.
Anodes are suspended in tanks containing a solution of sulfuric acid and copper sulfate. A low voltage
but high amperage electrical current is passed through the anodes, chemical solution and cathodes in
37order to dissolve copper which is deposited on initially very thin starting sheets increasing its thickness to
produce high grade copper cathodes.
Table of Contents
38During this process, silver, gold and other metals, including palladium, platinum and selenium, along
with other impurities, settle on the bottom of the tank in the form of anodic slime. This anodic slime is
processed in a precious metal plant where silver, gold and selenium are recovered.
The table below sets forth 2019, 2018 and 2017 production and sales information for our Ilo refinery and
precious metals plants:
  Variance 2019 -
 2018
Refinery          2019    2018    2017    Volume    %
Cathodes produced  (kt)  256.7  292.7  291.4  (36.0)  
(12.3)%
Average copper grade  (%)  
99.998  
99.999  
99.999  
(0.001)  —%
Refined silver produced  (000 Kg)  104.0  120.8  123.0  (16.8)  
(13.9)%
Refined gold produced  (kg)  258.1  282.4  237.7  (24.3)  (8.6)%
Commercial grade selenium produced  (tons)  55.7  52.2  49.2  3.5  6.8%
Key: kt = thousand tons
In addition to the processing facilities, the refinery has a production control section, a laboratory which
provides sample analysis throughout the Company, a maintenance department, a desalinization plant and
other support facilities.
Other facilities in Ilo are a coquina plant with a production capacity of 200,000 tons per year of seashells,
which has been declared in progressive closure. In addition, we had a lime plant with a capacity of
80,000 tons per year, which has suspended its operations. We also operate an industrial railroad to haul
production and supplies between Toquepala, Cuajone and Ilo.
The industrial railroad’s main equipment includes locomotives of different types and rolling stock with
different types of cars and capacities. The track runs in a single 214 kilometer standard gauge line and
supports a 30-ton axle load. The total length of the track system is around 257 kilometers including main
yards and sidings. The infrastructure includes 27 kilometers of track under tunnels and one concrete
bridge. The industrial railroad includes a car repair shop which is responsible for maintenance and repair
of the car fleet. Annual tonnage transported is approximately 5.7 million tons.
Table of Contents
39MEXICAN OPERATIONS
Following is a map indicating the approximate locations of our Mexican mines and processing facilities:
MEXICAN OPEN-PIT SEGMENT
Our Mexican open-pit segment operations combine two units of Minera Mexico, La Caridad and
Buenavista, which include La Caridad and Buenavista mine complexes and smelting and refining plants
and support facilities, which service both complexes.
Following is a map indicating the approximate location of, and access to, our Mexican open-pit mine
complexes, as well as our processing facilities:

Table of Contents
40
We have ongoing maintenance and improvement programs to ensure the satisfactory performance of our
equipment. We believe all our Mexican open-pit segment equipment is in good physical condition and
suitable for our operations.
Buenavista
The Buenavista mining unit operates an open-pit copper mine, two concentrators and three SX-EW
plants. It is located 100 air-kilometers northwest of La Caridad and 40 kilometers south of the Arizona,
U.S. - Mexican border, at an altitude of 1,900 meters above sea level. It lies on the outskirts of the city of
Cananea. Buenavista is connected by paved highways to the border city of Agua Prieta to the northeast,
to the town of Nacozari in the southeast and to the town of Imuris to the west. Buenavista is also
connected by railway to Agua Prieta and Nogales. A municipal airport is located approximately 20
kilometers to the northeast of Buenavista.
Table of Contents
41In 2016 we concluded our $3.5 billion investment program in Mexico. The program included a third SX-
EW plant, completed in June 2014, with a rated annual capacity of 120,000 tons of copper and a new
concentrator, completed in 2015, with an annual copper production capacity of 188,000 tons. The
program also included two molybdenum plants with a combined annual capacity of 4,600 tons. The first
plant was completed in 2013 and the second one, in 2016. Additionally, the program included the
Crushing, Conveying and Spreading System for Leachable Ore (Quebalix IV), which was completed on
time and under budget and is currently operating steadily. This project will reduce mining costs as well as
increase SX-EW copper recovery, allowing the Buenavista unit to reach its copper production capacity of
500,000 tons.
The original concentrator currently has a nominal milling capacity of 82,000 tons per day. The second
concentrator began operations in 2015 with a nominal milling capacity of 100,000 tons per day. The SX-
EW facilities have a cathode production capacity of 174,470 tons per year. The Buenavista ore body is
considered one of the world’s largest porphyry copper deposits. Buenavista is the oldest continuously
operated copper mine in North America, with operations dating back to 1899. High grade ore deposits in
the district were mined exclusively using underground methods. The Anaconda Company acquired the
property in 1917. In the early 1940s, Anaconda started developing the first open-pit in Buenavista. In
1990, through a public auction procedure, Minera Mexico acquired 100% of the Buenavista mining
assets for $475 million. Buenavista is currently applying conventional open-pit mining methods to extract
copper ore for further processing in the concentrator.
The following table shows 2019, 2018 and 2017 production information for Buenavista:
2019 - 2018  
Variance  
        2019    2018    2017    Volume    %  
Mine annual operating days      365  365  365      
Mine:                 
Total ore mined  (kt) 70,323   70,464  69,773  (141)  (0.2)%
Copper grade  (%) 0.554   0.537  0.547  0.017  3.2%
Leach material mined  (kt) 141,096  
145,253  
157,802  (4,157)  (2.9)%
Leach material grade  (%) 0.216   0.242  0.261  (0.026)  (10.7)%
Stripping ratio  (x) 0.37   0.38  0.27  (0.01)  (2.6)%
Total material mined  (kt) 288,882  
297,718  
288,716  (8,836)  (3.0)%
Concentrator:              
Total material milled  (kt) 70,371   70,328  69,294  43  0.1%
Copper recovery  (%) 86.66   86.02  84.12  0.64  0.7%
Copper concentrate  (kt) 1,420.5   1,371.1  1,361.8  49.4  3.6%
Copper in concentrate  (kt) 338.0   325.0  319.0  13.0  4.0%
Copper concentrate average grade (%) 23.80   23.70  23.42  0.1  0.4%
SX‑EW plant              
Estimated leach recovery  (%)  62.00  60.00  70.00  2.00  3.3%
SX‑EW cathode production  (kt)  100.1  89.3  111.8  10.8  12.1%
Molybdenum              
Molybdenum grade  (%) 0.013   0.012  0.013  0.001  8.3%
Molybdenum recovery  (%) 65.63   58.44  39.85  7.19  12.3%
Molybdenum concentrate  (kt) 11.80   9.62  6.74  2.18  22.7%
Molybdenum concentrate average
grade  (%) 51.83  51.13  51.38  0.70  1.4%
Molybdenum in concentrate  (kt) 6.12   4.92  3.46  1.20  24.4%
Key: kt = thousand tons
x = Stripping ratio obtained dividing waste by leachable material plus ore mined.
The copper and molybdenum grade are total grade.
Table of Contents
42Geology
The Buenavista mining district lies on the southern cordilleran orogen, which extends from southern
Mexico to northwestern United States. It also falls within the Basin and Range metallogenic province.
Geological and structural features in the district are representative of large, disseminated type, porphyry
copper deposits. A calcareous sedimentary sequence of lower Paleozoic age, lithologically correlated
with a similar section in southeastern Arizona, uncomformably overlies Precambrian granite basement.
The entire section was covered by volcanic rocks of Mesozoic age and later intruded by deep seated
granodiorite batholith of Tertiary age, with further quartz monzonite porphyry differentiates of Laramide
age.
Mineralization in the district is extensive covering a surface area of approximately 30 square kilometers.
An early pegmatitic stage associated with bornite-chalcopyrite-molybdenite assemblage was followed by
a widespread flooding of hydrothermal solutions with quartz-pyrite-chalcopyrite. A pervasive quartz-
sericite alteration is evident throughout the district’s igneous rock fabric.
An extensive and economically important zone of supergene enrichment, with disseminated and
stockworks of chalcocite (Cu2S), developed below the iron oxide capping. This zone coincides with the
topography and has an average thickness of 300 meters. A mixed zone of secondary and primary sulfides
underlay the chalcocite blanket. The hypogene mineralization, principally chalcopyrite (CuFeS2),
extensively underlies the ore body. Molybdenite occurs throughout the deposit and the content tends to
increase with depth.
The Buenavista copper porphyry is considered world-class and unique. The deepest exploration results in
the core of the deposit have confirmed significant increase in copper grades. Similar porphyry copper
deposits usually contain lower grades at depth. The district is also unique for the occurrence of high-
grade breccia pipes, occurring in clusters following the trend of the district.
Current dimensions of the mineralized ore body are 5x3 kilometers, and projects to more than one
kilometer at depth. Considering the geological and economic potential of the Buenavista porphyry copper
deposit, it is expected that the operation can support a sizeable increase in copper production capacity.
Mine Exploration
In-fill core drilling was conducted in 2011 at the Buenavista zinc-copper-silver deposit, including
directional drilling for geotechnical purposes. A deep drilling campaign was initiated in 2011 to explore
the extent of the deposit at depth, drilling a total of 3,860 meters in 2012. For short-term mine planning,
6,652 meters were drilled to confirm copper grade and metallurgical recoveries. Also, in 2011, a
condemnation drilling program was initiated to define areas for future infrastructure, as well as areas
where leach and waste dumps will be deposited. A total of 28,369 meters of core drilling were completed
in 2011. A geohydrology program was initiated in 2011 to explore the possibility of groundwater sources
within the mine limits, and a total of 29,750 meters of diamond drilling were drilled in 2012. In addition,
3,797 meters were drilled for water monitoring wells. We did not have a drilling campaign in 2013. In
2014, we performed a drilling program of 20,000 meters in order to verify the reserves. In 2015, we
complied with our drilling program target of 15,000 meters to define reserves and to confirm copper and
molybdenum grades. In 2018, we drilled 4,434 meters to further define reserves and confirm grades. In
2019, following the long-term mine plan, 5,549 meters of diamond drilling were drilled to confirm the
continuity of the mineralization of the deposit.
Concentrator
Buenavista uses state-of-the-art computer monitoring systems at the concentrators, the crushing plant and
the flotation circuit in order to coordinate inflows and optimize operations. In the original concentrator,
material with a copper grade over 0.38% is loaded onto trucks and sent to the milling circuit, where giant
rotating crushers reduce the size of the ore to approximately one-half of an inch. The ore is then sent to
the ball mills, which grind it to the consistency of fine powder. The finely ground powder is agitated in a
water and reagents solution and is then transported to flotation cells. Air is pumped into the cells
producing a froth, which carries the copper mineral to the surface but not the waste rock, or
Table of Contents
43tailings. Recovered copper, with the consistency of froth, is filtered and dried to produce copper
concentrates with an average copper content of approximately 24%. Concentrates are then shipped by rail
to the smelter at La Caridad.
In the second concentrator, material with a copper grade over 0.555% is sent to a three-phase milling
circuit, where the ore size is reduced to approximately one-half inch. The ore is then sent to a circuit of
six ball mills, which grind it to the consistency of fine powder. The finely ground powder is agitated in a
water and reagents solution and is then transported to flotation cells. Air is pumped into the cells
producing a froth, which carries the copper mineral to the surface but not the waste rock, or tailings.
Recovered copper, with the consistency of froth, is filtered and dried to produce copper concentrates with
an average copper content of approximately 24%. Concentrates are then sent by trucks or by railroad to
the La Caridad smelter or to the Guaymas port, at Sonora, for exporting.
As part of the expansion program for this unit, in 2013 we completed the construction of the first
molybdenum plant with an annual production capacity of 2,000 tons of molybdenum contained in
concentrate. The plant was designed to process 1,500 tons of copper-molybdenum concentrates per day
with a recovery of approximately 80% of copper and 50% of molybdenum content. The molybdenum
plant consists of thickeners, homogenizer tanks, flotation cells, column cells and a holo-flite dryer. The
second molybdenum plant was designed to process 3,040 tons of copper-molybdenum concentrates per
day for a recovery between 80% and 87% of copper and 60% of molybdenum content. It obtained its first
production lot in July 2016 and fully initiated operations in November 2016.
SX-EW Plant
The Buenavista unit operates a leaching facility and three SX-EW plants. All copper ore with a grade
lower than the mill cut-off grade of 0.38%, but higher than 0.25%, is delivered to the leach dumps. A
cycle of leaching and resting occurs for approximately five years in the run-of-mine dumps and
three years for the crushed leach material.
There are three irrigation systems for the dumps and eleven dams for the pregnant leach solution (PLS).
Plant I has four solvent extraction tanks with a nominal capacity of 18,000 liters per minute of PLS and
54 electrowinning cells and has a daily production capacity of 30 tons of copper cathodes with 99.999%
purity. Plant II has five trains of solvent extraction with a nominal capacity of 62,000 liters per minute of
PLS and 220 cells distributed in two bays and has a daily production capacity of 120 tons of copper
cathodes with 99.9% purity. Plant III has three trains of solvent extraction with a nominal capacity of
167,100 liters per minute of PLS and 270 cells distributed in two bays and has a daily production
capacity of 328 tons of copper cathodes with 99.9% purity. The plant produces copper cathodes of LME
grade A.
La Caridad
The La Caridad complex includes an open-pit mine, concentrator, smelter, copper refinery, precious
metals refinery, rod plant, SX-EW plant, lime plant and two sulfuric acid plants.
La Caridad mine and mill are located about 23 kilometers southeast of the town of Nacozari in
northeastern Sonora, at an altitude of 2,000 meters above sea level. Nacozari is about 264 kilometers
northeast of the Sonora state capital of Hermosillo and 121 kilometers south of the U.S.—Mexico border.
Nacozari is connected by paved highway with Hermosillo and Agua Prieta and by rail with the
international port of Guaymas, and the Mexican and United States rail systems. An airstrip with a
reported runway length of 2,500 meters is located 36 kilometers north of Nacozari, less than one
kilometer away from the La Caridad copper smelter and refinery. The smelter and the sulfuric acid plants,
as well as the refineries and rod plant, are located approximately 24 kilometers from the mine. Access is
by paved highway and by railroad.
The concentrator began operations in 1979, the molybdenum plant was added in 1982, the smelter in
1986, the first sulfuric acid plant in 1988, the SX-EW plant in 1995, the second sulfuric acid plant in
1997, the copper refinery in 1997, the rod plant in 1998, the precious metals refinery in 1999 and the dust
and effluents plant in 2012.
Table of Contents
44The table below sets forth 2019, 2018 and 2017 production information for La Caridad:
Variance  
2019 - 2018  
        2019    2018    2017    Volume    %  
Mine annual operating days      365  365  365      
Mine                 
Total ore mined  (kt)  34,401  34,675  34,699  (274)  (0.8)%
Copper grade  (%)  0.356  0.353  0.360  0.003  0.8%
Leach material mined  (kt)  28,457  30,764  36,540  (2,307)  (7.5)%
Leach material grade  (%)  0.224  0.221  0.230  0.003  1.4%
Stripping ratio  (x)  0.50  0.48  0.38  0.02  4.2%
Total material mined  (kt)  94,578  96,541  98,534  (1,963)  (2.0)%
Concentrator              
Total material milled  (kt)  34,648  34,548  34,548  100  0.3
Copper recovery  (%)  86.80  87.09  85.51  (0.29)  (0.3)%
Copper concentrate  (kt)  446.2  446.2  443.3  —  —%
Copper in concentrate  (kt)  107.2  106.1  106.3  1.1  1.0%
Copper concentrate average grade (%)  24.01  23.78  23.98  0.23  1.0%
SX‑EW plant              
Estimated leach recovery  (%)  38.06  37.99  38.16  0.07  0.2%
SX‑EW cathode production  (kt)  25.93  26.41  28.39  (0.48)  (1.8)%
Molybdenum              
Molybdenum grade  (%)  0.036  0.034  0.035  0.002  5.9%
Molybdenum recovery  (%)  82.17  83.28  82.50  (1.11)  (1.3)%
Molybdenum concentrate  (kt)  18.8  18.0  18.3  0.8  4.4%
Molybdenum concentrate average
grade  (%)  54.26  54.61  54.31  (0.4)  (0.6)%
Molybdenum in concentrate  (kt)  10.2  9.8  9.9  0.4  4.1%
Key: kt = thousand tons
x = Stripping ratio obtained dividing waste by leachable material plus ore mined
The copper and molybdenum grade are total grade.
Geology
The La Caridad deposit is a typical porphyry copper and molybdenum deposit as seen also in the
southwestern basin of United States. The La Caridad mine uses a conventional open-pit mining method.
The ore body is at the top of a mountain, which gives La Caridad the advantage of a relative low waste-
stripping ratio, natural pit drainage and relative short haul for both ore and waste. The mining method
involves drilling, blasting, loading and haulage of ore mill and waste to the primary crushers and the
leach materials and waste to dumps, respectively.
La Caridad deposit is located in northeastern Sonora, Mexico. The deposit is situated near the crest of the
Sierra Juriquipa, about 23 kilometers southeast of the town of Nacozari, Sonora, Mexico. The Sierra
Juriquipa rises to elevations of around 2,000 meters in the vicinity of La Caridad and is one of the many
north-trending mountain ranges in Sonora that form a southern extension of the basin and range province.
The La Caridad porphyry copper-molybdenum deposit occurs exclusively in felsic to intermediate
intrusive igneous rocks and associated breccias. Host rocks include diorite and granodiorite. These rocks
are intruded by a quartz monzonite porphyry stock and by numerous breccia masses, which contain
fragments of all the older rock types.
Supergene enrichment consists of complete to partial chalcosite (Cu2S) replacement of
chalcopyrite (CuFeS2). The zone of supergene enrichment occurs as a flat and tabular blanket with an
average diameter of 1,700 meters and thickness generally between 0 and 90 meters.
Economic ore is found as disseminated sulfurs within the central part of the deposit. Sulfide-filled breccia
cavities are most abundant in the intrusive breccia. This breccia-cavity mineralization occurs as sulfide
aggregates which have
Table of Contents
crystallized in the spaces separating breccia clasts. Near the margins of the deposit, mineralization occurs
almost exclusively in veinlets. Ore minerals include chalcopyrite (CuFeS2), chalcosite (Cu2S) and
molybdenite (MoS2).
Mine Exploration
The La Caridad ore body has been mined for over 35 years. The extent of the model area is
approximately 6,000 meters by 4,000 meters with elevation ranging from 750 to 1,800 meters. Seventeen
drilling campaigns have been conducted on the property since 1968. These campaigns drilled a total of
3,349 drill holes: 1,186 were diamond drill holes and 2,163 were reverse circulation. We have also drilled
some hammer and percussion drill holes.
In 2008, La Caridad finished a large exploration program of 50,000 meters. The target was to reach to the
900 level in order to reduce the drilling space and to define the copper and molybdenum mineralization
continuity and also carry out metallurgical testing for the flotation and leaching processes. There was no
exploration program in 2009, 2011 and 2013. In 2012 we drilled 10,000 meters and further defined the
extent of the copper and molybdenum mineralization. From 2014 to 2017 we drilled 96 diamond drill
holes equivalent to 38,984 meters in order to define a high grade ore body located in the south western
edge of the pit (Bella Union location). In 2018 we drilled 18 diamond drill holes equivalent to 5,132
meters at the Bella Union location. In 2019, we drilled 15 diamond drill holes at the La Caridad pit and 6
diamond drill holes at the Bella Union location, totaling 3,790 meters.
Concentrator
La Caridad uses state-of-the-art computer monitoring systems at the concentrator, the crushing plant and
the flotation circuit in order to coordinate inflows and optimize operations. The concentrator has a current
capacity of 94,500 tons of ore per day.
Ore extracted from the mine with a copper grade over 0.30% is sent to the concentrator and is processed
into copper concentrates and molybdenum concentrates. The copper concentrates are sent to the smelter
and the molybdenum concentrate is sold to a Mexican customer. The molybdenum recovery plant has a
capacity of 2,000 tons per day of copper-molybdenum concentrates. The lime plant has a capacity of 340
tons of finished product per day.
SX-EW Plant
Approximately 1,009.2 million tons of leaching ore with an average grade of approximately 0.219%
copper have been extracted from the La Caridad open-pit mine and deposited in leaching dumps from
May 1995 to December 31, 2019. All copper ore with a grade lower than the mill cut-off grade 0.30%,
but higher than 0.15% copper, is delivered to the leaching dumps. In 1995, we completed the construction
of a SX-EW facility at La Caridad that has allowed processing of this ore and certain leach ore reserves
that were not mined and has resulted in a reduction in our copper production costs. The SX-EW facility
has an annual design capacity of 21,900 tons of copper cathodes.
The plant has three trains of solvent extraction with a nominal capacity of 2,400 cubic meters per hour
and 94 electrowinning cells distributed in one single electrolytic bay. The plant has a daily production
capacity of 65 tons of copper cathodes with 99.999% purity.
Processing Facilities—La Caridad
Our La Caridad complex includes a smelter, an electrolytic copper refinery, a precious metal refinery, a
copper rod plant and an effluent and dust treatment plant. The distance between this complex and the La
Caridad mine is approximately 24 kilometers.
Smelter
Copper concentrates from Buenavista, Santa Barbara, Charcas and La Caridad are transported by rail and
truck to the La Caridad smelter where they are processed and cast into copper anodes of 99.2% purity.
Sulfur dioxide off-gases collected from the flash furnace, the El Teniente converter and conventional
converters are processed into sulfuric acid
45
Table of Contents
46at two sulfuric acid plants. Approximately 2% to 3% of this acid is used by our SX-EW plants and the
balance is sold to third parties.
All of the anodes produced in the smelter are sent to the La Caridad copper refinery. The actual installed
capacity of the smelter is 1,000,000 tons per year, a capacity that is sufficient to treat all the concentrates
of La Caridad and almost 40.5% of total production of the OMIMSA I and OMIMSA II concentrators
from Buenavista, and starting in 2010, the concentrates from the IMMSA mines, as we closed the San
Luis Potosi smelter.
Other facilities in the smelter include two sulfuric acid plants with capacities of 2,625 and 2,135 tons per
day, three oxygen plants each with a production capacity of 275 tons per day; and one power turbine
which generates 11.5 MWh.
Refinery
La Caridad includes an electrolytic copper refinery that uses permanent cathode technology. The installed
capacity of the refinery is 300,000 tons per year. The refinery consists of an anode plant with a
preparation area, an electrolytic plant with an electrolytic cell house with 1,115 cells and 32 liberator
cells, two cathode stripping machines, an anode washing machine, a slime treatment plant and a number
of ancillary installations. The refinery is producing grade A (LME) and grade 1 (COMEX) copper
cathode of 99.99% purity. Anodic slimes are recovered from the refining process and sent to the slimes
treatment plant where additional copper is extracted. The slimes are then filtered, dried, packed and
shipped to the La Caridad precious metals refinery to produce silver and gold.
Precious Metals Plant
The operations of the precious metal refinery begin with the reception of anodic slimes, which are dried
in a steam dryer. After this, the dried slime is smelted and a gold and silver alloy is obtained, which is
known as Dore. The precious metal refinery plant has a hydrometallurgical stage and a pyrometallurgical
stage, besides a steam dryer, Dore casting system, Kaldo furnace, 20 electrolytic cells in the silver
refinery, one induction furnace for fine silver, one silver ingot casting system and two reactors for
obtaining fine gold. The process ends with the refining of the gold and silver alloy. We also recover
commercial selenium from the gas produced by the Kaldo furnace process.
Copper Rod Plant
A rod plant at the La Caridad complex began operations in 1998 and reached its full annual operating
capacity of 150,000 tons in 1999. The plant is producing eight millimeter copper rods with a purity of
99.99%.
Effluent and Dust Treatment Plant
In 2012, we started operating a dust and effluent plant with a treatment capacity of 5,000 tons of smelter
dusts per year which will produce 1,500 tons of copper by-products and 2,500 tons of lead sulfates
per year. This plant is designed to reduce dust emissions from La Caridad metallurgical complex.
Table of Contents
47The table below sets forth 2019, 2018 and 2017 production information for the La Caridad processing
facilities:
Variance  
2019 - 2018  
        2019    2018    2017    Volume    %  
Smelter                   
Total copper concentrate smelted  (kt)  
1,011.4  
1,041.7  997.7  (30.3)  
(2.9)%
Anode copper production  (kt)  279.1  287.7  271.8  (8.6)  
(3.0)%
Average copper content in anode  (%)  99.47  99.49  99.41  (0.02)  
(0.0)%
Average smelter recovery  (%)  97.1  96.9  97.4  0.2  0.2%
Sulfuric acid production  (kt)  966.2  
1,002.5  976.4  (36.3)  
(3.6)%
Refinery              
Refined cathode production  (kt)  231.6  239.2  228.1  (7.6)  
(3.2)%
Refined silver production  (000 kg)  250.3  264.3  222.5  (14.0)  
(5.3)%
Refined gold production  (Kg)  
1,125.8  
1,228.5  
1,264.2  
(102.7)  
(8.4)%
Rod Plant              
Copper rod production  (kt)  142.7  147.1  133.1  (4.4)  
(3.0)%
Key: kt = thousand tons
Kg = kilograms
MEXICAN IMMSA UNIT
Our IMMSA unit (underground mining poly-metallic division) operates five underground mining
complexes situated in central and northern Mexico and produces zinc, lead, copper, silver and gold, and
has a coal mine. These complexes include industrial processing facilities for zinc, lead, copper and silver.
All of IMMSA’s mining facilities employ exploitation systems and conventional equipment. We believe
that all the plants and equipment are in satisfactory operating condition. IMMSA’s principal mining
facilities include Charcas, Santa Barbara, San Martin, Santa Eulalia and Taxco.
Table of Contents
The table below sets forth 2019, 2018 and 2017 production information for our Mexican IMMSA unit:
Variance  
2019 - 2018  
        2019    2018    2017    Volume    %  
Average annual operating days(*)   352  353  352
Total material mined and milled  (kt)   3,911  3,277  2,871  634  19.3%
Zinc:              
Average ore grade  (%)   2.24  2.51  2.76  (0.27)  
(10.8)%
Average recovery  (%)   84.46  86.07  86.75  (1.61)  (1.9)%
Concentrate produced  (kt)   146.7  135.3  129.2  11.4  8.4%
Concentrate average grade  (%)   50.40  52.30  53.13  (1.90)  (3.6)%
Zinc in concentrate  (kt)   3.9  70.8  68.7  (66.9)  
(94.5)%
Lead:              
Average ore grade  (%)   0.78  0.91  0.95  (0.13)  
(14.3)%
Average recovery  (%)   74.01  74.32  73.91  (0.31)  (0.4)%
Concentrate produced  (kt)   43.8  39.1  33.6  4.7  12.0%
Concentrate average grade  (%)   51.47  56.51  60.29  (5.04)  (8.9)%
Lead in concentrate  (kt)   22.6  22.1  20.2  0.5  2.3%
Copper:              
Average ore grade  (%)   0.38  0.35  0.35  0.03  8.6
Average recovery  (%)   55.50  54.56  54.65  0.94  1.7%
Concentrate produced  (kt)   33.9  23.5  21.3  10.4  44.3%
Concentrate average grade  (%)   24.40  26.45  25.71  (2.05)  (7.8)%
Copper in concentrate  (kt)   8.3  6.2  5.5  2.1  33.9%
Silver:              
Average ore grade  (ounces)  2.26  2.25  2.19  0.01  0.4%
Average recovery  (%)   78.53  76.59  75.72  1.94  2.5%
Concentrate average grade  (%)   30.9  28.5  25.8  2.4  8.4%
Silver in concentrates  ((000) ounces)  
6,942.5  
5,649.5  
4,759.9  
1,293.0  22.9%
kt = thousand tons
(*)Weighted average annual operating days based on total material mined and milled in the three active
mines: Charcas, Santa Barbara, and Santa Eulalia.
Charcas
The Charcas mining complex is located 111 kilometers north of the city of San Luis Potosi in the State of
San Luis Potosi, Mexico. Charcas is connected to the state capital by a paved highway of 130 kilometers.
It was discovered in 1573 and operations in the 20th century began in 1911. The complex includes three
underground mines (San Bartolo, Rey-Reina and La Aurora) and one flotation plant that produces zinc,
lead and copper concentrates, with significant amounts of silver. The Charcas mine is characterized by
low operating costs and good quality ores and is situated near the zinc refinery. Regarding its geology,
economic ore is found as replacement sulfurs in carbonates host rock. The ore mineralogy is comprised
predominantly of calcopyrite (CuFeS2), sphalerite (ZnS), galena (PbS) and silver minerals as diaphorite
(Pb2Ag3Sb3S8). The Charcas mine is now Mexico’s largest producer of zinc.
In October 2015, an earthquake damaged some underground facilities as well as the access to the mine.
Consequently, normal mine operations were interrupted. In 2016, operations took place normally and a
production compliance of 97% was reached.
Mine exploration in 2015 included 32,144 meters of surface drilling and 20,536 meters from underground
stations, which increased our reserves by 3,089,797 tons. For 2016, it included 20,000 meters of surface
drilling and 20,754 meters from underground stations, which increased our reserves by 1,778,728 tons.
For 2017, it included 5,999 meters of surface drilling and 23,098 meters from underground stations,
which increased our reserves by 2,004,577 tons. For 2018, 11,757 meters of diamond drilling and
20,285 meters from underground stations were drilled, which increased our reserves by 2,282,322 tons.
For 2019, 20,105 meters of diamond drilling and 9,012 meters from
48
Table of Contents
49underground stations were drilled, which increased our reserves by 2,502,204 tons. For 2020, 32,000
meters of diamond drilling are planned to identify additional reserves.
Santa Barbara
The Santa Barbara mining complex is located approximately 26 kilometers southwest of the city of
Hidalgo del Parral in southern Chihuahua, Mexico. The area can be reached via paved road from Hidalgo
del Parral, a city on a federal highway. It was discovered in 1536 and mining activities in the 20th century
began in 1913. Santa Barbara includes three main underground mines (San Diego, Segovedad and
Tecolotes) and a flotation plant and produces lead, copper and zinc concentrates, with significant amounts
of silver.
Regarding its geology, economic ore minerals include sphalerite (ZnS), marmatite (ZnFeS), galena (PbS),
chalcopyrite (CuFeS2) and tetrahedrite (CuFe12Sb4S13). Due to the variable characteristics of the ore
bodies, four types of mining methods are used: shrinkage stoping, long-hole drilled open stoping, cut-
and-fill stoping and horizontal bench stoping. The ore, once crushed, is processed in the flotation plant to
produce concentrates.
Mine exploration in 2015 included 5,977 meters of surface drilling and 16,609 meters from underground
stations, which increased our reserves by 1,135,750 tons. For 2016, it included 14,300 meters from
underground stations, which increased our reserves by 1,416,756 tons. For 2017, it included 2,571 meters
of surface drilling and 11,838 meters from underground stations, which increased our reserves by
613,872 tons. For 2018, 10,769 meters from underground stations were drilled, which increased our
reserves by 418,345 tons. For 2019, we achieved 11,070 meters of surface drilling and 208 meters from
the underground stations, which increased our reserves by 2,160,062 tons. For 2020, 30,380 meters of
diamond drilling are planned to identify additional reserves.
Santa Eulalia
The mining district of Santa Eulalia is located in the central part of the state of Chihuahua, Mexico,
approximately 26 kilometers east of the city of Chihuahua, and is connected to the city of Chihuahua by a
paved road (highway no. 45). It was discovered in 1590 but exploitation began in 1870. The main mines
in Santa Eulalia are The Buena Tierra mine and the San Antonio mine.
Regarding its geology, the mineralization corresponds in its majority to ore skarns: silicoaluminates of
calcium, iron and manganese with variable quantities of lead, zinc, copper and iron sulfides. Economic
ore include sphalerite (ZnS), galena (PbS) and small quantities of pyrargyrite (Ag3SbS3).
Mine exploration in 2015 included 3,014 meters from underground stations, which increased our reserves
by 64,800 tons. For 2017, it included 936 meters from underground stations, which increased our
reserves by 60,525 tons. For 2018, 1,930 meters from underground stations were drilled, which increased
our reserves by 249,930 tons. For 2019, we achieved 2,207 meters of surface drilling and 10,214 meters
from the underground stations, which increased our reserves by 409,733 tons. For 2020, 29,216 meters of
diamond drilling are planned to identify additional reserves.
San Martin
The San Martin mining complex is located in the municipality of Sombrerete in the western part of the
state of Zacatecas, Mexico. It was discovered in 1555 and mining operations in the 20th century began in
1949. The complex includes an underground mine and a flotation plant. The ore body contains lead,
copper and zinc concentrates, with significant amounts of silver.
After eleven years of an illegal stoppage, we resumed control of the San Martin mine in August 2018.
The San Martin facilities deteriorated during this period and we undertook a major renovation in order to
restart operations during the second quarter of 2019, with a capital budget of $97.7 million.
Mine exploration in 2019 included 1,304 meters of surface drilling and 4,315 meters from underground
stations, which increased our reserves by 374,683 tons.
Table of Contents
Taxco
The Taxco mining complex has been on strike since July 2007. It is located on the outskirts of the city of
Taxco in the northern part of the state of Guerrero, Mexico. It was discovered in 1519 and mining
activities in the 20th century began in 1918. The complex includes several underground mines (San
Antonio, Guerrero and Remedios) and a flotation plant. The ore contains lead and zinc concentrates, with
some amounts of gold and silver.
There was no mine exploration drilling at Taxco during the three years ended December 31, 2019
because of the strikes. Please see Note 13 “Commitments and Contingencies—Labor matters” to our
consolidated financial statements.
Processing Facilities—San Luis Potosi
Our San Luis Potosi electrolytic zinc refinery is located in the city of San Luis Potosi, in the state of San
Luis Potosi, Mexico. The city of San Luis Potosi is connected to our refinery by a major highway.
Zinc Refinery
The San Luis Potosi electrolytic zinc refinery was built in 1982 and was designed to produce 105,000
tons of refined zinc per year by treating up to 200,000 tons of zinc concentrate from our own mines,
principally Charcas, which is located 113 kilometers from the refinery. The refinery produces special
high grade zinc (99.995%), high grade zinc (over 99.9%) and zinc-based alloys with aluminum, lead,
copper or magnesium in varying quantities and sizes depending on market demand. Refined silver and
gold production is obtained from tolling services provided by a third party mining company.
The electrolytic zinc refinery has an acid plant, a steam recovery boiler and a roaster. There is also a
calcine processing area with five leaching stages: neutral, hot acid, intermediate acid, acid, purified
fourth and jarosite, as well as two stages for solution purifying.
The table below sets forth 2019, 2018 and 2017 production information for our San Luis Potosi zinc
refinery:
Variance  
2019 - 2018  
        2019    2018    2017    Volume    %  
Total zinc concentrate treated  (kt)  
209.3  
204.0  
202.3  5.3  2.6%
Refined zinc produced  (kt)  
104.9  
107.5  
104.4  (2.6)  (2.4)%
Sulfuric acid produced  (kt)  
187.2  
184.2  
180.6  3.0  1.6%
Refined silver produced  (kt)  16.1  16.8  14.5  (0.7)  (4.2)%
Refined gold produced  (k)  19.2  23.8  17.8  (4.6)  
(19.3)%
Refined cadmium produced  (kt)  0.6  0.6  0.6  —  —%
Average refinery recovery  (%)  93.4  94.4  94.3  (1.0)  (1.1)%
kt = thousand tons
Nueva Rosita Coal and Coke Complex
The Nueva Rosita coal and coke complex began operations in 1924 and is located in the state of
Coahuila, Mexico, on the outskirts of the city of Nueva Rosita near the Texas border. It includes (a) an
underground coal mine, which has been closed since 2006; (b) an open-pit mine with a yearly capacity of
approximately 350,000 tons of coal; (c) a coal washing plant with a capacity of 900,000 tons per year that
produces high quality clean coal; and d) a re-engineered and modernized 21 ovens coke facility capable
of producing 100,000 tons of coke per year (metallurgical, nut and fine) of which, 95,000 tons are
metallurgical coke. The complex also has a by-product plant to clean the coke gas oven in which tar,
ammonium sulfate and light crude oil are recovered and two boilers, which produce 80,000 pounds of
steam that is used in the by-products plant. In September 2017, a decision was made by the Company to
close the coke plant and to initiate the cleaning and remediation process with a current budget of $14.0
million. At December 31, 2019, we expensed $5.4 million.
50
Table of Contents
On February 19, 2020, the Company announced the decision to return the underground coal mine, (the
Olivo concession), which had been closed since 2006, to the Mexican government in response to a
request of the President of Mexico to resume efforts to locate the remains of miners lost in a 2006 mining
accident. On February 20, 2020 the Company presented to the General Direction of Mines the offer of the
return of the concession. It is expected that the authorities will respond to the offer in the next few
months.
Carbon mine exploration
Although, an intensive exploration program of diamond drilling has identified two additional areas,
Esperanza with a potential for more than 30 million tons of “in place” mineralized coal and Guayacan
with a potential for 15 million tons of “in place” mineralized coal, that could be used for a future coal-
fired power plant, in July 2019, the Company decided to suspend coal mining operations.
The table below sets forth 2019, 2018 and 2017 production information for our Nueva Rosita coal and
coke complex:
Variance 2019 - 2018 
        2019    2018    2017    Volume    %  
Coal mined—open‑pit  (kt)  52.7  108.6  132.7  (55.9)  (51.5)%
Average BTU content  BTU/Lb  
10,022  
10,022  
10,022  —  —
Average percent sulfur %   1.38  1.38  1.38  —  —
Clean coal produced  (kt)  25.2  42.8  66.4  (17.6)  (41.1)%
Coke tonnage produced  (kt)  —  —  45.4  —  —
Average realized price—Coal  ($ per ton)  48.4  39.0  29.2  9.4  24.1%
Average realized price—Coke  ($ per ton)  —  265.0  233.0  
(265.0)  
(100.0)%
kt = thousand tons
ORE RESERVES
Ore reserves are those estimated quantities of proven and probable material that may be economically
mined and processed for extraction of their mineral content, at the time of the reserve determination.
“Proven” (measured) reserves are reserves for which (a) quantity is computed from dimensions revealed
in outcrops, trenches, workings or drill holes; (b) grade and/or quality are computed from the results of
detailed samplings; and (c) the sites for inspection, sampling and measurement are spaced so closely and
the geologic character is so well defined that size, shape, depth and mineral content of reserves are well-
established. “Probable” (indicated) reserves are reserves for which quantity and grade and/or quality are
computed from information similar to that used for proven (measured) reserves, but the sites for
inspection, sampling, and measurement are farther apart or are otherwise less adequately spaced. The
degree of assurance, although lower than that for proven (measured) reserves, is high enough to assume
continuity between points of observation. “Mineralized material,” on the other hand, is a mineralized
body that has been delineated by appropriately spaced drilling and/or underground sampling to support
the reported tonnage and average grade of metal(s). Such a deposit does not qualify as a reserve until
legal and economic feasibility are concluded based upon a comprehensive evaluation of unit costs, grade,
recoveries and other material factors.
Our proven and probable ore reserve estimates are based on engineering evaluations of assay values
derived from the sampling of drill holes and other openings. We believe that the samplings taken are
spaced at intervals close enough and the geological characteristics of the deposits are sufficiently well
defined to render the estimates reliable. The ore reserves estimates include assessments of the resource,
mining and metallurgy, as well as economic, marketing, legal, environmental, governmental, social and
other necessary considerations.
Our Peruvian operations, including the Toquepala and Cuajone reserves, are classified into proven
(measured), probable (indicated) and possible (inferred) categories based on a Relative Confidence
Bound Index (“RCB Index”) that measures our level of geologic knowledge and confidence in each
block. The RCB index is a measure of relative confidence in the block grade estimate. This approach
combines the local variability of the composites used to krig a block with the kriging variance and
incorporates the use of confidence intervals in measuring uncertainty of the block estimates relative
51
Table of Contents
52to each other. The final resource classification is then based on the distribution of these RCB values for
blocks above 0.05% copper. It is the distribution that is used to find the breaks between proven/probable
and probable/possible.
Our Mexican operations, including the Buenavista and La Caridad reserves, are calculated using a
mathematical block model and applying the MineSight software system. The estimated grades per block
are classified as proven and probable. These grades are calculated applying a three-dimensional
interpolation procedure and the inverse distance squared. Likewise, the quadrant method or spherical
search is implemented in order to limit the number of composites that will affect the block’s interpolated
value. The composites data is derived from the geological exploration of the ore body. In order to classify
the individual blocks in the model, a thorough geostatistical variogram analysis is conducted, taking into
consideration the principal characteristics of the deposit. Based on this block model classification, and
with the implementation of the Lerch-Grossman algorithm, and the MineSight Pit Optimizer procedure,
mineable reserves are determined. The calculated proven and probable reserves include those blocks that
are economically feasible to mine by open-pit method within a particular mine design.
For the IMMSA unit, the basis for reserve estimations are sampling of mining operations and drilling
exploration, geographical and topographic surveys, tracking down all the foregoing in the corresponding
maps, measurement, calculation and interpretation based on the maps and reports from the mines, the
mills and/or smelters. Mineral reserves are mineral stock which is estimated for extraction, to exploit if
necessary, to sell or utilize economically, all or in part, taking into consideration the quotations, subsidies,
costs, availability of treatment plants and other conditions which we estimate will prevail in the period
for which reserves are being calculated. The reserves are divided into proven (85% reliable or more
according to statistical studies) and probable (70% - 80% reliable or more according to statistical studies)
categories according to their level of reliability and availability. In order to comply with SEC regulations,
proven reserves is a classification that can only be used for such mineral found on top of the last level of
the mine (either mineral up to 15 meters below the last level or below the first 15 meters only with
sufficient drilling (25 or 30 meters between each drill)).
Annually our engineering department reviews in detail the reserve computations. In addition, our
engineering department reviews the computation when changes in assumptions occur. Changes can occur
for price or cost assumptions, results in field drilling or new geotechnical parameters. We also engage
third party consultants to review mine planning procedures.
Pursuant to SEC guidance, the reserves information in this report are calculated using average metals
prices over the most recent three years unless otherwise stated. We refer to these three-year average
metals prices as “current prices.” Our current prices for copper are calculated using prices quoted by
COMEX, and our current prices for molybdenum are calculated according to Platt’s Metals Week. Unless
otherwise stated, reserves estimates in this report use $2.82 per pound for copper and $10.50 per pound
for molybdenum, both current prices as of December 31, 2019. The current prices for copper and
molybdenum were $2.64 and $8.88 as of December 31, 2018 and $2.50 and $7.07 as of December 31,
2017, respectively.
For internal ore reserve estimation, our management uses long-term metal price assumptions for copper
and molybdenum, which are intended to approximate average prices over the long term. At December 31,
2019 and 2018, we considered $2.90 per pound of copper and $7.50 per pound of molybdenum.
The average metal prices over the last 10 and 15 years periods and the continued positive outlook for
these metals have led us to use these prices. For other forecast and planning purposes, particularly related
to merger and acquisition activities, our management considers other price scenarios. These changes,
however, do not affect the preparation of our financial statements.
For the years 2019, 2018 and 2017, we have used reserve estimates based on current average prices as of
the most recent three years then ended to determine amortization of mine development and intangible
assets.
We periodically reevaluate estimates of our ore reserves, which represent our estimate as to the amount of
unmined copper remaining in our existing mine locations that can be produced and sold at a profit. These
estimates are based on
Table of Contents
53engineering evaluations derived from samples of drill holes and other openings, combined with
assumptions about copper market prices and production costs at each of our mines.
The persons responsible for ore reserve calculations are as follows:
Peruvian open-pit:
Cuajone mine - Edgar A. Peña Valenzuela, Mine Engineering Superintendent
Toquepala mine - Wilbert Perez, Mine Engineering Superintendent
Tia Maria project:
Jaime Arana Murriel, Investment Projects Leaching Manager
Mexican open-pit:
La Caridad Mine - Christian Torrecillas Garza, Mine Manager
Buenavista mine - Jesus Molinares, Engineering and Mine Planning Superintendent
IMMSA unit:
Santa Barbara - Raul Guerrero Valdez, Manager
Charcas - Juan J. Aguilar, Planning and Control Superintendent
Santa Eulalia - Jose G. Rovelo Saenz, Manager
Taxco - Jose M. Espinosa, Manager
San Martin - Jorge C. Perez Perez, Planning Manager
El Arco project:
Michelle P. Cerecer A., Planning Engineer (with support of Hexagon Mining Inc.)
El Pilar project:
Michelle P. Cerecer A., Planning Engineer (with support of Hexagon Mining Inc.)
Pilares project:
Michelle P. Cerecer A., Planning Engineer (with support of Hexagon Mining Inc.)
For more information regarding our reserve estimates, please see Item 7 “Management’s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations—Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
—Ore Reserves.”
Table of Contents
54Ore Reserves Estimated at Current Prices:
The table below details our estimated proven and probable copper and molybdenum reserves at
December 31, 2019 based on the last three year average market prices following SEC guidance:
PERUVIAN OPEN ‑PIT MEXICAN OPEN ‑PIT  
    UNIT UNIT     TOTAL     MEXICAN     DEVELOPMENT  
Cuajone     Toquepala     Buenavista     La Caridad OPEN ‑PIT IMMSA PROJECTS  
Mine(1) Mine(1) Mine(1) Mine(1)  MINES  UNIT(2) Tia Maria     El Arco    El Pilar     Pilar es
Mineral Reserves                               
Metal prices:                             
Copper ($/lb.)   2.818  2.818  2.818  2.818  2.818  2.818  2.818  2.818  2.818  2.818
Molybdenum ($/lb.)   10.500  10.500  10.500  10.500  10.500  —  —  10.500  —  —
Cut‑of f grade  0.214 % 0.216 % 0.162 % 0.111% 0.168 %   — 0.102 % 0.193 % 0.15 % 0.143 %
Proven     
Sulfide ore reserves (kt)  962,516 1,971,390 2,836,422 2,173,970 7,944,298  17,730   — 1,382,888  — 12,982
Average grade:     
Copper  0.570 % 0.528 % 0.449 % 0.236 % 0.425 %  0.460 %   — 0.440 %  — 0.771 %
Molybdenum  0.020 % 0.031 % 0.008 % 0.031 % 0.021 %   —  — 0.007 %  —  —
Lead   —  —  —  —  — 1.220 %   —  —  —  —
Zinc   —  —  —  —  — 2.630 %   —  —  —  —
Leachable material (kt)  410 470,518 1,785,003 488,180 2,744,1 11  —  216,215  187,617 287,928 248
Leachable material grade  0.675 % 0.201 % 0.160 % 0.191 % 0.173 %   — 0.326 %  0.332 % 0.296 % 0.241 %
Probable     
Sulfide ore reserves (kt)  728,384 229,088 1,385,595 1,118,226 3,461,293  29,125   — 1,008,719  — 30,784
Average grade:     
Copper  0.402 % 0.329 % 0.397 % 0.214 % 0.334 %  0.570 %   — 0.399 %  — 0.692 %
Molybdenum  0.016 % 0.011% 0.009 % 0.030 % 0.017 %   —  — 0.007 %  —  —
Lead   —  —  —  —  — 0.930 %   —  —  —  —
Zinc   —  —  —  —  — 2.760 %   —  —  —  —
Leachable material (kt)  852 992,087 706,230 172,241 1,871,410   —  525,485  65,283 11,213 927
Leachable material grade  0.879 % 0.134 % 0.14 % 0.182 % 0.141 %   —  0.364 %  0.161 % 0.279 % 0.252 %
Total         
Sulfide ore reserves (kt)  1,690,900 2,200,478 4,222,017 3,292,196 11,405,591  46,855   — 2,391,607  — 43,766
Average grade:     
Copper  0.497 % 0.507 % 0.432 % 0.228 % 0.397 %  0.528 %   — 0.422 %  — 0.715 %
Molybdenum  0.018 % 0.029 % 0.008 % 0.030 % 0.020 %   —  — 0.007 %  —  —
Lead   —  —  —  —  — 1.04 %   —  —  —  —
Zinc   —  —  —  —  — 2.711%   —  —  —  —
Leachable material (kt)  1,262 1,462,604 2,491,233 660,421 4,615,520   —  741,700  252,900 299,141 1,175
Leachable material grade  0.813 % 0.156 % 0.154 % 0.189 % 0.160 %   —  0.353 %  0.288 % 0.295 % 0.25 %
Waste (kt)  4,563,195 7,573,933 5,686,371 2,663,508 20,487,007   —  665,063  2,127,820 563,460 158,135
Total material (kt)  6,255,357 11,237,015 12,399,621 6,616,125 36,508,1 18 46,855  1,406,763  4,772,327 862,601 203,076
Stripping ratio ((W+L)/O)  2.70 4.11 1.94 1.01 2.20   —  — 1.00  — 3.64
Stripping ratio (W/(L+O))  2.70 2.07 0.85 0.67 1.28   —  0.90  0.80 1.88 3.52
Leachable material         
Reserves in stock (kt)  19,129 1,647,534 1,817,333 894,768 4,378,764   —  —  —  —  —
Average copper grade  0.486 % 0.154 % 0.160 % 0.242 % 0.176 %   —  —  —  —  —
In pit reserves:     
Proven (kt)  410 470,518 1,785,003 488,180 2,744,1 11  —  216,215  187,617 287,928 248
Average copper grade  0.675 % 0.201 % 0.160 % 0.191 % 0.173 %   —  216,215 %  0.332 % 0.296 % 0.241 %
Probable (kt)  852 992,087 706,230 172,241 1,871,410   —  525,485  65,283 11,213 927
Average copper grade  0.879 % 0.134 % 0.140 % 0.182 % 0.141 %   —  0.364 %  0.161 % 0.279 % 0.252 %
Total leachable reserves
(kt)  20,391 3,110,138 4,308,566 1,555,189 8,994,284  —  741,700  252,900 299,141 1,175
Average copper grade  0.506 % 0.155 % 0.157 % 0.219 % 0.168 %   —  0.353 %  0.288 % 0.295 % 0.250 %
Copper  contained in or e
reserves in pit(kt)(3)  8,414 13,438 22,076 8,754 52,682  247  2,618  10,821 882 316
kt = Thousand tons
W= Waste, L= Leachable material; O= Ore.
(1)The Cuajone, Toquepala, Buenavista and La Caridad concentrator recoveries calculated for these
reserves were 84.4%, 87.5%, 82.6%, and 81.1%, respectively, obtained by using recovery formulas
according to the different milling capacity and geo-metallurgical zones.
(2)The IMMSA unit includes the Charcas, Santa Barbara, San Martin, Santa Eulalia and Taxco mines.
Zinc and lead contained in ore reserves are as follows:
(in thousand tons)     Proven     Probable     Total
Zinc  466.3  803.9  1,270.2
Lead   216.3  270.9  487.2
(3)Copper contained in ore reserves for open-pit mines is (i) the product of sulfide ore reserves and the
average copper grade proven plus (ii) the product of sulfide ore reserves and the average copper
grade probable plus (iii) the product of in-pit leachable reserves and the average copper grade.
Copper contained in ore reserves for underground mines is the product of sulfide ore reserves and the
average copper grade.
Table of Contents
55Metal Price Sensitivity:
In preparing the sensitivity analysis, we recalculated our reserves based on the assumption that current
average metal prices were 20% higher and 20% lower, respectively, than the actual current average prices
for year-end 2019. Reserve results of this sensitivity analysis are not proportional to the increase or
decrease in metal price assumptions.
INCREASE—20% DECREASE—20%  
    Open‑Pit        Development    Open‑Pit        Development  
Mines IMMSA Projects Mines IMMSA Projects  
Mineral Reserves                   
Metal prices:                   
Copper ($/lb.)  3.381 3.381 3.381 2.254 2.254 2.254
Molybdenum ($/lb.)  12.599  — 12.599 8.400  — 8.400
Cut‑off grade  0.142%  —  0.155%  0.210%  — 0.254%
Proven     
Sulfide ore reserves (kt)  8,813,583 18,473  1,431,577 6,308,381 14,799 1,330,101
Average grade:     
Copper  0.410%  0.450%   0.434%  0.463% 0.480%  0.457%
Molybdenum  0.020%   —  0.007%  0.022%  — 0.008%
Lead   — 1.190%   —  — 1.340%   —
Zinc   — 2.560%   —  — 2.860%   —
Leachable material (kt)  2,343,575  —  719,482 3,226,094  — 635,289
Leachable material grade  0.153%   —  0.311%  0.196%  — 0.323%
Probable     
Sulfide ore reserves (kt)  4,113,052 30,643  1,117,363 2,456,401 24,984  892,403
Average grade:     
Copper  0.318% 0.550%   0.392%  0.381% 0.600%   0.434%
Molybdenum  0.016%  —  0.007%  0.018%  —  0.007%
Lead   — 0.910%   —  — 0.980%%   —
Zinc   — 2.700%   —  — 2.930%%   —
Leachable material (kt)  1,807,496  —  623,202 1,755,017  —  567,935
Leachable material grade  0.126%  —  0.333%  0.159%  —  0.351%
Total     
Sulfide ore reserves (kt)  12,926,635 49,116  2,548,940 8,764,782 39,783  2,222,504
Average grade:     
Copper  0.381% 0.512%   0.416%  0.440% 0.555%   0.448%
Molybdenum  0.019%  —  0.007%  0.021%  —  0.007%
Lead   — 1.015%   —  — 1.114%   —
Zinc   — 2.647%   —  — 2.904%   —
Leachable material (kt)  4,151,071  —  1,342,684 4,981,111  —  1,203,224
Leachable material grade  0.141%  —  0.322%  0.183%  —  0.336%
Waste (kt)  23,350,386  —  3,880,329 17,261,451  —  2,974,573
Total material (kt)  40,428,092 49,116  7,771,953 31,007,344 39,783  6,400,301
Stripping ratio ((W+L)/O)  2.13  —  2.05 2.54  —  1.88
Stripping ratio (W/(L+O))  1.37  —  1.00 1.26  —  0.87
Leachable material     
Reserves in stock (kt)  4,378,764  —  — 4,378,764  —  —
Average copper grade  0.176%   —  — 0.176%  —  —
In pit reserves:     
Proven (kt)  2,343,575  —  719,482 3,226,094  —  635,289
Average copper grade  0.153%   —  0.311%  0.196%  —  0.323%
Probable (kt)  1,807,496  —  623,202 1,755,017  —  567,935
Average copper grade  0.126%   —  0.333%  0.159%  —  0.351%
Total leachable reserves (kt)  8,529,835  —  1,342,684 9,359,875  —  1,203,224
Average copper grade  0.159%   —  0.322%  0.18%  —  0.336%
Copper contained in ore reserves
in pit(kt)(1)  55,108 251  14,933 47,659 221  13,989
(1)Copper contained in ore reserves for open-pit mines is (i) the product of sulfide ore reserves and the
average copper grade proven plus (ii) the product of sulfide ore reserves and the average copper
grade probable plus (iii) the product of in-pit leachable reserves and the average copper grade.
Copper contained in ore reserves for underground mines is the product of sulfide ore reserves and the
average copper grade.
Table of Contents
56Internal Ore Reserves Estimates:
The table below details our proven and probable copper and molybdenum reserves as of December 31,
2019, estimated based on long-term price assumptions of $2.90 for copper and $7.50 for molybdenum.
As discussed on page 52 the presentation of these internal ore reserve estimates are not compliant with
SEC requirements, as the long-term price assumptions differ from the current prices used pursuant to
SEC guidance. These internal ore reserve estimates do not affect the preparation of our financial
statements.
PERUVIAN OPEN ‑PIT MEXICAN OPEN ‑PIT  
    UNIT UNIT     TOTAL     MEXICAN     DEVELOPMENT  
Cuajone     Toquepala     Buenavista     La Caridad OPEN ‑PIT IMMSA PROJECTS  
Mine Mine Mine Mine  MINES  UNIT(1) Tia Maria     El Arco    El Pilar     Pilar es
Mineral Reserves                               
Metal prices:                             
Copper ($/lb.)  2.900 2.900 2.900 2.900 2.900 2.900 2.900 2.900 2.900 2.900
Molybdenum ($/lb.)  7.500 7.500 7.500 7.500 7.500  —  — 7.500  —  —
Cut‑of f grade  0.206 % 0.225 % 0.153 % 0.109 % 0.164 %  — 0.102 % 0.198 % 0.15 % 0.149 %
Proven  
Sulfide ore reserves(kt)  966,129 1,881,063 3,008,074 2,203,193 8,058,459 17,217  — 1,368,279  — 12,982
Average grade:  
Copper  0.569 % 0.538 % 0.437 % 0.235 % 0.421 % 0.470 %  — 0.443 %  — 0.771 %
Molybdenum  0.020 % 0.032 % 0.007 % 0.031 % 0.021 %  —  — 0.007 %  —  —
Lead   —  —  —  —  — 1.250 %  —  —  —  —
Zinc   —  —  —  —  — 2.650 %  —  —  —  —
Leachable material (kt)  506 529,652 1,607,581 488,842 2,626,581  — 217,124 187,617 287,928 248
Leachable material grade  0.603 % 0.213 % 0.152 % 0.191 % 0.172 %  — 0.325 % 0.332 % 0.296 % 0.241 %
Probable  
Sulfide ore reserves(kt)  744,218 188,499 1,455,248 1,152,421 3,540,386 28,379  — 991,261  — 30,784
Average grade:  
Copper  0.398 % 0.343 % 0.388 % 0.215 % 0.331 % 0.59 %  — 0.404 %  — 0.692 %
Molybdenum  0.016 % 0.012 % 0.009 % 0.030 % 0.017 %  —  — 0.007 %  —  —
Lead   —  —  —  —  — 0.96 %  —  —  —  —
Zinc   —  —  —  —  — 2.77 %  —  —  —  —
Leachable material (kt)  1,024 877,194 647,073 175,172 1,700,463  — 528,940 65,283 11,213 927
Leachable material grade  0.767 % 0.153 % 0.135 % 0.181 % 0.149 %  — 0.363 % 0.161 % 0.279 % 0.252 %
Total  
Sulfide ore reserves(kt)  1,710,347 2,069,562 4,463,322 3,355,614 11,598,845 45,596  — 2,359,540  — 43,766
Average grade:  
Copper  0.494 % 0.521 % 0.421 % 0.228 % 0.394 %  0.545 %  — 0.426 %  — 0.715 %
Molybdenum  0.018 % 0.030 % 0.008 % 0.030 % 0.020 %   —  — 0.007 %  —  —
Lead   —  —  —  —  — 1.070 %  —  —  —  —
Zinc   —  —  —  —  — 2.730 %  —  —  —  —
Leachable material (kt)  1,530 1,406,846 2,254,654 664,014 4,327,044  — 746,064 252,900 299,141 1,175
Leachable material grade  0.713 % 0.176 % 0.147 % 0.188 % 0.163 %   — 0.352 % 0.288 % 0.295 % 0.250 %
Waste (kt)  4,543,480 7,520,966 5,888,231 2,763,369 20,716,046  — 672,277 2,159,886 563,460 158,135
Total material (kt)  6,255,357 10,997,374 12,606,207 6,782,997 36,641,935 45,596 1,418,341 4,772,326 862,601 203,076
Stripping ratio
((W+L)/O)  2.66 4.31 1.82 1.02 2.16 —  —1.02 —3.64
Stripping ratio
(W/(L+O))  2.65 2.16 0.88 0.69 1.30 —0.90 0.83 1.88 3.52
Leachable material  
Reserves in stock (kt)  19,129 1,647,534 1,817,333 894,768 4,378,764  —  —  —  —  —
Average copper grade  0.486 % 0.154 % 0.160 % 0.242 % 0.176 %   —  —  —  —  —
In‑pit reserves:  
Proven (kt)  506 529,652 1,607,581 488,842 2,626,581  — 217,124 187,617 287,928 248
Average copper grade  0.603 % 0.213 % 0.152 % 0.191 % 0.172 %  — 0.325 % 0.332 % 0.296 % 0.241 %
Probable(kt)  1,024 877,194 647,073 175,172 1,700,463  — 528,940 65,283 11,213 927
Average copper grade  0.767 % 0.153 % 0.135 % 0.181 % 0.149 %  — 0.363 % 0.161 % 0.279 % 0.252 %
Total leachable reserves  20,659 3,054,380 4,071,987 1,558,782 8,705,808  — 746,064 252,900 299,141 1,175
Average copper grade  0.503 % 0.164 % 0.153 % 0.219 % 0.169 %  — 0.352 % 0.288 % 0.295 % 0.250 %
Copper  contained in or e
reserves (kt)(2)  8,460 13,258 22,105 8,899 52,722 248 2,626 10,780 882 316
(kt) = Thousand tons
W= Waste, L= Leachable material; O= Ore.
(1)The IMMSA unit includes the Charcas, Santa Barbara, San Martin, Santa Eulalia and Taxco mines.
Zinc and lead contained in ore reserves are as follows:
(in thousand tons)     Proven    Probable    Total
Zinc   456.3  786.2  1,242.5
Lead   215.2  272.4  487.6
Copper contained in ore reserves for open-pit mines is (i) the product of sulfide ore reserves and the
average copper grade plus (ii) the product of in-pit leachable reserves and the average grade of copper.
Copper contained in ore reserves for underground mines is the product of sulfide ore reserves and the
average copper grade.
Table of Contents
57OVERVIEW OF BLOCK MODEL RECONCILIATION PROCESS
We apply the following block model to mill reconciliation procedure.
The following stages are identified at the Cuajone, Toquepala, Buenavista and La Caridad mines:
1. The mine geologists gather the necessary monthly statistical data from our information
system (“SRP”), which provides ore tons milled and ore grades in the concentrator.
2. Mined areas are topographically determined and related boundaries are built.
3. Using the “interactive planner” option in our mining software (MineSight), ore tons
and grades are calculated inside mined areas over the block model. At this point the
current cut-off grade is considered.
4. In the final stage, accumulated tons mined, weighted average grade for ore material and
leach is compared to data coming from our SRP system.
Tonnage and grade reconciliation for 2019 are as follows:
Long Range Model Mill Variance
    Tons         Tons         Tons     
Mine (thousands)% Copper(thousands)% Copper(thousands)% Copper
Cuajone  29,141 0.628 29,017 0.644  124  (0.016)
Toquepala  40,239 0.642 38,248 0.682  1,991  (0.040)
Buenavista  69,903 0.558 70,323 0.554  (420)  0.004
La Caridad  33,860 0.350 34,401 0.356  (541)  (0.006)
If the estimation error appears greater than 3%, a detailed evaluation is done to review the differences,
which normally could result in more in-fill drilling, in order to better understand the geological
characteristics (grade, rock type, mineralization and alteration) and the spacing of drill holes which are
considered in the ore body zone.
AVERAGE DRILL-HOLE SPACING
The following is the average drill-hole spacing for proven and probable sulfide reserves as of
December 31, 2019:
    Proven     Probable
(average spacing
in meters)
Cuajone  74.06 113.14
Toquepala  75.31 111.29
Buenavista  53.28 105.73
La Caridad  46.52 104.71
EXPLORATION ACTIVITIES
We are engaged in ongoing extensive exploration to locate additional ore bodies in Peru, Mexico,
Argentina, Ecuador and Chile. We also conduct exploration in the areas of our current mining operations.
We invested $30.0 million in exploration programs in 2019, $29.6 million in 2018 and $28.8 million in
2017 and we expect to spend approximately $43.7 million in exploration programs in 2020.
Currently, we have direct control of 71,152 hectares and 147,974 hectares of exploration concessions in
Peru and in Mexico, respectively. We also currently hold 49,877 hectares, 52,403 hectares and 7,299
hectares of exploration concessions in Argentina, Chile and Ecuador, respectively.
Table of Contents
Peru
Los Chancas. This property, located in the department of Apurimac in southern Peru, is a copper and
molybdenum porphyry deposit. Current estimates indicate the presence of 545 million tons of
mineralized material with a copper content of 0.59%, molybdenum content of 0.04% and 0.039 grams of
gold per ton and 181 million tons of mineralized leachable material with a total copper content of
0.357%. In 2018 and 2019, we developed social and environmental improvements for the local
communities. For 2020, we plan to continue with these activities and to conclude the environmental
impact assessment of the project.
Michiquillay. This property, located in the district of La Encañada, in the province and department of
Cajamarca in northern Peru, is a copper porphyry deposit. In February 2018, we won the public bidding
process for the project, and in June 2018 we signed the acquisition contract with the Peruvian
government. In 2019, we developed social and environmental programs for the local communities and
began a semi-detailed environmental impact assessment. This will allow us to begin a 40,000-meter
diamond drilling program in 2020, to verify and update the estimated mineralized materials of the
project.
Other Peruvian Prospects. During 2019, we conducted a 13,000-meter diamond drilling program in the
southern coast of Peru, during which we explored various geochemical and geophysical anomalies. The
results obtained indicate a copper-iron system with disseminated mineralization of iron and low copper
contents.
For 2020, we plan to conduct a diamond drilling program of 15,000 meters at various prospects, which
have evidence of copper porphyry deposits, located mainly in the southern coast of Peru. Additionally,
we will continue with several prospection programs at other Peruvian metallogenic zones.
Mexico
In addition to exploration and drilling programs at existing mines, we are currently conducting
exploration to locate mineral deposits at various other sites in Mexico. The following are some of the
more significant exploration projects:
Buenavista-Zinc. The Buenavista-Zinc site is located in the state of Sonora, Mexico and is part of the
northwest Buenavista ore body. It is a skarn deposit containing zinc, copper, silver and lead sulfide
mineralization. The deposit contains approximately 102.6 million tons of mineralized material,
containing 1.88% of zinc, 0.47% of copper and 17 grams of silver per ton. In 2016, we reviewed the
geological model of the deposit and the lithological description of prior drill holes, which were analyzed
using infrared spectrometry. The results were included in the reserves database. Currently, we have
concluded the conceptual design of the flotation plant. Additionally, the mining plan and economic
studies have been prepared by external companies. In 2020, we plan to continue to explore with a drilling
program of 10,000 meters.
The Chalchihuites. This is a skarn type deposit located in the state of Zacatecas, close to the San Martin
mining unit. Drilling programs conducted between 1980 and 2014 identified 12.6 million of mineralized
material with an average silver content of 110 grams per ton, 2.66% of zinc, 0.37% of lead and 0.67% of
copper. Current results indicate that mineralization consists of a complex mixture of oxides and sulfides
of silver, lead and zinc that requires additional metallurgical research. In 2017, we started a new drilling
program of 21,000 meters in order to continue the metallurgical research and testing. In 2018, this
exploration program of 48 drill holes was completed. This program has been carried out in compliance
with QA/QC protocol that includes testing of specific density of the different rocks and mineralized types
and geochemistry sampling. In addition, 5,000 meters of core sample from the drilling program were
analyzed with a hyperspectral scanner, and a study of 498 kilometers of hyperspectral imaging was
conducted in order to recognize the geology of the entire Chalchihuites mineral district. In 2019, with the
complete data from the diamond drilling program, we made a geological model of the Cronos deposit
using the Leapfrog software. Currently, the sample design for a metallurgical test is in progress. We
expect to conduct this test in 2020.
Bella Union (La Caridad). This prospect is a mineralized copper and molybdenum breccia deposit; the
site is located at less than one kilometer from the border of La Caridad pit. In 2016 and 2017, we
conducted a 28,217 meter drilling program to define the geometry of the deposit. The results identified
36.2 million tons of mineralized material with an
58
Table of Contents
59average of 0.44% copper content and 0.05% of molybdenum. In May 2018, the drilling in this project
was completed, totaling 46,400 meters distributed in 113 drill holes. The test results were received in
June 2018. Currently, exploration at Bella Union has been completed and the planning department is
working on the integration of its reserves in the La Caridad mining plan.
Campo Medio (Santa Eulalia). This prospect is located close to the west border of the Santa Eulalia
mine. Preliminary geological surveying in the zone indicates the possible presence of replacement ore
bodies in limestone, similar to ore bodies currently being mined at Santa Eulalia. During 2016, we
completed a geochemical and geological survey of 800 hectares between the two currently operating
mines and from which we obtained in the past more than 25 million metric tons of ore. The results
obtained indicate the presence of potential mineralization in five different zones. In 2017, 1,000
geochemical samples were taken to define in more detail the five zones highlighted by the geological
survey. In 2018, the surveying of 800 hectares using an electrical geophysical method was completed.
With the results obtained from this study, a drilling program of 10,000 meters was conducted in 2019 to
test the geophysical anomalies. Nine targets were investigated, and we obtained positive results from the
Bustillos target. Results indicate that its mineralization consists of sulfides with 2.85 meters of width, 219
grams of silver, 6.60% of lead and 7.55% of zinc. More exploration efforts are needed in its periphery. In
2020, we plan to conduct a drilling program of 20,000 meters, distributed in Campo Medio and in the
level 8 of Mina San Antonio and Rampa Buena Tierra.
Chile
El Salado (Montonero). A copper-gold prospect located in the Atacama region, northern Chile is being
explored for copper and molybdenum porphyry since 2014. In 2016, we conducted a diamond drilling
program of 12,169 meters in order to define mineral classification. In 2017, we drilled a total of 9,939
meters and finished the conceptual study, which is currently under evaluation.
Other Chilean Prospects. In 2019, we concluded exploration work at the Baquedano prospect, located in
the Antofagasta region. We drilled 3,615 meters and the results were not satisfactory. In addition, we
drilled 2,613 meters in the Alta Tension prospect, and did not obtain positive mineralization results. We
also drilled 2,003 meters in the Transito prospect, and obtained evidence of anomalous copper
mineralization of up to 0.3%, which did not meet our objectives. For 2020, we plan to conduct a diamond
drilling program of 12,000 meters at three prospects located in the copper-gold strip of the Antofagasta
region in the north of Chile.
Ecuador
Chaucha. The Ruta del Cobre (“Copper Road”) project is located west of Cuenca city and south of
Guayaquil. The mineralization is characteristic of a copper-molybdenum porphyry system which is being
explored since 2014. Through 2019, the exploration phase has concluded with a total of 79,900 meters
drilled. In October 2019, we began the infill drilling program, which aims to reclassify the existing
mineralized materials of the project. For 2020, we plan to continue with the development of social and
environmental activities and conduct an infill drilling program of 55,000 meters in order to begin the
feasibility study of the Copper Road project in the last quarter of 2020.
Table of Contents
60Argentina
In 2011, we started exploration activities in Argentina. In 2015, we performed geological exploration in
the Salta, Rio Negro and Neuquen provinces where we expected to locate copper porphyry with precious
metals epithermal systems. In 2017, we performed prospection and geological evaluation work in the
provinces of San Juan and Rio Negro. In 2019, we conducted a diamond drilling program of 2,530 meters
in order to continue with the exploration of the silver-gold epithermal systems, denominated the Caldera
project, located in the Rio Negro province. For 2020, we expect to conduct geological mapping work in
order to develop a diamond drilling program for these areas.
In addition, in 2019 we conducted a diamond drilling program of 4,944 meters at the “Canadon del
Moro” project, also located in the Rio Negro province, and obtained results of mineralized material with
an estimated 9.46 ounces of silver per metric ton. For 2020, we plan to drill an additional 2,000 meters in
order to continue exploring the deposit.
We also plan to conduct exploration programs at the Esperanza and La Hoyada prospects, located in the
Rio Negro and Catamarca provinces, respectively. In 2020, we plan to drill 1,500 meters at Esperanza
and 5,000 meters at La Hoyada prospects.
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
Reference is made to the information under the caption “Litigation Matters” in the consolidated financial
statement Note 13 “Commitments and contingencies.”
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURE
Not applicable.
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER
MATTERS AND ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
SCC COMMON STOCK:
SCC’s common stock is traded on the New York Stock Exchange (“NYSE”) and the Lima Stock
Exchange (“BVL”). SCC’s common stock symbol is SCCO on both the NYSE and the BVL. At
December 31, 2019, there were 935 holders of record of our common stock.
DIVIDEND AND STOCK MARKET PRICES:
The table below sets forth the cash dividends paid per share of capital stock and the high and low stock
prices on both the NYSE and the BVL for the periods indicated.
For the year 2019
    Dividend    NYSE:     BVL:
Quarters per Share High Low High Low
1st $ 0.40$ 
39.68$ 
29.21$ 
39.77$ 
29.20
2nd $ 0.40$ 
41.84$ 
33.27$ 
41.85$ 
33.14
3rd $ 0.40$ 
38.49$ 
29.53$ 
38.10$ 
29.75
4th $ 0.40$ 
43.19$ 
32.35$ 
43.00$ 
32.50
Year $ 1.60$ 
43.19$ 
29.21$ 
43.00$ 
29.20
For the year 2018
    Dividend    NYSE:     BVL:
Quarters per Share High Low High Low
1st $ 0.30$ 
55.85$ 
45.47$ 
55.10$ 
45.63
2nd $ 0.30$ 
57.34$ 
45.90$ 
57.37$ 
45.85
3rd $ 0.40$ 
49.36$ 
39.80$ 
49.55$ 
39.70
4th $ 0.40$ 
43.75$ 
29.78$ 
43.76$ 
29.50
Year $ 1.40$ 
57.34$ 
29.78$ 
57.37$ 
29.50
For a description of limitations on our ability to make dividend distributions, see “Management’s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations—“Liquidity and Capital
Resources” and Note 11 “Financing” to our consolidated financial statements.
DIRECTORS’ STOCK AWARD PLAN
The following table sets forth certain information related to our shares held as treasury stock for the
Directors’ stock award plan at December 31, 2019:
Equity Compensation Plan Information
    Number of securities to be    Weighted-average    Number of securities
issued upon exercise of exercise price of remaining available
Plan Category outstanding options outstanding optionsfor future issuance
Directors’ stock award plan  N/A  N/A   222,800
For additional information see Note 14—“Stockholders Equity—Directors’ Stock Award Plan.”
61
Table of Contents
62SCC COMMON STOCK REPURCHASE PLAN:
In 2008, our BOD authorized a $500 million share repurchase program that has since been increased by
the BOD and is currently authorized to $3 billion. Pursuant to this program, the Company purchased
common stock as shown in the table below. These shares are available for general corporate purposes.
The Company may purchase additional shares of its common stock from time to time, based on market
conditions and other factors. This repurchase program has no expiration date and may be modified or
discontinued at any time.
Period
                Total     Maximum     
Number of Number of
Shares Shares that
Total Purchased May Yet Be
Number of Average as Part of Purchased
Shares Price Paid Publicly Under the Total Cost
From To Purchased per ShareAnnounced PlanPlan @ $42.48(1)($ in millions)
2008  2012  46,914,486$ 18.72  46,914,486     878.1
2013:      10,245,000  27.47  57,159,486     281.4
2014:      22,711,428  30.06  79,870,914     682.8
2015:      36,689,052  27.38  116,559,966     1,004.4
2016:      2,937,801  24.42  119,497,767     71.7
Total purchased      
119,497,767$ 24.42     1,921,689$ 2,918.4
(1)NYSE closing price of SCC common shares at December 31, 2019.
There has not been any activity in the SCC share repurchase program since the third quarter of 2016. The
NYSE closing price of SCC common shares at December 31, 2019 was $42.48 and the maximum
number of shares that the Company could purchase at that price is 1.9 million shares.
As a result of the repurchase of shares of SCC’s common stock, Grupo Mexico’s direct and indirect
ownership was 88.9% as of December 31, 2019 and 2018.
SHAREHOLDER RETURN PERFORMANCE PRESENTATION
Set forth below is a line graph comparing the yearly change in the cumulative total returns on the
Company’s common stock against cumulative total return on the S&P 500 Stock Index and the S&P
Metals and Mining Select Industry Index, for the five year period ending December 31, 2019. The chart
below analyzes the total return on SCC’s common stock for the period commencing December 31, 2014
and ending December 31, 2019, compared to the total return of the S&P 500 and the S&P Metals and
Mining Select Industry Index for the same five-year period.
Table of Contents
63Comparison of Five Year Cumulative Total Return *
SCC Stock, S&P 500 Index and S&P Metals and Mining Select Industry Index **
*Total return assumes reinvestment of dividends
**The comparison assumes $100 invested on December 31, 2014
Total Return per Year  
    2015    2016    2017    2018    2019 
SCC   (6.3)%   23.1%   
50.8%   
(33.0)%   
44.6%
S&P 500   (0.7)%   9.5%   
19.4%   (6.2)%   
28.9%
S&P M + MS   
(51.5)%   
102.4%   
19.4%   
(27.0)%   
13.0%
The foregoing Performance Graph and related information shall not be deemed “soliciting material” or
“filed” with the SEC or subject to Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, nor
shall such information be incorporated by reference into any future filing under the Securities Act of
1933 or Securities Exchange Act of 1934, each as amended, except to the extent that the Company
specifically incorporates it by reference into such filing.

Table of Contents
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
FIVE-YEAR SELECTED FINANCIAL AND STATISTICAL DATA
The selected historical financial data presented below as of and for the five years ended December 31,
2019, includes certain information that has been derived from our consolidated financial statements. The
selected financial data should be read in conjunction with Item 7, “Management’s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” and the consolidated financial statements and
notes thereto. The financial data is presented in millions, except per share and capital stock amounts and
financial ratios.
Year Ended December 31, 
Statement of Earnings Data     2019     2018     2017     2016     2015
Net sales(1) $ 
7,285.6$ 
7,096.7$ 
6,654.5$ 
5,379.8$ 
5,045.9
Operating income   
2,753.0  
2,881.2  
2,618.9  
1,564.2  
1,414.4
Net income   
1,491.9  
1,548.2  732.4  778.8  741.1
Net income attributable to:              
Non-controlling interest   6.1  5.2  3.9  2.3  4.7
Southern Copper Corporation $ 
1,485.8$ 
1,543.0$ 728.5$ 776.5$ 736.4
Per share amounts:              
Earnings basic and diluted $ 1.92$ 2.00$ 0.94$ 1.00$ 0.93
Dividends paid $ 1.60$ 1.40$ 0.59$ 0.18$ 0.34
As of December 31, 
Balance Sheet Data     2019     2018     2017     2016     2015
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,925.1$ 844.6$ 1,004.8$ 546.0$ 274.5
Total assets(2)   
16,407.4  
14,267.8  
13,780.1  
13,234.3  
12,593.2
Total long-term debt, including current
portion(2)   6,541.0  5,960.1  5,957.1  5,954.2  5,951.5
Total liabilities(2)   9,549.2  7,655.0  7,630.7  7,363.4  7,294.0
Total equity $ 6,858.2$ 6,612.8$ 6,149.4$ 5,870.9$ 5,299.2
Year Ended December 31, 
Statement of Cash Flows Data     2019     2018     2017     2016     2015
Net income $ 1,491.9$ 1,548.2$ 732.4$ 778.8$ 741.1
Depreciation, amortization and depletion   764.4  674.3  671.1  647.1  510.7
Cash provided by operating activities   1,911.9  2,235.1  1,976.6  923.1  879.8
Capital investments(3)   (707.5)  
(1,121.4)  
(1,023.5)  
(1,118.5)  
(1,149.6)
Debt repaid   —   —   —   —   (266.0)
Debt incurred   987.3  —   —   —   2,045.8
Dividends paid to common stockholders   
(1,236.9)  
(1,082.3)  (456.1)  (139.3)  (271.2)
SCC common shares buyback   —   —   —   (71.7)  
(1,004.4)
Increase (decrease) in cash and cash
equivalents $ 1,080.5$ (160.2)$ 458.8$ 271.5$ (89.5)
Year Ended December 31, 
Capital Stock     2019     2018     2017     2016     2015
Common shares outstanding—basic and
diluted (in thousands)   
773,059  
773,044  
773,028  
773,016  
775,942
NYSE Price—high $ 43.19$ 57.34$ 47.63$ 34.98$ 33.14
NYSE Price—low $ 23.21$ 29.78$ 32.38$ 22.29$ 24.40
Book value per share   8.82  8.50  7.90  7.54  6.78
P/E ratio(4)   22.10  15.42  50.35  31.82  28.19
64
Table of Contents
65Year Ended December 31,  
Financial Ratios     2019    2018    2017    2016    2015 
Gross margin(5)   
40.0%   42.5%   41.0%   31.6%   31.9%
Operating income margin(6)   
37.8%   40.6%   39.4%   29.1%   28.0%
Net margin(7)   
20.4%   21.7%   10.9%   14.4%   14.6%
Current assets to current liabilities   
2.83  2.61  2.71  2.57  2.70
Net debt/Net capitalization(8)   
41.8%   42.6%   44.4%   47.7%   48.9%
Total debt/Total capitalization(9)   
50.3%   47.4%   49.2%   50.4%   52.9%
(1)Please see copper and metal prices for the last 10 years on Item 1 “Business—Metal Prices” and
sales volumes for the last three years on Item 7 “Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations—Segments Results Analysis.”
(2)In the second quarter of 2015, the Company adopted ASU 2015-03 whereby debt issuance costs are
presented net of the related debt. This adoption was applied on a retrospective basis. In January
2019, the Company adopted ASC 842, recognizing right-of-use assets and the corresponding
operating lease liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet. The Company elected the transition
approach.
(3)Please see Item 7 “Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations—Capital Investment Programs.”
(4)Represents closing Price divided by Earnings per share.
(5)Represents net sales less cost of sales (including depreciation, amortization and depletion), divided
by net sales, as a percentage.
(6)Represents operating income divided by net sales, as a percentage.
(7)Represents net income divided by net sales, as a percentage.
(8)Net debt, which is a Non-GAAP measure, is defined as total debt minus cash, cash equivalents and
short-term investments balance. Please see Item 7 “Management Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations—Financing Section”. During 2015, management
decided to include short-term investments as a reduction to debt to arrive at net debt given that the
Company can liquidate these investments at any time as needed. This change was applied on a
retrospective basis for all years presented herein.
Net capitalization is defined as Net debt plus Equity.
Net debt/Net capitalization: represents net debt divided by net debt plus equity. Net debt to net
capitalization is a Non-GAAP measure. This non-GAAP information should not be considered in
isolation or as substitute for measures of performance determined in accordance with GAAP. A
reconciliation of our net debt to net capitalization ratio to total debt and capitalization as presented in
the consolidated balance sheet is presented under the subheading “Non-GAAP information
reconciliation” in Item 7 “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations.”
(9)Total capitalization is defined as Total debt plus Equity.
Total debt/Total capitalization: represents total debt divided by total debt plus equity.
Table of Contents
66ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
This Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations relates to
and should be read together with our Audited Consolidated Financial Statements as of and for each of
the years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2019. Therefore, unless otherwise noted, the
discussion below of our financial condition and results of operations is for Southern Copper Corporation
and its subsidiaries (collectively, “SCC,” “Southern Copper,” “the Company,” “our,” and “we”) on a
consolidated basis for all periods. Our financial results may not be indicative of our future results.
This discussion contains forward-looking statements that are based on management’s current
expectations, estimates and projections about our business and operations. Our actual results may differ
materially from those currently anticipated and expressed in the forward-looking statements as a result of
a number of factors. See Item 1 “Business—Cautionary Statement.”
EXECUTIVE OVERVIEW
Business:  Our business is primarily the production and sale of copper. In the process of producing 
copper, a number of valuable metallurgical by-products are recovered, which we also produce and sell. 
Market forces outside of our control largely determine the sale prices for our products. Our management, 
therefore, focuses on value creation through copper production, cost control, production enhancement 
and maintaining a prudent capital structure to remain profitable. We endeavor to achieve these goals 
through capital spending programs, exploration efforts and cost reduction programs. Our aim is to remain 
profitable during periods of low copper prices and to maximize financial performance in periods of high 
copper prices.
We are one of the world’s largest copper mining companies in terms of production and sales with our
principal operations in Peru and Mexico. We also have an active ongoing exploration program in Chile,
Argentina and Ecuador. In addition to copper, we produce significant amounts of other metals, either as a
by-product of the copper process or in a number of dedicated mining facilities in Mexico.
Net sales in 2019 were $7.3 billion, the highest amount in Southern Copper history.
In 2019, we invested $707.5 million in capital programs, along with $30.0 million in our exploration
efforts. We believe this commitment to growth will continue to benefit our Company, our investors, our
neighboring communities, and the countries in which we operate.
We believe we hold the world’s largest copper reserve position. At December 31, 2019, our copper ore
reserves, calculated at a copper price of $2.90 per pound, totaled 67.6 million tons of contained copper, at
the following locations:
Copper contained in ore reserves     Thousand tons
Mexican open‑pit   31,004
Peruvian operations   21,718
IMMSA   248
Development projects   14,604
Total   67,574
Outlook:  Various key factors affect our outcome. These include, but are not limited to, the following:
●Changes in copper, molybdenum, silver and zinc prices:  In 2019, the average LME and COMEX per 
pound copper prices were $2.72, approximately 8.1% and 7.2% lower than 2018, respectively. In 
2019, per pound LME spot copper prices ranged from $2.51 to $2.98. The average silver price 
increased by 3.3% in 2019 compared to 2018. Average molybdenum and zinc prices decreased in 
2019 by 5.0% and 12.8%, respectively, compared to 2018. 
Table of Contents
67●Sales structure:  In the last three years, approximately 81.0% of our revenues came from the sale of 
copper, 6.7% from molybdenum, 4.4% from zinc, 4.3% from silver and 3.6% from various other 
products, including gold, sulfuric acid and other materials.
●Copper: During the last quarter of 2019, the LME copper price decreased, from an average of $2.80
per pound in the fourth quarter of 2018 to $2.67(-4.6%). As of today, we are seeing prices in the
range of $2.55-$2.60 per pound as a reflection of the worldwide concern regarding the effect of
COVID-19 disease, also known as Coronavirus. The world is now starting to feel the financial and
economic impacts from the outbreak but at this point, it is difficult to assess the full effect of this
event on copper demand. However, we hope that the outbreak, if timely contained, would have a
milder impact on the global economy ending in a V shape recovery for copper demand.
For supply, we maintain our view of it growing at 2.0% to 2.5% for this year, contingent of not being
affected significantly by the disease. Consequently, we expect a mild copper market surplus for this
year.
●Molybdenum:  It represented approximately 7.6% of our sales in 2019. Molybdenum prices averaged 
$11.27 per pound in 2019, compared to $11.86 in 2018, a 4.9% decrease.
Molybdenum is mainly used for the production of special alloys of stainless steel that require
significant hardness, corrosion and heat resistance. A new use for this metal is in lubricants and
sulfur filtering of heavy oils and shale gas production.
●Zinc:  It has very good long term fundamentals due to its significant industrial consumption and the 
expected production. Zinc represented 3.8% of our sales in 2019.
●Silver:  We believe that silver prices will have support due to its industrial uses as well as being 
perceived as a value shelter in times of economic uncertainty. Silver represented 4.5% of our sales in 
2019.
●Production:  In the second quarter of 2019, we reached full production at the new Toquepala 
concentrator which produced 101,738 tons of copper in 2019. For 2020, we expect to produce 
998,400 tons of copper, in line with the 993,822 tons we produced in 2019.
We also expect to produce 23.7 million ounces of silver, about 16% higher than the 2019 production of
20.3 million ounces mainly resulting from the important contribution of the San Martin and Santa
Barbara operations of IMMSA. In 2020, we expect to produce 80,600 tons of zinc from our mines, up 9%
from 2019 production of 73,922 tons, as result of the recovery of production at the San Martin mine.
Additionally, we expect to produce 26,700 tons of molybdenum, in line with 2019 production of 26,885
tons.
●Cost:  Our operating costs and expenses for the three years ended December 31, 2019 have increased 
in total in each of the years. Our comparison of costs for the three year period is as follows:
            Variance  
2019     2018     2017     Value    %
Operating costs and expenses
(in millions) $ 
4,532.6$ 
4,215.5$ 
4,035.6$ 
317.1 
7.5%
Operating costs and expenses in 2019 increased $317.1 million, compared to 2018, mainly due to higher
cost of sales in all our operating segments, as well as higher depreciation, amortization and depletion at
our Peruvian operations due to the completion of the Toquepala expansion project.
Operating costs and expenses in 2018 increased $179.9 million, compared to 2017, mainly due to higher
cost of sales in all our operating segments, as well as higher depreciation, amortization and depletion at
our Mexican operations. This was partially offset by lower depreciation, amortization and depletion at
our Peruvian operations, lower exploration expenses and a $10.2 million credit related to a previously
accrued environmental remediation cost at our Mexican operations which was reversed in the first quarter
of 2017.
Table of Contents
68●Capital investments:  Capital investments were $707.5 million for 2019. This is 36.9% lower than in 
2018, and represented 47.0% of net income. Our growth program to develop the full production 
potential of our Company is underway. We are currently developing a new organic growth plan to 
increase our copper volume production to 1.5 million tons by 2028 with the development of new 
projects.
For 2020, the Board of Directors approved a capital investment program of $1,146.7 million.
KEY MATTERS
We discuss below several matters that we believe are important to understand our results of operations
and financial condition. These matters include (i) earnings, (ii) production, (iii) “operating cash costs” as
a measure of our performance, (iv) metal prices, (v) business segments, (vi) the effect of inflation and
other local currency issues and (vii) our capital investment and exploration program.
Earnings:  The table below highlights key financial and operational data of our Company for the 
three years ended December 31, 2019 (in millions, except copper price and per share amounts):
                        Variance
2019     2018     2017     2019 - 2018     2018 - 2017
Copper price LME  2.72  2.96  2.80  (0.24)   0.16
Pounds of copper
sold 
2,173.8 
1,952.9 
1,959.2  220.9   (6.3)
Net sales $ 
7,285.6 $ 
7,096.7 $ 
6,654.5 $  188.9 $  442.2
Operating income $ 
2,753.0 $ 
2,881.2 $ 
2,618.9 $ (128.2) $  262.3
Income before
income taxes $ 
2,426.5 $ 
2,589.4 $ 
2,302.7 $ (162.9) $  286.7
Net income
attributable to SCC $ 
1,485.8 $ 
1,543.0 $ 728.5 $  (57.2) $  814.5
Earnings per share $ 1.92 $  2.00 $  0.94 $  (0.08) $  1.06
Dividends per share $ 1.60 $  1.40 $  0.59 $  0.20 $  0.81
Net sales in 2019 of $7.3 billion were the highest in our history and were higher than in 2018 by
$188.9 million. This increase was mainly the result of higher copper (+11.3%), molybdenum (+21.7%)
and silver (+5.7%) sales volumes, partially offset by lower copper (−8.1%) and molybdenum (−5.0%)
prices. Net sales in 2018 were higher than in 2017 by $442.2 million. This increase was mainly the result
of higher copper (+5.7%) and molybdenum (+45.9%) prices and higher sales volumes of silver (+15.3%)
and molybdenum (+3.3%), partially offset by lower silver prices (−8.1%) and lower zinc sales volume
(−1.0%).
The two largest components of operating costs and expenses are cost of sales and depreciation,
amortization and depletion, both of which increased in each of the years in the periods above. In 2019,
cost of sales increased by $197.4 million and depreciation, amortization and depletion increased by
$90.1 million. The increase in cost of sales in 2019 was mainly due to higher repairing materials and
operating contractors’ costs, as well as lower capitalized leachable material. This was partially offset by a
lower cost of metals purchased from third parties. In 2018, cost of sales increased by $156.2 million and
depreciation, amortization and depletion increased by $3.2 million. The increase in cost of sales in 2018
was mainly due to higher fuel costs, higher workers’ participation expense and inventory consumption.
Despite the higher sales volumes reported at competitive costs, net income attributable to SCC in 2019
was 3.6% lower than in 2018 mainly due to lower prices for copper and molybdenum, as mentioned
previously. Net income attributable to SCC in 2018 was 111.8% higher than in 2017 mainly due to the
one-time, non-cash income tax adjustment of $785.9 million recorded in 2017 as result of the U.S.
income tax legislation enacted in the fourth quarter of 2017. See Note 7 “Income Taxes”, of our
consolidated financial statements.
Production: The table below highlights, mine production data of our Company for the three years ended
December 31, 2019:
Table of Contents
69Variance
2019 - 2018 2018 - 2017  
2019    2018    2017    Volume    % Volume    %  
Copper (in million
pounds)   
2,191.0  
1,948.2  
1,933.4  242.8  12.5%   14.8  0.8%
Molybdenum (in million
pounds)   59.3  48.5  47.0  10.8  22.3%   1.5  3.2%
Zinc (in million pounds)  163.0  156.0  151.4  7.0  4.4%   4.6  3.0%
Silver (in million ounces)  20.3  17.3  15.9  3.0  17.1%   1.4  8.8%
The table below highlights copper production data at each of our mines for the three years ended
December 31, 2019:
Variance
2019 - 2018 2018 - 2017  
Copper (in million pounds): 2019    2018    2017    Volume    %     Volume    %  
Toquepala   568.8  375.4  326.4  193.4  51.5%   49.0  15.0%
Cuajone   344.8  354.0  348.5  (9.2)  (2.6)%   5.5  1.6%
La Caridad   293.4  292.1  296.9  1.3  0.4%   (4.8)  (1.6)%
Buenavista   965.8  913.0  949.5  52.8  5.8%   (36.5)  (3.8)%
IMMSA   18.2  13.7  12.1  4.5  32.9%   1.6  13.2%
Total mined copper   
2,191.0  
1,948.2  
1,933.4  242.8  12.5%   14.8  0.8%
2019 compared to 2018:
Copper mine production in 2019 increased 12.5% to 2,191.0 million pounds from 1,948.2 million pounds
in 2018. This increase was due to:
●Higher production at the Toquepala mine (+51.5%), as a result of additional copper production of
93,108 tons from the successful ramping up of the new concentrator.
●Higher production at the Buenavista mine (+5.8%) due to operating improvements at our new
Buenavista plants, the SX/EW (+12.2%) and concentrator (+4.0%).
●Higher production at the IMMSA operations (+32.9%), as result of the restoration of the San Martin
mine operations.
Molybdenum production increased 22.3% in 2019 compared to 2018 due to higher production at all of
our mines, principally at the Toquepala mine (+75%) due to the successful ramping up of the new
molybdenum plant that started production in April 2019.
Zinc production increased 4.4% in 2019, as a result of higher production at our Santa Barbara mine due
to higher grades and recoveries, as well as the restored production of 5,837 tons from our San Martin
mine.
Mined silver production increased 17.1% in 2019 compared to 2018, mainly due to higher production at 
our Toquepala (+60.5%), IMMSA (+22.9%) and Buenavista (+11.5%) operations, partially offset by 
lower production at the La Caridad    (-6.6%) and Cuajone (-3.2%) mines.
2018 compared to 2017:
Copper mine production in 2018 increased 0.8% to 1,948.2 million pounds from 1,933.4 million pounds
in 2017. This increase was due to:
●Higher production at the Toquepala and Cuajone mines due to higher ore grades and recoveries,
which was partially offset by
●Lower production at the Buenavista mine due to lower SX-EW copper production (−20.1%). In
2018, the Company initiated a 12-month corrective program to overcome this temporary reduction in
production. The program includes depositing the minerals in different leaching pads depending on
the characteristics of the ore. Also, the Company
Table of Contents
70has implemented improvements and controls in the ore fragmentation that occurs in the blasting, to
avoid the fine materials that may cause clogging in the recovery process.
Molybdenum production increased 3.1% in 2018 compared to 2017, principally due to higher production
at the Buenavista mine due to higher recoveries. This increase was partially offset by lower production at
our Peruvian mines due to lower ore grades and recoveries.
Zinc production increased 3.1% in 2018, due to higher production at our Santa Eulalia and Santa Barbara
mines due to higher mineral milled.
Mined silver production increased 8.7% in 2018 compared to 2017, as we had increased silver production
at all of our mines, except for our Cuajone mine.
Operating Cash Costs:  An overall benchmark used by us and a common industry metric to measure 
performance is operating cash costs per pound of copper produced. Operating cash cost is a non-GAAP 
measure that does not have a standardized meaning and may not be comparable to similarly titled 
measures provided by other companies. This non-GAAP information should not be considered in 
isolation or as substitute for measures of performance determined in accordance with GAAP. A 
reconciliation of our operating cash cost per pound of copper produced to the cost of sales (exclusive of 
depreciation, amortization and depletion) as presented in the consolidated statement of earnings is 
presented under the subheading, “Non-GAAP Information Reconciliation” on page 91. We disclose 
operating cash cost per pound of copper produced, both before and net of by-product revenues.
We define operating cash cost per pound of copper produced before by-product revenues as cost of
sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion), plus selling, general and administrative
charges, treatment and refining charges net of sales premiums; less the cost of purchased concentrates,
workers’ participation and other miscellaneous charges, including royalty charges, and the change in
inventory levels; divided by total pounds of copper produced by our own mines.
In our calculation of operating cash cost per pound of copper produced, we exclude depreciation,
amortization and depletion, which are considered non-cash expenses. Exploration is considered a
discretionary expenditure and is also excluded. Workers’ participation provisions are determined on the
basis of pre-tax earnings and are also excluded. Additionally excluded from operating cash costs are
items of a non-recurring nature and the mining royalty charge as it is based on various calculations of
taxable income, depending on which jurisdiction, Peru or Mexico, is imposing the charge. We believe
these adjustments will allow our management and stakeholders to see a presentation of our controllable
cash cost, which we consider is one of the lowest of copper producing companies of similar size.
We define operating cash cost per pound of copper produced net of by-product revenues as operating
cash cost per pound of copper produced, as defined in the previous paragraph, less by-product revenues
and net revenue (loss) on sale of metal purchased from third parties.
In our calculation of operating cash cost per pound of copper produced, net of by-product revenues, we
credit against our costs the revenues from the sale of all our by-products, including, molybdenum, zinc,
silver, gold, etc. and the net revenue (loss) on sale of metals purchased from third parties. We disclose
this measure including the by-product revenues in this way because we consider our principal business to
be the production and sale of copper. As part of our copper production process, much of our by-products
are recovered. These by-products, as well as the processing of copper purchased from third parties, are a
supplemental part of our production process and their sales value contribute to cover part of our incurred
fixed costs. We believe that our Company is viewed by the investment community as a copper company,
and is valued, in large part, by the investment community’s view of the copper market and our ability to
produce copper at a reasonable cost.
We believe that both of these measures are useful tools for our management and our stakeholders. Our
cash costs before by-product revenues allow us to monitor our cost structure and address with operating
management areas of concern. The measure operating cash cost per pound of copper produced net of by-
product revenues is a common measure used in the copper industry and is a useful management tool that
allows us to track our performance and better allocate our
Table of Contents
71resources. This measure is also used in our investment project evaluation process to determine a project’s
potential contribution to our operations, its competitiveness and its relative strength in different price
scenarios. The expected contribution of by-products is generally a significant factor used by the copper
industry in determining whether to move forward with the development of a new mining project. As the
price of our by-product commodities can have significant fluctuations from period to period, the value of
its contribution to our costs can be volatile.
Our operating cash cost per pound of copper produced, as defined above, is presented in the table below
for the three years ended December 31, 2019:
Operating cash cost per pound of copper produced(1)
(In millions, except cost per pound and percentages)
2019 - 2018 2018 - 2017  
2019     2018     2017     Value     %     Value     %     
Total operating cash cost before
by‑product revenues $ 3,230.9 $ 2,904.4 $ 2,797.5 $ 
326.5   11.2%  $ 106.9   3.8%
Total by‑product revenues $ 
(1,359.2) $ 
(1,267.7) $ 
(1,080.4) $ (91.5)   7.2%    
(187.3)   17.3 %
Total operating cash cost net of
by‑product revenues $ 1,871.7 $ 1,636.7 $ 1,717.1 $ 
235.0   14.4 %  $ (80.4)   (4.7) %
Total pounds of copper
produced(2)   2,133.3   1,886.8   1,874.5   
246.5   13.1 %    12.3   0.7%
Operating cash cost per  pound
befor e by‑product r evenues $ 1.52 $ 1.54 $ 1.49 $ (0.02)   (1.3) %  $ 0.05   3.4%
By‑products per  pound r evenues $ (0.64) $ (0.67) $ (0.57) $ 0.03   (4.5) %  $ (0.10)   17.5 %
Operating cash cost per  pound
net of by ‑product r evenues $ 0.88 $ 0.87 $ 0.92 $ 0.01   1.1%  $ (0.05)   (5.4) %
(1)These are non-GAAP measures, see page 91 for reconciliation to GAAP measure.
(2)Net of metallurgical losses.
2019 compared to 2018:
As seen in the table above, our per pound cash cost before by-product revenues in 2019 was 1.3% lower
when compared with 2018. This decrease was the result of the unit cost effect of 13.1% higher
production. Meanwhile, our cash cost per pound when calculated net of by-product revenues for 2019
was 1.1% higher than in the same period of 2018 due to the higher production noted, as well as lower by-
product revenues due to the additional copper volume effect.
2018 compared to 2017:
Our cash cost per pound before by-product revenues in 2018 was $1.54, 3.4% higher than in 2017. This
increase in operating cash cost was mainly due to higher production costs, principally at our Peruvian
operations. However, our per pound cash cost for 2018, when calculated net of by-product revenues was
5.4% lower than in 2017. This improvement was mainly the result of higher prices for our major by-
products.
Metal Prices:  The profitability of our operations is dependent on, and our financial performance is 
significantly affected by, the international market prices for the products we produce, especially for 
copper, molybdenum, zinc and silver.
We are subject to market risks arising from the volatility of copper and other metals prices. Metal prices
historically have been subject to wide fluctuations and are affected by numerous factors beyond our
control. These factors, which affect each commodity to varying degrees, include international economic
and political conditions, levels of supply and demand, the availability and cost of substitutes, inventory
levels maintained by producers and others and, to a lesser degree, inventory carrying costs and currency
exchange rates. In addition, the market prices of certain metals have on occasion been subject to rapid
short-term changes due to economic concerns and financial investments.
Table of Contents
72For 2020, assuming that expected metal production and sales are achieved, that 2019 tax rates are
unchanged and giving no effect to potential hedging programs, metal price sensitivity factors would
indicate the following change in estimated annual net income attributable to SCC resulting from metal
price changes:
    Copper    Molybdenum    Zinc     Silver
Change in metal prices (per pound except silver—
per ounce) $  0.10$  1.00$  0.10$  1.00
Change in net earnings (in millions) $ 140.1$  35.1$  14.5$  9.3
Business Segments:  We view our Company as having three reportable segments and manage it on the 
basis of these segments. These segments are (1) our Peruvian operations, (2) our Mexican open-pit 
operations and (3) our Mexican underground operations, known as our IMMSA unit. Our Peruvian 
operations include the Toquepala and Cuajone mine complexes and the smelting and refining plants, 
industrial railroad and port facilities that service both mines. Our Mexican open-pit operations include La 
Caridad and Buenavista mine complexes, the smelting and refining plants and support facilities, which 
service both mines. Our IMMSA unit includes five underground mines, a coal mine, and several 
industrial processing facilities.
Segment information is included in our review of “Results of Operations” in this item and also in Note 18
“Segment and Related Information” of our consolidated financial statements.
Inflation and Exchange Rate Effect of the Peruvian sol and the Mexican peso:  Our functional 
currency is the U.S. dollar and our revenues are primarily denominated in U.S. dollars. Significant 
portions of our operating costs are denominated in Peruvian sol and Mexican pesos. Accordingly, when 
inflation and currency devaluation/appreciation of the Peruvian and Mexican currency occur, our 
operating results can be affected. In recent years, we do believe such changes have not had a material 
effect on our results and financial position. Please see Item 7A “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures 
about Market Risk” for more detailed information.
Capital Investment Program:  We made capital investments of $707.5 million in 2019, 
$1,121.4 million in 2018 and $1,023.5 million in 2017. In general, the capital investments and projects 
described below are intended to increase production, decrease costs or address social and environmental 
commitments.
Table of Contents
73The table below sets forth our capital investments for the three years ended December 31, 2019 (in
millions):
    2019    2018     2017
Peruvian projects:
Toquepala expansion project $ 41.1$ 392.4$ 362.0
Toquepala mine equipment acquisition   —  —   39.7
Heavy mineral management optimizing project—Cuajone   —   17.0  81.7
Ilo 3 substation   —   1.0  29.9
HPGR system—Toquepala   7.6  7.8  18.8
Tailings disposal—Quebrada Honda dam  1.0  23.7  15.5
Ilo sulfuric acid plant N°1 modification   5.1  15.3  4.4
Pumping system neutralization plant - Toquepala  8.0  —  —
Other projects   37.8  24.1  10.0
Sub‑total projects   100.6  481.3  562.0
Maintenance and replacement   216.3  201.4  153.1
Net change in capital expenditures incurred but not yet paid   33.2  91.3  (29.7)
Total Peruvian expenditures   350.1  774.0  685.4
Mexican projects:        
New Buenavista concentrator   1.0  5.8  24.7
Buenavista projects infrastructure   1.1  2.3  1.9
Buenavista SX‑EW plant III  —   —   1.1
Quebalix IV   0.7  2.0  17.6
New tailing disposal deposit at Buenavista mine   35.8  56.7  79.2
Over elevation of tailings deposit N° 7 at La Caridad mine   25.4  18.3  —
Sonora River water restitution system in Moritas Basin   1.8  6.0  —
Solutions system improvements of Tinajas   6.0  1.3  14.5
San Martin mine restoration  48.9  13.5  —
Other projects   85.7  63.5  63.0
Sub‑total projects   206.4  169.4  202.0
Maintenance and replacement   148.6  169.3  144.7
Net change in capital expenditures incurred but not yet paid   2.4  8.7  (8.6)
Total Mexican expenditures   357.4  347.4  338.1
Total capital investments $ 707.5$ 
1,121.4$ 
1,023.5
In 2020, we plan to invest $1,146.7 million in capital projects. In addition to our ongoing capital
maintenance and replacement spending, our principal capital programs include the following:
Projects in Mexico:
Buenavista Zinc—Sonora:  This project is located within the Buenavista facility and includes the 
development of a new concentrator to produce approximately 80,000 tons of zinc and 20,000 tons of 
copper per year. Currently, we have completed the basic engineering and obtained all environmental 
permits for the project. The project´s budget is $413 million, and we expect to initiate operations in the 
third quarter of 2022. When completed, this new facility will double the Company’s zinc production 
capacity and will provide 490 direct jobs and 1,470 indirect jobs. The process of bidding for the site 
preparation has started and the purchase orders for the major equipment have been placed.
Pilares—Sonora:  This project, located six kilometers from La Caridad, will be developed as an open-pit 
mine operation with an annual production capacity of 35,000 tons of copper in concentrate. The ore will 
be transported from the pit to the primary crushers of the La Caridad copper concentrator through a new 
25-meter wide off-road facility for mining trucks, and will significantly improve the over-all mineral ore 
grade (combining the 0.78% expected from Pilares with 0.34% from La Caridad). The budget for Pilares 
is $159 million and we expect it to start production during the first half of 2022. The connection road 
between Pilares mine and La Caridad mine is now under construction.
Table of Contents
74El Pilar - Sonora: This is a low capital intensity copper greenfield project strategically located in Sonora,
Mexico, approximately 45 kilometers from our Buenavista mine. Its copper oxide mineralization contains
estimated proven and probable reserves of 325 million tons of ore with an average copper grade of
0.287%. El Pilar will operate as a conventional open-pit mine and copper cathodes will be produced
using the highly cost efficient and environmentally friendly SX-EW technology. We estimate a
development investment of approximately $310 million. The construction of the pilot plant is finished
and the production tests have recently begun. We expect this project to start production during 2023.
The San Martin mine restoration program: After eleven years of an illegal stoppage, we resumed control
of the San Martin mine in August 2018. The San Martin facilities deteriorated during this period and we
undertook a major renovation in order to restart operations during the second quarter of 2019. Currently,
the mine has 200,000 tons of ore and the concentrator has initiated production. In 2019, we produced
5,837 tons of zinc, 1.2 million ounces of silver and 1,335 tons of copper. The budget of the restoration
program is $97.7 million. At December 31, 2019 the program had a total expense of $73.6 million.
Projects in Peru:
Our main capital projects in Peru are the following:
Toquepala Expansion Project - Tacna:  This $1,320 million project includes a new state-of-the-art
concentrator which increased Toquepala’s annual copper production to 258,000 tons in 2019, a 51.5%
production increase, when compared to 2018. As of December 31, 2019, we have invested $1,280.1
million in this expansion. Construction of the project was completed and production began in the fourth
quarter of 2018. Full production was reached in the second quarter of 2019.
The project to improve the crushing process at Toquepala with the installation of a High Pressure
Grinding Roll (HPGR) system, has as its main objective, to ensure that our existing concentrator will
operate at its maximum annual production capacity of 117,000 tons of copper while reducing operating
costs through ore crushing efficiencies, even with an increase of the ore material hardness index. The
budget for this project is $52 million and as of December 31, 2019, we have invested $51.9 million. We
are in the administrative close-out process for this project, which was added to operations during the
fourth quarter of 2018.
Cuajone tailing thickeners project - Moquegua: This project will replace two of the three existing
thickeners at the concentrator with a new hi-rate thickener. The purpose is to streamline the concentrator
flotation process and improve water recovery efficiency, increasing the tailings solids content from 54%
to 61%, thereby reducing fresh water consumption and replacing it with recovered water. As of December
31, 2019, we have invested $31 million out of the approved budget of $31.3 million in this project. This
project was finished in October 2019.
Tailings disposal at Quebrada Honda - Moquegua: This project increases the height of the existing
Quebrada Honda dam to impound future tailings from the Toquepala and Cuajone concentrators and will
extend the expected life of this tailings facility by 25 years. The first stage and construction of the
drainage system for the lateral dam is finished. We finished the second stage with the installation of a
new cyclone battery station that allows us to place more slurry at the dams. We are evaluating
improvements in operational processes of this facility. The project has a total budgeted cost of $116
million and we have invested $107.2 million through December 31, 2019.
Potential projects:
We have a number of other projects that we may develop in the future. We continuously evaluate new
projects on the basis of our long-term corporate objectives, strategic and operating fit, expected return on
investment, required investment, estimated production, estimated cash-flow profile, social and
environmental considerations, among other factors. All capital spending plans will continue to be
reviewed and adjusted to respond to changes in the economy or market conditions. We are currently
developing a new organic growth plan to increase our annual copper production to 1.5 million tons by
2028 with the development of new projects, which include the following:
Table of Contents
75El Arco - Baja California: This is a world class copper deposit located in the central part of the Baja
California peninsula, with ore reserves of over 2.7 billion tons with an ore grade of 0.399% and 0.11
grams of gold per ton. This project, includes an open-pit mine combining concentrator and SX-EW
operations with an estimated production of 190,000 tons of copper and 105,000 ounces of gold annually.
We are currently in the land acquisition process for the project.
Tia Maria - Arequipa: On July 8, 2019, we received the construction permit for this 120,000 ton annual
SX-EW copper greenfield project with a total capital budget of $1,400 million. This permit was obtained
after completing an exhaustive review process of environmental and social matters, complying with all
established regulatory requirements and addressing all observations raised.
The challenges to the construction permit were overcome when on October 30, 2019, the Mining Council
of the Peruvian Ministry of Energy and Mines ratified the construction permit for the Tia Maria project.
In coordination with the Peruvian Government, Southern Copper continues to work on common grounds
for dialogue with the neighboring communities to address any concerns they may have on the project and
is awaiting the proper economic and political conditions to move ahead with the project. Meanwhile, we
reiterate our commitment to delay the construction of the project.
We guarantee to the population of Islay that the Tia Maria project will not adversely affect other local 
economic activities because we will use desalinated seawater for our operations and, for the transport of 
our supplies and copper production, we will build a 32 kilometer industrial railway and an access road at 
a safe distance from the Tambo Valley.  
Our social programs in education, healthcare and productive development will continue to improve the
quality-of-life, and the agricultural and livestock activities in the Tambo Valley, as well as fishing and
tourism in Islay. During the construction and operation phase, hiring local labor will be a priority. For this
purpose, we have successfully launched in June 2019, the free technical training program “Forging the
Future”, which will benefit 700 persons in this province in 2019-20. After training, the participants will
be eligible to apply for one of the estimated 9,000 jobs (3,600 direct and 5,400 indirect) required during
the Tia Maria construction phase. We believe that the initiation of construction activities for Tia Maria
will generate significant economic opportunities for the Islay province and the Arequipa region.
When in operation, we expect Tia Maria will generate a significant contribution through mining royalties
and taxes from day-one and will directly employ 600 workers and indirectly provide jobs for another
4,200 workers.
This greenfield project, located in Arequipa, Peru, will use state of the art SX-EW technology with the
highest international environmental standards. SX-EW facilities are the most environmentally friendly in
the industry due to their technical process with no emissions released into the atmosphere. 
Los Chancas—Apurimac:  This greenfield project, located in Apurimac, Peru, is a copper and 
molybdenum porphyry deposit. Current estimates indicate the presence of 545 million tons of 
mineralized material with a copper content of 0.59%, molybdenum content of 0.04% and 0.039 grams of 
gold per ton, as well as 181 million tons of mineralized leachable material with a total copper content of 
0.357%. Los Chancas project envisions an open-pit mine with a combined operation of concentrator and 
SX-EW processes to annually produce 130,000 tons of copper and 7,500 tons of molybdenum. The 
estimated capital investment is $2,800 million and is expected to be in operation in 2026. In 2018 and 
2019, we developed social and environmental improvement programs for the local communities. For 
2020, we plan to continue with these activities and to conclude the environmental impact assessment of 
the project.
Michiquillay Project—Cajamarca:  On June 12, 2018, Southern Copper signed a contract and made an 
initial payment of $12.5 million for the acquisition of the Michiquillay project in Cajamarca, Peru. The 
Company has created a multidisciplinary management team to plan the development of this project. As 
part of this plan, the Company has established contact with the local authorities and communities in order 
to promote programs for the sustainable development of the area. In 2019, we developed social and 
environmental programs for the local communities and began a semi-detailed environmental impact 
assessment. This will allow us to begin a 40,000 meter diamond drilling program in 2020, to verify and 
update the estimated mineralized materials of the project.
Table of Contents
Michiquillay is a world class mining project with estimated mineralized material of 1,150 million tons
with an estimated copper grade of 0.63%. When developed, we expect Michiquillay to produce 225,000
tons of copper per year (along with by-products of molybdenum, gold and silver) for an initial mine life
of more than 25 years, at a competitive cash-cost. We estimate an investment of approximately
$2.5 billion will be required and expect production start-up by 2026, with Michiquillay becoming one of
Peru´s largest copper mines. The project will create significant business opportunities in the Cajamarca
region, generate new jobs for the local communities and contribute with taxes and royalties to the
national, regional and local governments.
The above information is based on estimates only. We cannot make any assurances that we will undertake
any of these projects or that the information noted is accurate.
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMATES
Our significant accounting policies are discussed in Note 2 “Summary of Significant Accounting
Policies” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements, included in Item 8 “Financial Statements
and Supplementary Data” of this Annual Report.
Our discussion and analysis of financial condition and results of operations, as well as quantitative and
qualitative disclosures about market risks, are based upon our consolidated financial statements, which
have been prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP. Preparation of these consolidated financial
statements requires our management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts
of assets and liabilities and disclosures of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial
statements and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. We make our
best estimate of the ultimate outcome for these items based on historical trends and other information
available when the financial statements are prepared. Changes in estimates are recognized in accordance
with the accounting rules for the estimate, which is typically in the period when new information
becomes available to management. Areas where the nature of the estimate makes it reasonably possible
that actual results could materially differ from amounts estimated include: ore reserves, revenue
recognition, ore stockpiles on leach pads and related amortization, estimated impairment of assets, asset
retirement obligations, determination of discount rates related to the operating lease liabilities, valuation
allowances for deferred tax assets and unrecognized tax benefits. We base our estimates on historical
experience and on various other assumptions that we believe to be reasonable under the circumstances.
Actual results may differ from these estimates under different assumptions or conditions.
Ore Reserves:  For internal ore reserve estimation, we use metal price assumptions of $2.90 per pound for 
copper and $7.50 per pound for molybdenum. These prices are intended to conservatively approximate 
average prices over the long term.
However, pursuant to SEC guidance, the reserve information in this report is calculated using average
metals prices over the most recent three years, except as otherwise stated. We refer to these three-year
average metals prices as “current average prices.” Our current average prices for copper are calculated
using prices quoted by COMEX, and our current average prices for molybdenum are calculated using
prices published in Platt’s Metals Week. Unless otherwise stated, reserve estimates in this report use the
following three years average prices for copper and molybdenum as of December 31, 2019:
                Average
2019 2018 2017 2019 - 2017
Copper ($per pound) $ 2.72$ 2.93$ 
2.80$  2.82
Molybdenum ($per pound) $ 
11.35$ 
11.94$ 
8.21$ 10.50
Certain financial information is based on reserve estimates calculated on the basis of current average
prices. These include amortization of intangible assets and mine development. Variations in ore reserve
calculations from changes in metal price assumptions generally do not create material changes to our
financial results. However, significant decreases in metal prices could adversely affect our earnings by
causing, among other things, asset impairment charges, please see “Assets impairment” below. A 20%
increase or decrease in three-year average copper prices (current prices), for mineral reserves estimation,
which is a reasonable possibility, would not materially affect our statement of earnings as the amount of
reserves would not change significantly. Please see Item 2 “Properties—Ore reserves.”
76
Table of Contents
Ore stockpiles on leach pads:  The leaching process is an integral part of the mining operations carried 
out at our open-pit mines. We capitalize the production cost of leachable material at our Toquepala, La 
Caridad and Buenavista mines recognizing it as inventory. The estimates of recoverable mineral content 
contained in the leaching dumps are supported by engineering studies. As the production cycle of the 
leaching process is significantly longer than the conventional process of concentrating, smelting and 
electrolytic refining, we include on our balance sheet, current leach inventory (as part of work-in-process 
inventories) and long-term leach inventory. Amortization of leachable material is recorded by the units of 
production method.
Asset Retirement Obligation:  Our mining and exploration activities are subject to various laws and 
regulations governing the protection of the environment. Accounting for reclamation and remediation 
obligations requires management to make estimates unique to each mining operation of the future costs 
we will incur to complete the reclamation and remediation work required to comply with existing laws 
and regulations. These estimates are based in part on our inflation and credit rate assumptions. Actual 
costs incurred in future periods could differ from amounts estimated. Additionally, future changes to 
environmental laws and regulations could increase the extent of reclamation and remediation work 
required to be performed by us. Any such increases in future costs could materially impact the amounts 
charged to operations for reclamation and remediation.
Asset retirement obligations are further discussed in Note 10 “Asset Retirement Obligation” to our
consolidated financial statements included herein.
Revenue Recognition:  For certain of our sales of copper and molybdenum products, customer contracts 
allow for pricing based on a month subsequent to shipping, in most cases within the following 
three months and in few cases perhaps a few further months. In such cases, revenue is recorded at a 
provisional price at the time of shipment. The provisionally priced copper sales are adjusted to reflect 
forward LME or COMEX copper prices at the end of each month until a final adjustment is made to the 
price of the shipments upon settlement with customers pursuant to the terms of the contract. In the case of 
molybdenum sales, for which there are no published forward prices, the provisionally priced sales are 
adjusted to reflect the market prices at the end of each month until a final adjustment is made to the price 
of the shipments upon settlement with customers pursuant to the terms of the contract. (See details in 
“Provisionally Priced Sales” under this Item 7).
Income Taxes:  In preparing our consolidated financial statements, we recognize income taxes in each of 
the jurisdictions in which we operate. For each jurisdiction, we calculate the actual amount currently 
payable or receivable, as well as deferred tax assets and liabilities attributable to temporary differences 
between the financial statement carrying amounts of existing assets and liabilities and their respective tax 
bases. Deferred income tax assets and liabilities are measured using enacted tax rates expected to apply to 
taxable income in the years in which these temporary differences are expected to be recovered or settled. 
The effect on deferred tax assets and liabilities of a change in rate is recognized through the income tax 
provision in the period that the change is enacted.
A valuation allowance is provided for those deferred tax assets for which it is more likely than not that
the related benefits will not be realized. In determining the amount of the valuation allowance, we
consider estimated future taxable income, as well as feasible tax planning strategies in each jurisdiction.
If we determine that we will not realize all or a portion of our deferred tax assets, we will increase our
valuation allowance with a charge to income tax expense. Conversely, if we determine that we will
ultimately be able to realize all or a portion of the related benefits for which a valuation allowance has
been provided, all or a portion of the related valuation allowance will be reduced with a credit to income
tax expense.
Our Company’s operations involve dealing with uncertainties and judgments in the application of
complex tax regulations in multiple jurisdictions. The final taxes paid are dependent upon many factors,
including negotiations with taxing authorities in various jurisdictions and resolution of disputes arising
from federal, state, and international tax audits. We recognize potential liabilities and record tax liabilities
for anticipated tax audit issues in the U.S. and other tax jurisdictions based on our estimate of whether,
and the extent to which, additional taxes will be due. We follow the guidance of ASC 740 “Income
Taxes” to record these liabilities. (See Note 7 “Income Taxes” of the consolidated financial statements for
additional information). We adjust these reserves in light of changing facts and circumstances; however,
due to the complexity of some of these uncertainties, the ultimate resolution may result in a payment that
is
77
Table of Contents
78materially different from our current estimate of the tax liabilities. If our estimate of tax liabilities proves
to be less than the ultimate assessment, an additional charge to expense would result. If payment of these
amounts ultimately proves to be less than the recorded amounts, the reversal of the liabilities would result
in tax benefits being recognized in the period when we determine the liabilities are no longer necessary.
We recognize interest and penalties, if any, related to unrecognized tax benefits in income tax expense.
On December 22, 2017, the President of the United States signed into law the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act
(“the TCJA”). The Act significantly changes U.S. tax law by, among other things, lowering corporate
income tax rates, implementing a territorial tax system and imposing a repatriation tax on deemed
repatriated earnings of foreign subsidiaries. The TCJA permanently reduced the U.S. corporate income
tax rate from a maximum of 35% to a flat 21% effective January 1, 2018. The SEC staff issued Staff
Accounting Bulletin No. 118 (“SAB 118”) to address the application of U.S. GAAP in situations when a
registrant does not have the necessary information available, prepared, or analyzed (including
computations) in reasonable detail to complete the accounting for certain income tax effects of the TCJA.
In 2017, the Company recognized the provisional tax impacts related to deemed repatriated earnings and
the revaluation of deferred tax assets and liabilities and included these amounts in its consolidated
financial statements for the year ended December 31, 2017. In the consolidated financial statements for
the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company completed the accounting for income tax effects of the
TCJA in accordance with SAB 118. For further information, see Note 7 “Income Taxes”, of our
consolidated financial statements.
Asset Impairments:  We evaluate our long-term assets when events or changes in economic 
circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of such assets may not be recoverable. Our evaluations 
are based on business plans that are prepared using a time horizon that is reflective of our expectations of 
metal prices over our business cycle. We are currently using an average copper price of $2.20 per pound 
and an average molybdenum price of $5.00 per pound, reflective of what we believe is the lower level of 
the current price environment, for our impairment tests. The results of our impairment sensitivity 
analysis, which included a stress test using a copper price assumption of $2.00 per pound and a 
molybdenum price assumption of $4.00 per pound showed projected discounted cash flows in excess of 
the carrying amounts of long-lived assets by margins ranging from 1.2 to 4.8 times such carrying amount.
In recent years our assumptions for long-term average prices resulted in stricter evaluations for
impairment analysis than using the three year average prices for copper and molybdenum prices. Should
this situation reverse in the future with three year average prices below the long-term price assumption,
we would assess the need to use the three year average prices in our evaluations. We use an estimate of
the future undiscounted net cash flows of the related asset or asset group over the remaining life to
measure whether the assets are recoverable and measure any impairment by reference to fair value.
Leases: In 2019, the Company adopted the new leases standard and it resulted in the recognition of right-
of-use assets and lease obligations on the Company´s balance sheet. After the analysis of this standard,
the Company concluded that all of its existing lease contracts are operating lease contracts. Right-of-use
assets represent the Company’s right to use an underlying asset for the lease term and lease liabilities
represent an obligation by the Company to make lease payments which arise from the lease. Lease right-
of-use assets and liabilities are recognized at the inception date based on the present value of lease
payments over the lease term. As the Company’s lease contracts do not provide an implicit rate, the
Company uses its incremental borrowing rate based on the information available at the inception date in
order to determine the present value of lease payments.
Table of Contents
79RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
The following table highlights key financial results for each of the years in the three-year period ended
December 31, 2019 (in millions):
                    Variance
Statement of Earnings Data 2019     2018     2017 2019 - 2018    2018 - 2017
Net sales $ 7,285.6$ 7,096.7$ 6,654.5$ 188.9$ 442.2
Operating costs and expenses   
(4,532.6)  
(4,215.5)  
(4,035.6)  (317.1)  (179.9)
Operating income   2,753.0  2,881.2  2,618.9  (128.2)  262.3
Non‑operating income (expense)   (326.5)  (291.8)  (316.2)  (34.7)  24.4
Income before income taxes   2,426.5  2,589.4  2,302.7  (162.9)  286.7
Income taxes   (966.3)  
(1,105.0)  (951.7)  138.7  (153.3)
Deferred income taxes   21.0  51.5  (641.7)  (30.5)  693.2
Equity earnings of affiliate   10.7  12.3  23.1  (1.6)  (10.8)
Net income attributable to
non‑controlling interest   (6.1)  (5.2)  (3.9)  (0.9)  (1.3)
Net income attributable to SCC $ 1,485.8$ 1,543.0$ 728.5$ (57.2)$ 814.5
NET SALES
2019-2018:  Net sales in 2019 were $7,285.6 million, compared to $7,096.7 million in 2018, an increase 
of $188.9 million. This 2.7% increase was mainly the result of higher copper (+11.3%), molybdenum 
(+21.7%) and silver (+5.7%) sales volumes, partially offset by copper (−8.1%) and molybdenum (−5.0%) 
prices.  
2018-2017:  Net sales in 2018 were $7,096.7 million, compared to $6,654.5 million in 2017, an increase 
of $442.2 million. This 6.6% increase was principally the result of higher copper (+5.7%) and 
molybdenum (+45.9%) prices and higher sales volumes of silver (+15.3%) and molybdenum (+3.3%), 
partially offset by lower silver price (−8.1%) and lower zinc sales volume (−1.0%).
The table below outlines the average published market metals prices for our metals for each of the
three years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2019:
                    % Variance  
2019     2018     2017     2019 - 20182018 - 2017
Copper price ($per pound—LME) $ 2.72$ 2.96$ 2.80  (8.1)%   5.7%
Copper price ($per pound—COMEX) $ 2.72$ 2.93$ 2.80  (7.2)%   4.6%
Molybdenum price ($per pound)(1) $ 11.27$ 11.86$ 8.13  (5.0)%   45.9%
Zinc price ($per pound—LME) $ 1.16$ 1.33$ 1.31  (12.8)%   1.5%
Silver price ($per ounce—COMEX) $ 16.16$ 15.65$ 17.03  3.3%   (8.1)%
(1)Platt’s Metals Week Dealer Oxide.
The table below provides our metal sales as a percentage of our total net sales:
Year Ended      
December 31, 
Sales as a percentage of total net sales     2019     2018 2017
Copper   80.2%   80.4%  82.3%
Molybdenum   7.5%   7.2%  5.3%
Silver   4.5%   4.2%  4.3%
Zinc   3.8%   4.6%  4.9%
Other by‑products   4.0%   3.6%  3.2%
Total   100.0%   100.0%  100.0%
Table of Contents
80The table below provides our copper sales by type of product (in million pounds):
                            Variance  
Copper Sales (million pounds) 2019    2018    2017    2019 - 20182018 - 2017
Refined (including SX‑EW) 
1,065.2 
1,152.2 
1,193.3  (87.0)  (41.1)
Rod  365.5  335.7  309.7  29.8  26.0
Concentrates and other  743.1  465.0  456.2  278.1  8.8
Total 
2,173.8 
1,952.9 
1,959.2  220.9  (6.3)
The table below provides our copper sales volume by type of product as a percentage of our total copper
sales volume:
Year ended December 31,  
Copper Sales by product type     2019    2018    2017 
Refined (including SX‑EW)   49.0%   59.0%   60.9%
Rod   16.8%   17.2%   15.8%
Concentrates and other   34.2%   23.8%   23.3%
Total   100.0%   100.0%   
100.0%
OPERATING COSTS AND EXPENSES
The table below summarizes the production cost structure by major components for the three years ended
2019 as a percentage of total production cost:
    Year ended December 31,  
2019    2018 2017
Power   14.7%   14.8% 16.8%
Labor   13.9%   13.9% 13.9%
Fuel   13.2%   14.6% 13.7%
Maintenance   21.0%   19.5% 18.9%
Operating material   17.7%   18.7% 19.3%
Other   19.5%   18.5% 17.4%
Total   
100.0%   
100.0% 
100.0%
2019-2018:  Operating costs and expenses in 2019 increased $317.1 million, compared to 2018, primarily 
due to:
Operating cost and expenses for 2018     $ 4,215.5
Plus:
•Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly due
to lower capitalized leachable material, higher repairing materials costs, operating
contractors and power costs, partially offset by lower cost of metals purchased from
third parties and lower inventory consumption.   197.4
• Higher depreciation, amortization and depletion expense due to our expansion and 
maintenance investments.       90.1
•Higher selling, general and administrative expenses.   29.2
•Higher exploration expense.   0.4
Operating cost and expenses for 2019 $ 4,532.6
Table of Contents
812018-2017:  Operating costs and expenses in 2018 increased $179.9 million, compared to 2017, primarily 
due to:
Operating cost and expenses for 2017     $ 4,035.6
Plus:
•Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly due
to higher inventory consumption, foreign currency transaction effect, higher workers’
participation expense and higher fuel costs, partially offset by lower power costs, and
higher capitalized ore stockpiles on leach pads.   156.2
•Reversal in 2017 of over-accrual of Sonora River remediation costs.   10.2
•Higher selling, general and administrative expenses.   9.5
•Higher depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.   3.2
•Higher exploration expense.   0.8
Operating cost and expenses for 2018 $ 4,215.5
                            Variance
NON‑OPERATING INCOME (EXPENSE)     2019    2018    2017    2019 - 2018    2018 - 2017
Interest expense $ 
(372.9)$ 
(360.9)$ 
(357.4)$ (12.0)$ (3.5)
Capitalized interest   32.2  83.8  51.4  (51.6)  32.4
Other expense   (7.0)  (30.7)  (15.7)  23.7  (15.0)
Interest income   21.2  16.0  5.5  5.2  10.5
Total non‑operating income (expense) $ 
(326.5)$ 
(291.8)$ 
(316.2)$ (34.7)$ 24.4
2019-2018:  Non-operating income and expense were a net expense of $326.5 million in 2019 compared 
to a net expense of $291.8 million in 2018. The $34.7 million increase in net expense in 2019 was mainly 
due to:
●$ 51.6 million of lower capitalized interest, as completed projects in Peru have been transferred to
operations.
●$ 12.0 million of higher interest expense due to the Minera Mexico debt issuance in September 2019;
partially offset by,
●$ 23.7 million of lower miscellaneous expense, net, which includes a $25.0 million insurance
payment due to rain damages suffered in our Peruvian operations, and
●$ 5.2 million of higher interest income.
2018-2017:  Non-operating income and expense were a net expense of $291.8 million in 2018 compared 
to a net expense of $316.2 million in 2017. The $24.4 million decrease in net expense in 2018 was mainly 
due to:
●$ 32.4 million of higher capitalized interest due to the increased capital investments at our Peruvian
operations,
●$ 10.5 million of higher interest income; partially offset by,
●$ 15.0 million of higher miscellaneous expense, net, which includes a write-off of certain non-capital
expenses related to the Tia Maria project; and
●$ 3.5 million of higher interest expense.
Income taxes
    Year Ended
December 31, 
2019     2018 2017
Provision for income taxes ($ in
millions) $ 945.3 $ 1,053.5 $ 1,593.4
Effective income tax rate   39.0%   40.7%  69.2%
The income tax provision includes Peruvian, Mexican and U.S. federal and state income taxes.
Table of Contents
82Components of income tax provision for 2019, 2018 and 2017 include the following ($ in millions):
    2019    2018     2017
Statutory income tax provision $ 
831.4$ 903.4$ 688.5
Tax reform adjustment   —   30.9  785.9
Peruvian royalty   14.2  9.0  2.5
Mexican royalty   61.6  79.6  93.2
Peruvian special mining tax   38.1  30.6  23.3
Total income tax provision $ 
945.3$ 
1,053.5$ 
1,593.4
The decrease in the effective tax rate in 2019 from the prior year was primarily due to permanent 
differences in the Mexican tax jurisdiction, including a decrease in inflationary tax components of 0.7 
percentage points and a decrease in special mining tax of 0.6 percentage points.  
The decrease in the effective tax rate in 2018 from the prior year was due to the following changes (in
percentage points):
Effective income tax rate for 2017      69.2%
Change in valuation of 2017 deferred tax assets for foreign tax credits, U.S. tax effect of
2017 Peruvian deferred and U.S. deferred tax assets   (25.9)
Reduction of corporate tax rate applied to 2017 U.S. deferred tax asset   (4.9)
Change in 2017 transition tax on repatriated foreign earnings   (2.0)
Additional valuation allowance on 2018 U.S. deferred tax assets, foreign tax credits and
US tax effect of Peruvian deferred taxes   7.5
Permanent Differences   (4.8)
Other changes   1.6
Effective income tax rate for 2018   40.7%
In 2018, the Company completed its evaluation of the effects of the 2017 U.S, tax reform and recorded a
non-cash tax provision of $30.9 million in addition to the non-cash amount of $785.9 million recorded in
2017. This brings the total recorded effect of the 2017 U.S. tax reform on the Company’s financial
statements for 2017 and 2018 to a non-cash tax provision of $816.8 million.
Equity earnings of affiliate
In 2019, 2018 and 2017 we have recognized $10.7 million, $12.3 million and $23.1 million, respectively,
of equity earnings of affiliate, from our 44.2% interest in the Tantahuatay mine.
Net Income attributable to the non-controlling interest
Net income attributable to the non-controlling interest in 2019 was $6.1 million, compared to
$5.2 million in 2018, and $3.9 million in 2017. It increased in 2019 and 2018 by $0.9 million and
$1.3 million, respectively. These changes were the result of higher earnings at our Peruvian operations in
both years.
Income attributable to SCC
Our net income attributable to SCC in 2019 was $1,485.8 million, compared to $1,543.0 million in 2018
and $728.5 million in 2017. Net income attributable to SCC decreased mainly due to increases in cost of
sales and depreciation, amortization and depletion. The increase in 2018 net income was mainly due to
higher sales and lower taxes as the 2017 financial results included the one-time, non-cash income tax
adjustment of $785.9 million recorded in 2017 as a result of the U.S. income tax legislation enacted in the
fourth quarter of 2017.
Table of Contents
83SEGMENT RESULTS ANALYSIS
We have three segments: the Peruvian operations, the Mexican open-pit operations and the Mexican
underground mining operations. Please see a detailed definition of these segments in Item 1 “Business—
Business Reporting Segments.”
The following table presents the volume of sales by segment of copper and our significant by-products,
for each of the years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2019:
                            Variance  
Copper Sales (million pounds) 2019     2018     2017     2019 - 20182018 - 2017
Peruvian operations  959.3  759.4  710.1  199.9  49.3
Mexican open‑pit  1,214.0  1,193.6  1,249.1  20.4  (55.5)
Mexican IMMSA unit  18.7  19.0  15.5  (0.3)  3.5
Other and intersegment elimination  (18.2)  (19.0)  (15.5)  0.8  (3.5)
Total copper sales  2,173.8  1,953.0  1,959.2  220.8  (6.2)
                            Variance  
By‑product Sales (million pounds, except silver—
million ounces) 2019    2018    2017    2019 - 20182018 - 2017
Peruvian operations:
Molybdenum contained in concentrate   23.2  16.0  17.5  7.2  (1.5)
Silver   5.8  4.5  4.1  1.3  0.4
Mexican open‑pit operations:           
Molybdenum contained in concentrate   36.0  32.6  29.6  3.4  3.0
Silver   11.5  11.3  10.1  0.2  1.2
IMMSA unit           
Zinc‑refined and in concentrate   228.5  234.8  237.2  (6.3)  (2.4)
Silver   5.2  5.5  4.3  (0.3)  1.2
Other and intersegment elimination           
Silver   (1.9)  (1.9)  (1.6)  —  (0.3)
Total by‑product sales           
Molybdenum contained in concentrate   59.2  48.6  47.1  10.6  1.5
Zinc‑refined and in concentrate   228.5  234.8  237.2  (6.3)  (2.4)
Silver   20.6  19.4  16.9  1.2  2.5
Peruvian Open-pit Operations:
            Variance
2019 2018 2017 2019 - 2018    2018 - 2017
Net sales $ 2,940.1$ 2,572.2$ 2,244.1$ 367.9$ 328.1
Operating costs and expenses   
(2,085.2)  
(1,802.0)  
(1,617.0)  (283.2)  (185.0)
Operating income $ 854.9$ 770.2$ 627.1$  84.7$ 143.1
Net sales:
2019-2018:  Net sales in 2019 increased by $367.9 million, compared to 2018, mainly as a result of 
higher sales volumes of copper (+26.3%), molybdenum (+44.3%) and silver (+27.6%), partially offset by 
lower copper and molybdenum prices.
2018-2017:  Net sales in 2018 increased by $328.1 million, compared to 2017, mainly as a result of 
higher metal prices and higher copper (+6.9%) and silver (+8.2%) sales volume, partially offset by lower 
molybdenum sales volume (−8.1%).
Table of Contents
84Operating costs and expenses:
2019-2018:  Operating costs and expenses in 2019 increased by $283.2 million, compared to 2018, 
principally due to:
Operating cost and expenses for 2018     $ 1,802.0
Plus:
•Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly due 
to higher repairing materials costs, operating contractors, power costs and higher 
workers’ participation expense; partially offset by lower inventory consumption  and 
lower fuel costs.   192.7
•Higher depreciation, amortization and depletion expense due to our expansion and
maintenance investments.   90.7
•Higher selling, general and administrative expenses.   1.8
Less:    
•Lower exploration expenses.   (2.0)
Operating cost and expenses for 2019 $ 2,085.2
2018-2017:  Operating costs and expenses in 2018 increased by $185.0 million, compared to 2017, 
principally due to:
Operating costs and expenses for 2017     $ 1,617.0
Plus:
•Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly due
to higher inventory consumption, higher fuel costs and higher workers’ participation
expense; partially offset by lower cost of metals purchased from third parties and lower
power costs.   146.6
•Higher depreciation, amortization and depletion expense due to our expansion and
maintenance investments.   33.8
•Higher exploration expenses.   4.1
•Higher selling, general and administrative expenses.   0.5
Operating costs and expenses for 2018 $ 1,802.0
Mexican Open-pit Operations:
Variance
2019     2018     2017     2019 - 2018    2018 - 2017
Net sales $ 3,963.9$ 4,075.9$ 3,972.7$ (112.0)$ 103.2
Operating costs and expenses   
(2,045.4)  
(2,028.7)  
(2,035.7)  (16.7)  7.0
Operating income $ 1,918.5$ 2,047.2$ 1,937.0$ (128.7)$ 110.2
Net sales:
2019-2018:  Net sales in 2019 decreased by $112.0 million, compared to 2018, principally due to lower 
copper and molybdenum prices, partially reduced by higher sales volumes of molybdenum (+10.6%), 
copper (+1.7%) and silver (+1.6%).
2018-2017:  Net sales in 2018 increased by $103.2 million, compared to 2017, mainly due to higher 
metal prices and higher silver (+12.1%) and molybdenum (+10.0%) sales volumes, partially reduced by 
lower copper sales volume (−4.4%).
Table of Contents
85Operating costs and expenses:
2019-2018:  Operating costs and expenses in 2019 increased by $16.7 million, compared to 2018, 
principally due to:
Operating costs and expenses for 2018     $ 2,028.7
Plus:  
•Higher selling, general and administrative expenses.   23.3
•Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly due
to lower capitalized leachable material and higher power costs, largely offset by a lower
cost of metals purchased from third parties.   2.1
Less:    
•Lower depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.  (8.5)
•Lower exploration expenses.   (0.2)
Operating costs and expenses for 2019 $ 2,045.4
2018-2017:  Operating costs and expenses in 2018 decreased by $7.0 million, compared to 2017, mainly 
due to:
Operating costs and expenses for 2017     $ 2,035.7
Less:  
•Lower depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.  (40.6)
•Lower exploration expenses.  (0.7)
Plus:
•Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly due
to lower cost of metals purchased from third parties and higher sales expenses; partially
offset by lower inventory consumption and lower power costs.   16.7
•Reversal in 2017 of over-accrual of Sonora River remediation costs.  10.2
•Higher selling, general and administrative expenses.   7.4
Operating costs and expenses for 2018 $ 2,028.7
IMMSA unit:
 Variance
2019     2018     2017     2019 - 2018    2018 - 2017
Net sales $  464.8$  527.9$  508.7$  (63.1)$  19.2
Operating costs and expenses   (449.5)  (438.6)  (434.9)  (10.9)  (3.7)
Operating income $  15.3$  89.3$  73.8$  (74.0)$  15.5
Net sales:
2019-2018:  Net sales in 2019 decreased $63.1 million, compared to 2018, primarily due to lower silver 
(-6.1%), zinc (-2.6%) and copper (-1.9%) sales volumes, as well as lower copper and zinc prices.
2018-2017:  Net sales in 2018 increased $19.2 million, compared to 2017, primarily due to higher metal 
prices and higher copper (+22.9%) and silver (+27.2%) sales volumes, slightly offset by lower zinc sales 
volume (−1.0%).pa
Table of Contents
86Operating costs and expenses:
2019-2018:  Operating costs and expenses in 2019 increased by $10.9 million, compared to 2018, 
principally due to:
Operating costs and expenses for 2018     $  438.6
Plus:  
• Higher depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.  4.7
• Higher exploration expenses.  3.8
• Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion)
mainly due to higher inventory consumption and higher repairing materials
costs, partially offset by lower cost of metals purchased from third parties.   3.0
Less:
• Lower selling, general and administrative expenses.   (0.6)
Operating costs and expenses for 2019 $  449.5
2018-2017:  Operating costs and expenses in 2018 increased $3.7 million, compared to 2017, mainly due 
to:
Operating costs and expenses for 2017     $  434.9
Plus:  
• Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion)
mainly due to higher power costs and higher workers’ participation expense;
partially offset by lower cost of metals purchased from third parties and
foreign currency effect.  11.9
• Higher selling, general and administrative expenses.  0.6
Less:
• Lower depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.  (8.6)
• Lower exploration expenses.   (0.2)
Operating costs and expenses for 2018 $  438.6
Intersegment Eliminations and Adjustments:
The net sales, operating costs and expenses and operating income discussed above will not be directly
equal to amounts in our consolidated statement of earnings because the adjustments of intersegment
operating revenues and expenses must be taken into account. Please see Note 18 “Segment and Related
Information” of our consolidated financial statements.
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
The following discussion relates to our liquidity and capital resources for each of the years in the
three year period ended December 31, 2019.
Cash Flow:
The following table shows the cash flow for the three year period ended December 31, 2019 (in
millions):
 Variance
2019    2018     2017     2019 - 2018    2018 - 2017
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 
1,911.9$ 2,235.1$ 1,976.6$ (323.2)$ 258.5
Net cash used in investing activities $ (574.0)$ 
(1,296.2)$ 
(1,019.0)$ 722.2$ (277.2)
Net cash used in financing activities $ (262.2)$ 
(1,083.4)$ (456.1)$ 821.2$ (627.3)
Table of Contents
Net cash provided by operating activities:
The 2019, 2018 and 2017 change in net cash from operating activities include (in millions):
 Variance
2019     2018     2017     2019 - 2018    2018 - 2017
Net income $ 
1,491.9$ 
1,548.2$ 732.4$ (56.3)$ 815.8
Depreciation, amortization and depletion   764.4  674.3  671.1  90.1  3.2
Provision (benefit) for deferred income taxes   (21.0)  (51.5)  641.5  30.5  (693.0)
Loss (gain) on foreign currency transaction effect  17.9  17.3  24.9  0.6  (7.6)
Other adjustments to net income   5.7  23.1  (3.4)  (17.4)  26.5
Operating assets and liabilities   (347.0)  23.7  (89.9)  (370.7)  113.6
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 
1,911.9$ 
2,235.1$ 
1,976.6$ (323.2)$ 258.5
Significant items added to (deducted from) net income to arrive at operating cash flow include
depreciation, amortization and depletion, deferred tax amounts and changes in operating assets and
liabilities. In 2017, we recorded a non-cash tax charge of $785.9 million related to the U.S. tax law
change enacted in December 2017.
2019:  Net income was $1,491.9 million, approximately 78% of the net cash provided from operating 
activities. A net decrease in operating assets and liabilities decreased operating cash flow by 
$347.0 million and included:
●$(184.9) million decrease in accounts payable and accrued liabilities, which included principally
income taxes and workers’ participation payments as a result of higher earnings at our Mexican and
Peruvian operations in 2018.
●$(10.5) million increase in trade accounts receivable mainly because of higher sales volumes at our
Peruvian operations.
●$(88.7) million of net increase in inventory, which included $(83.2) million of higher leaching
inventory and $(17.6) million of higher finished goods mainly at our Mexican operations.
●$(62.9) million increase in other operating assets and liabilities which included principally an
increase in prepaid taxes in our Mexican operations due to changes in tax legislation.
2018:  Net income was $1,548.2 million, approximately 69% of the net cash provided from operating 
activities. A net increase in operating assets and liabilities increased operating cash flow by $23.7 million 
and included:
●$117.8 million increase in accounts payable and accrued liabilities.
●$68.3 million decrease in trade accounts receivable.
●$(190.8) million of net increase in inventory, which included $(207.1) million of higher leaching
inventory, $(20.7) million of higher finished goods and $(14.0) million of higher supplies inventories
for our operations, partially offset by $51.2 million of lower metals in process inventory.
●$28.4 million decrease in other operating assets and liabilities.
2017:  Net income was $732.4 million, approximately 37% of the net cash provided from operating 
activities. A net increase in operating assets and liabilities decreased operating cash flow by $89.9 million 
and included:
●$(298.7) million increase in accounts receivable.
●$(201.9) million of net increase in inventory, which included $(180.4) million of higher leaching
inventory, $(26.8) million of higher supplies inventories for our operations and $(76.3) million of
higher metals in process, partially offset by $81.6 million of lower finished goods inventory.
●$139.5 million increase in accounts payable and accrued liabilities, which included $75.6 million of
higher accounts payable, $51.5 million of higher accrued workers’ participation and $12.4 million of
higher other liabilities.
●$271.2 million decrease in other operating assets and liabilities, which included principally
$163.9 million of lower prepaid taxes, mainly due to the use of tax credits from previous years.
87
Table of Contents
88Net cash used in investing activities:
2019:  Net cash used for investing activities in 2019 included $707.5 million for capital investments. 
These included $357.4 million of investments at our Mexican operations and $350.1 million of 
investments at our Peruvian operations. For further information, please see “Capital Investment Program” 
under this Item on page 73.
The 2019 investing activities also include net sales of short-term investments of $133.1 million.
2018:  Net cash used for investing activities in 2018 included $1,121.4 million for capital investments. 
These included $347.4 million of investments at our Mexican operations and $774.0 million of 
investments at our Peruvian operations. For further information, please see “Capital Investment Program” 
under this Item on page 73.
The 2018 investing activities also include net purchases of short-term investments of $163.3 million.
2017:  Net cash used for investing activities in 2017 included $1,023.5 million for capital investments. 
These included $338.1 million of investments at our Mexican operations and $685.4 million of 
investments at our Peruvian operations. For further information, please see “Capital Investment Program” 
under this Item on page 73.
The 2017 investing activities also include net sales of short-term investments of $1.0 million.
Net cash used in financing activities:
2019:  Net cash used in financing activities in 2019 was $262.2 million and mainly included:
●A dividend distribution of $1,236.9 million.
●Gross proceeds of $987.3 million from the issuance of senior notes by our Mexican subsidiary.
●Payment of debt issuance costs of $9.8 million.
2018:  Net cash used in financing activities in 2018 was $1,083.4 million and included a dividend 
distribution of $1,082.3 million.
2017:  Net cash used in financing activities in 2017 was $456.1 million and included a dividend 
distribution of $456.1 million.
Other Liquidity Considerations
We expect that we will meet our cash requirements for 2020 and beyond from cash on hand and
internally generated funds. In addition, we believe that we will be able to access additional external
financing on reasonable terms, if required.
As of December 31, 2019, $1,106.7 million of the Company´s total cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash
and short-term investments of $2,005.8 million were held by foreign subsidiaries. The cash, cash
equivalents and short-term investments maintained in our foreign operations are generally used to cover
local operating and investment expenses. At December 31, 2017, Minera Mexico had determined that it
had earnings available for dividends to the United States of $555.5 million. The 2017 U.S. tax reform
introduced a one-time transition tax that is based upon the higher of the Company’s total accumulated
post-1986 deferred income as of November 2, 2017 or December 31, 2017, estimated to be $8.9 billion, 
the majority of which was previously considered to be indefinitely reinvested and accordingly, no U.S. 
federal and state income taxes were provided. During 2018, the Company finalized its transition tax at 
$153.1 million, which was fully offset by foreign tax credits.  Upon enactment of the 2017 U.S. tax 
reform, the Company had calculated and recorded in 2017 a provisional amount of $181.1 million and 
reduced it by $28 million in 2018 when the calculation was finalized.  Earnings of the Company’s 
Peruvian branch are not subject to transition taxes since they are taxed in the United States on a current 
basis.
Table of Contents
89Share repurchase program:  In 2008, our Board of Directors (“BOD”) authorized a $500 million share 
repurchase program that has since been increased by the BOD and is currently authorized to $3 billion. 
Since the inception of the program through December 31, 2018, we have purchased 119.5 million shares 
of our common stock at a cost of $2.9 billion. These shares are available for general corporate purposes. 
We may purchase additional shares of our common stock from time to time based on market conditions 
and other factors. This repurchase program has no expiration date and may be modified or discontinued 
at any time. For further details please see Item 5 “Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related 
Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities—SCC common stock repurchase plan.”
Dividend:  On February 20, 2020, the BOD authorized a dividend of $0.40 per share to be paid on March 
24, 2020, to shareholders of record at the close of business on March 10, 2020. 
FINANCING
Our total debt at December 31, 2019 was $6,940.8 million, compared to $5,960.1 million at
December 31, 2018, net of the unamortized discount and issuance costs of notes issued under par of
$110.4 million and $94.1 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively. This debt is all
denominated in dollars at fixed interest rates, weighed at 5.69%.
The ratio of total debt to total capitalization was 50.2% at December 31, 2019, compared to 47.4% at
December 31, 2018. In addition, the ratio of net debt to net capitalization was 41.8% at December 31,
2019, compared to 42.6% at December 31, 2018.
We define net debt as total debt, including current maturities, minus cash, cash equivalents and short-term
investments balance. We believe that net debt is useful to investors as a measure of our financial position.
We define net capitalization as the sum of net debt and equity. We use the net debt to net capitalization
ratio as measure of our indebtedness position and to determine how much debt we can take in addition to
the use of the equity and the balance sheet in general. We define total capitalization as the sum of the
carrying values of our total debt, including current maturities, and equity. A reconciliation of our net debt
to net capitalization and total debt to total capitalization as included in the consolidated balance sheet is
presented under the sub heading “Non-GAAP Information Reconciliation” below.
Please see Note 11 “Financing” for a discussion about the covenants requirements related to our long-
term debt.
Capital investment programs
A discussion of our capital investment programs is an important part of understanding our liquidity and
capital resources. We expect to meet the cash requirements for these capital investments from cash on
hand, internally generated funds and from additional external financing if required. For information
regarding our capital expenditure programs, please see the discussion under the caption “Capital
Investment Program” under this Item 7.
Table of Contents
CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATIONS
The following table summarizes our significant contractual obligations as of December 31, 2019:
 Payments due by Period
                            2025 and
Total 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 Thereafter
 (dollars in millions)
Long‑term debt $ 7,051.1$ 400.0$  — $ 300.0$  — $  — $ 6,351.1
Interest on debt   7,890.0  378.8  380.0  378.4  369.4  369.5  6,013.9
Uncertain tax
position(a)   68.9  9.8  0.7  —   —   —   —
Workers’ participation  174.9  174.9  —   —   —   —   —
Pension and
post‑retirement
obligations   40.1  4.5  3.2  3.3  3.4  3.7  22.0
Operating leases  1,386.5  116.1  116.0  112.9  111.6  103.6  826.3
Asset retirement
obligation   262.3  -  —   —   —   —   262.3
Purchase obligations:         
Commitments to
purchase energy   3,077.5  237.3  239.5  239.5  257.6  257.6  1,846.0
Capital investment
projects   198.2  198.2  —   —   —   —   —
Total $ 
20,149.5$ 
1,519.6$ 739.4$ 
1,034.1$ 742.0$ 734.4$ 
15,321.6
(a)The above table does not include any scheduled payments related to U.S. uncertain tax position
liabilities because there is often a high degree of uncertainty regarding the timing of future cash
outflows. As of December 31, 2019, the tax liability recognized by the Company is $68.9 million and
is included as non-current liability in the consolidated Balance Sheet. Please refer to Note 7 “Income
Taxes” of our consolidated financial statements.
Long-term debt payments do not include the debt discount valuation account and issuance costs of
$110.3 million.
Interest on debt is calculated at rates in effect at December 31, 2019. As all our debt is at fixed rates,
future expenditures will not change due to rate changes. Please refer to Note 11 “Financing” of our
consolidated financial statements for a description of our long-term debt arrangements and credit
facilities.
Workers’ participation is currently calculated based on Peruvian Branch and Mexican pre-tax earnings. In
Peru, the provision for workers’ participation is calculated at 8% of pre-tax earnings. The current portion
of this participation, which is accrued during the year, is based on the Peruvian Branch’s taxable income
and is largely distributed to workers following determination of final results for the year. Amounts in
excess of 18 times a worker’s salary is distributed to governmental bodies. In Mexico, workers’
participation is determined using the guidelines established in the Mexican income tax law at a rate of
10% of pre-tax earnings as adjusted by the tax law.
Operating leases include lease payments for power generating facilities to MGE, vehicles and properties.
Please refer to Note 9 “Leases” of our consolidated financial statements.
Pension and post retirement obligations include the benefits expected to be paid under our pension and
post-retirement benefit plans. Please refer to Note 12 “Benefit Plans” of our consolidated financial
statements.
Asset retirement obligations include the aggregate amount of the closure and remediation costs of our
Peruvian mines and facilities to be paid under the mine closure plans approved by MINEM and the
closure and remediation costs of our Mexican operations. See Note 10 “Asset Retirement Obligation.”
In June 2014, we entered into a power purchase agreement for 120 megawatt (“MW”) with the state
company Electroperu S.A., which began supplying energy for our Peruvian operations for twenty years
starting on April 17, 2017. In July 2014, we entered into a power purchase agreement for 120MW with a
private power generator Kallpa Generacion S.A. (“Kallpa”), which began supplying energy for our
90Peruvian operations for ten years starting on April 17, 2017. In May 2016, we signed an additional power
purchase agreement for a maximum of 80MW with Kallpa,
Table of Contents
91under which Kallpa will supply energy for the operations related to the Toquepala Expansion and other
minor projects for ten years starting on May 1, 2017 and ending after ten years of commercial operation
of the Toquepala Expansion or on April 30, 2029; whichever occurs first.
Also we have a commitment to purchase power for our Mexican operations from MGE, a subsidiary of
Grupo Mexico through 2032. See Note 13 “Commitment and Contingencies—Other commitments”.
Amounts indicated on the above table are based on our long-term estimated power costs, which are
subject to change as energy generation costs change and our forecasted power requirements through the
life of the agreements change. Capital investment projects include committed purchase orders and
executed contracts for our Mexican projects, and for our Peruvian expansion projects at Tia Maria and the
Toquepala mine.
CYBERSECURITY:
Our operations depend upon information technology systems which may be subject to disruption, damage
or failure from different sources, including, without limitation, installation of malicious software,
computer viruses, security breaches, cyber-attacks and defects in design. In recent years, cybersecurity
incidents have increased in frequency and include, but are not limited to, malicious software, attempts to
gain unauthorized access to data and other electronic security breaches that could lead to disruptions in
systems, unauthorized release of confidential or otherwise protected information and the corruption of
data. We have implemented appropriate preventative measures to mitigate potential risks by
implementing an information security management system, which ensures putting into effect controls that
are frequently reviewed and tested, including a risk matrix that considers all the possible threats with an
impact and probability analysis, actions to avoid or mitigate them and the corresponding testing plan.
NON-GAAP INFORMATION RECONCILIATION
Operating cash cost:  Following is a reconciliation of “Operating Cash Cost” (see page 70) to cost of 
sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) as reported in our consolidated statement of 
earnings, in millions of dollars and dollars per pound in the table below:
2019  2018  2017
    $ per         $ per         $ per
$ millions pound $ millions pound $ millions pound
Cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation,
amortization and depletion) $ 3,606.4 $ 1.69 $ 3,409.0 $ 1.81 $ 3,252.8 $ 1.74
Add:             
Selling, general and administrative   131.8   0.06   102.6   0.05   93.1   0.05
Sales premiums, net of treatment and refining
charges   28.7   0.02   13.9   0.01   22.4   0.01
Less:       
Workers’  participation   (214.5)   (0.10)   (226.1)   (0.12)   (196.2)   (0.11)
Cost of metals purchased from third parties   (263.4)   (0.12)   (384.5)   (0.20)   (363.2)   (0.19)
Royalty char ge and other , net   (125.7)   (0.06)   (125.0)   (0.07)   (150.5)   (0.08)
Inventory change   67.6   0.03   114.5   0.06   139.1   0.07
Operating Cash Cost befor e by‑product
revenues $ 3,230.9 $ 1.52 $ 2,904.4 $ 1.54 $ 2,797.5 $ 1.49
Add:                   
By‑product revenues(1)   
(1,307.3)   (0.61)   
(1,21 1.4)   (0.64)   
(1,030.2)   (0.55)
Net revenue on sale of metal purchased from
third parties   (51.9)   (0.03)   (56.3)   (0.03)   (50.2)   (0.02)
Total by‑product revenues   
(1,359.2)   (0.64)   
(1,267.7)   (0.67)   
(1,080.4)   (0.57)
Operating Cash Cost net of by ‑product
revenues   1,871.7   0.88   1,636.7   0.87   1,717.1   0.92
Total pounds of copper produced (in millions)   2,133.3      1,886.8      1,874.5    
Table of Contents
92(1)By-product revenues included in our presentation of operating cash cost contain the following:
2019  2018  2017
    $ per         $ per         $ per
$ millions pound $ millions pound $ millions pound
Molybdenum $ (549.4)$  (0.26)$ (509.9)$  (0.27)$ (353.4)$  (0.19)
Silver   (278.3)  (0.13)  (244.5)  (0.13)  (254.9)  (0.14)
Zinc   (211.5)  (0.10)  (229.5)  (0.12)  (221.6)  (0.12)
Sulfuric Acid   (158.8)  (0.07)  (111.3)  (0.06)  (71.9)  (0.04)
Gold   (53.2)  (0.03)  (53.1)  (0.03)  (61.7)  (0.03)
Other   (56.1)  (0.02)  (63.1)  (0.03)  (66.7)  (0.03)
Total $ (1,307.3)$  (0.61)$ (1,211.4)$  (0.64)$ (1,030.2)$  (0.55)
The by-product revenue presented does not match with the sales value reported by segment on page 150
because the above table excludes purchases from third parties, which are reclassified to net revenue on
sale of metal purchased from third parties.
Net debt to net capitalization:  Net debt to net capitalization as of December 31, 2019 and 2018 is as 
follows:
    2019     2018
Total debt $ 6,940.8 $ 5,960.1
Cash and cash equivalents   
(1,925.1)  (844.6)
Short‑term investments   (80.7)  (213.8)
Net debt   4,935.0   4,901.7
Net capitalization:       
Net debt   4,935.0   4,901.7
Equity   6,858.2   6,612.8
Net capitalization $ 
11,793.2 $ 
11,514.5
Net debt/net capitalization(*)   41.8%    42.6%
(*)Represents net debt divided by net capitalization.
Total debt to total capitalization:  Total debt to total capitalization as of December 31, 2019 and 2018 is 
as follows:
    2019     2018
Total debt $ 6,940.8 $ 5,960.1
Capitalization       
Debt   6,940.8   5,960.1
Equity   6,858.2   6,612.8
Total capitalization $ 
13,799.0 $ 
12,572.9
Total debt/total capitalization(*)   50.3%    47.4%
(*)Represents debt divided by total capitalization.
Table of Contents
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
Commodity price risk:
For additional information on metal price sensitivity, refer to “Metal Prices” in Part II, Item 7 of this
annual report.
Open sales risk:
Our provisional copper and molybdenum sales contain an embedded derivative that is required to be
separate from the host contract for accounting purposes. The host contract is the receivable from the sale
of copper or molybdenum concentrates at prevailing market prices at the time of the sale. The embedded
derivative, which does not qualify for hedge accounting, is marked to market through earnings each
period prior to settlement. See Note 18 to our consolidated financial statements for further information
about these provisional sales.
Foreign currency exchange rate risk:
Our functional currency is the U.S. dollar. Portions of our operating costs are denominated in Peruvian
soles and Mexican pesos. Since our revenues are primarily denominated in U.S. dollars, when inflation or
deflation in our Mexican or Peruvian operations is not offset by a change in the exchange rate of the sol
or the peso to the dollar, our financial position, results of operations and cash flows could be affected by
local cost conversion when expressed in U.S. dollars. In addition, the dollar value of our net monetary
assets denominated in soles or pesos can be affected by an exchange rate variance of the sol or the peso,
resulting in a re-measurement gain or loss in our financial statements. Recent inflation and exchange rate
variances for the three years ended December 31, 2019, are provided in the table below:
    Year Ended
December  31, 
    2019     2018     2017
Peru:          
Peruvian inflation rate   1.9%   2.5%  1.5%
Initial exchange rate   3.379   3.245   3.360
Closing exchange rate   3.317   3.379   3.245
Appreciation/(devaluation)   1.8%   (4.1) %  3.4%
Mexico:          
Mexican inflation rate   2.8%   4.8%  6.8%
Initial exchange rate   
19.683   
19.735   
20.664
Closing exchange rate   
18.845   
19.683   
19.735
Appreciation/(devaluation)   4.3%   0.3%  4.5%
Change in monetary position:
Assuming an exchange rate variance of 10% at December 31, 2019, we estimate our net monetary
position in Peruvian sol and Mexican peso would increase (decrease) our net earnings as follows:
    Effect in net
 earnings
 ($ in millions)
Appreciation of 10% in U.S. dollar vs. Peruvian sol $  18.0
Devaluation of 10% in U.S. dollar vs. Peruvian sol $  (22.0)
Appreciation of 10% in U.S. dollar vs. Mexican peso $  (9.7)
Devaluation of 10% in U.S. dollar vs. Mexican peso $  11.8
The net monetary position is net of those assets and liabilities that are sol or peso denominated at
December 31, 2019.
Short-term investments:
For additional information on our trading securities and available-for-sale investments, refer to Note 3
Short-term Investments in Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
93
Table of Contents
94ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTAL DATA
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of Southern Copper Corporation:
Opinion on the Consolidated Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Southern Copper Corporation and
subsidiaries (the “Company”) as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the related consolidated statements of
earnings, comprehensive income, changes in stockholders´ equity, and cash flows for each of the
three years in the period ended December 31, 2019 and the related notes and schedule listed in the Index
at Item 15 (collectively referred to as the “consolidated financial statements”). In our opinion, the
consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the
Company as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each
of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019, in conformity with accounting principles
generally accepted in the United States of America.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight
Board (United States) (“PCAOB”), the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2019, based on criteria established in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013)
issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission and our report dated
February 28, 2020 expressed an unqualified opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial
reporting.
Basis for Opinion
These consolidated financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our
responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s consolidated financial statements based on our
audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent
with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable
rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that
we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial
statements are free of material misstatement whether due to error or fraud. Our audits included
performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the consolidated financial
statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the
consolidated financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and
significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the
consolidated financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current-period audit of the
financial statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and
that (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are material to the financial statements and (2) involved our
especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters
does not alter in any way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by
communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters
or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Table of Contents
Ore stockpiles on Leach Pads– Refer to Note 4 to the consolidated financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company has recorded Ore stockpiles on leach pads of $1,588.7 million as of December 31, 2019
($358.4 million presented as current and $1,230.3 million presented as non-current assets.
The Company used the copper content grade when determining the capitalization of inventory costs
related to leachable material. The leachable material inventory determined could be misstated if the
monthly average copper content grade and the solubility index used by the Company does not correspond
to the actual results obtained from the laboratories.
We identified the copper content grade and solubility index as a critical audit matter because of the
significant judgments made by management to support its assertion that these capitalized costs are
probable of recovery and the historical recovery data for leachable material. This required a high degree
of auditor judgment in evaluating whether the audit evidence obtained supports management’s assertion
that these costs are probable of future recovery.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to a reasonable determination of copper content grade and the solubility
index, to determine the appropriate amounts of extraction and movement of material that is capitalized
included the following, among others:
●We tested the effectiveness of controls over management’s review of the copper content grade used
to determine the monthly average rate to be used in the calculation, which included an evaluation of
the competence, objectivity and authority of the personnel involved in the determination of the
copper content grade and the solubility index.
●We developed an independent expectation of the amounts of leachable material that should have
been capitalized and amortized to compare it to the recorded balances.
●We independently recalculated the monthly average copper content grade and the monthly average
solubility index to obtain the reasonability of the inputs used in the estimate.
●We involved technical specialists to review the methodology used by the Company to determine the
recoverability of copper from the leach pads and challenge, from a technical perspective, the
reasonableness of the procedures performed by the Company to determine the copper recoverability.
Uncertain Tax Positions (Deferred income tax) – Refer to Note 7 to the consolidated financial
statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Company’s uncertain tax positions (UTPs) as of December 31, 2019, were $68.9 million, and mainly
related to leach dump inventory, book leach amortization and penalties and duties related to lack of
supporting documentation for disposals of machinery and equipment.
We identified the UTPs as a critical audit matter because of the multiple jurisdictions in which the
Company files its tax returns and the complexity of the tax laws and regulations. This identification
process includes resolution of any related appeals or litigation processes that are based on the technical
merits of the position. As the Company operates in three different jurisdictions, this require a high degree
of auditor judgment and an increased extent of effort, including the need to involve our income tax
specialists.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to UTPs included the following, among others:
● We tested the effectiveness of internal controls that address management processes to identify,
evaluate, value, record and disclose significant UTPs.
● With the assistance of our income tax specialists, we evaluated the reasonableness of management’s
assumptions by considering how the tax law, including statutes, regulations and case law, impacted
the judgments made, obtained an understanding of potential UTPs through inquiries with
management and the tax department and the review of the annual tax returns filed, reviewed the
UTP calculations prepared by management and the disclosures
95
Table of Contents
96in the footnotes.
● With the assistance of our income tax specialists, we read and evaluated management’s
documentation, including relevant accounting policies and the detailed basis for the UTPs and
obtained confirmation letters from the Company’s external lawyers to evaluate whether any tax
contingency exists to determine the completeness of the UTPs identified.
● With the assistance of our income tax specialists, we tested the reasonableness of management’s
judgments regarding the future resolution of the uncertain tax positions, including an evaluation of
the technical merits of the uncertain tax positions.
● We evaluated whether the estimates of UTPs were consistent with evidence obtained in other areas
of the audit.
Estimate of Tia Maria Project Impairment Indicators (Property and mine development,  net)– 
Refer to Notes 5 and 13 to the consolidated financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
The Tia Maria mining project in Peru received the construction license approval from the Peruvian
Mining Council on October 30, 2019. This project budget is approximately $1.4 billion and has an
investment as of December 31, 2019 of approximately $339 million including investment in property,
plant and equipment of $214 million and $125 million representing intangible assets primarily composed
of engineering studies and the Environmental Impact Study (EIS). The Company evaluates whether there
is an indicator that the project’s intangible assets are impaired when events or changes in economic
circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of such assets may not be recoverable. This requires the
Company’s management to evaluate business plans that include assumptions about future metal prices,
costs and other economic variables.
We identified the determination of impairment indicators as a critical audit matter because of the
significant assumptions the Company’s management makes when evaluating the business plans used to
determine whether the project’s intangible assets are recoverable. This required a high degree of auditor
judgment when performing audit procedures to evaluate whether management appropriately identified
impairment indicators.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to identification of events or changes in circumstances that may indicate the
carrying amount of the intangibles related to the Tia Maria Project may not be recoverable included the
following, among others:
●We tested the effectiveness of controls over management’s identification of possible circumstances
that may indicate that the carrying amounts of the project’s assets are no longer recoverable.
●We discussed with the Company’s management the assumptions used in the business plans,
evaluated the consistency of the assumptions used with evidence obtained in other areas of the audit,
and searched for any adverse asset-specific and/or market conditions.
●We assessed the impact of changing the key assumptions in the business plan such as copper price
and cost changes (increases/decreases), among others on the recoverable amount.
Galaz, Yamazaki, Ruiz Urquiza, S.C.
Member of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu Limited
/s/ DANIEL TOLEDO ANTONIO
C.P.C. Daniel Toledo Antonio
We have served as the Company’s auditor since
2009
Mexico City, Mexico
February 28, 2020
Table of Contents
97Southern Copper Corporation
and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF EARNINGS
        
For the years ended December 31, (in millions, except for per
share amounts) 2019 2018 2017
Net sales (including sales to related parties, see
Note 17) $ 7,285.6 $ 7,096.7 $ 6,654.5
Operating cost and expenses:
Cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation,
amortization and depletion shown separately
below)  3,606.4  3,409.0  3,252.8
Selling, general and administrative  131.8  102.6  93.1
Depreciation, amortization and depletion  764.4  674.3  671.1
Exploration  30.0  29.6  28.8
Environmental remediation — — (10.2)
Total operating costs and expenses  4,532.6  4,215.5  4,035.6
Operating income  2,753.0  2,881.2  2,618.9
Interest expense  (372.9) (360.9) (357.4)
Capitalized interest  32.2  83.8  51.4
Other income (expense)  (7.0) (30.7) (15.7)
Interest income  21.2  16.0  5.5
Income before income taxes  2,426.5  2,589.4  2,302.7
Income taxes (including royalty taxes, see Note 7) 966.3  1,105.0  951.7
Deferred income taxes (21.0) (51.5) 641.7
Net income before equity earnings of affiliate  1,481.2  1,535.9  709.3
Equity earnings (loss) of affiliate, net of income tax 10.7  12.3  23.1
Net income  1,491.9  1,548.2  732.4
Less: Net income attributable to the non-controlling
interest  6.1  5.2  3.9
Net income attributable to SCC $ 1,485.8 $ 1,543.0 $ 728.5
Per common share amounts attributable to SCC:
Net earnings-basic and diluted $ 1.92 $ 2.00 $ 0.94
Weighted average shares outstanding-basic and
diluted  773.1  773.0  773.0
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
98Southern Copper Corporation
and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
2019     2018     2017
(in millions)
COMPREHENSIVE INCOME:
Net income and comprehensive income $1,491.9$1,548.2$732.4
Other comprehensive income (loss) net of tax:
—Decrease (increase) in pension and other post-retirement benefits
(net of income tax of $3.7, $2.1 and $(1.6), respectively)  (7.7) (2.9) 2.6
—Foreign currency translation adjustments — — 0.3
Total other comprehensive income (loss)  (7.7) (2.9) 2.9
Total comprehensive income  1,484.2 1,545.3 735.3
Comprehensive income attributable to the non-controlling interest  6.1 5.2 3.9
Comprehensive income attributable to SCC $1,478.1$1,540.1$731.4
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
99Southern Copper Corporation
and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
December 31, December 31, 
    2019     2018
(in millions)
ASSETS
Current assets:
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,925.1 $ 844.6
Short-term investments  80.7  213.8
Accounts receivable trade  832.9  822.4
Accounts receivable other (including related parties 2019- $30.0 and 2018 - $101.5)  78.9  150.2
Inventories  1,068.5  1,032.7
Prepaid taxes 172.4 87.0
Other current assets  26.2  29.3
Total current assets  4,184.7  3,180.0
Property and mine development, net  9,371.0  9,403.8
Ore stockpiles on leach pads  1,230.3  1,177.4
Intangible assets, net  148.4  147.7
Related parties receivable 59.5 —
Right-of-use assets  1,046.4  —
Deferred income tax  183.9  203.7
Equity method investment  111.9  103.6
Other non-current assets  71.3  71.4
Total assets $ 16,407.4 $ 14,287.6
LIABILITIES
Current liabilities:
Current portion of long-term debt $ 399.8 $ —
Accounts payable (including related parties 2019- $86.4 and 2018- $75.3) 598.3 673.4
Accrued income taxes  116.3  232.8
Accrued workers’ participation  174.9  206.7
Accrued interest  96.0  83.9
Lease liabilities current 68.6 —
Other accrued liabilities  22.6  19.5
Total current liabilities  1,476.5  1,216.3
Long-term debt  6,541.0  5,960.1
Lease liabilities 977.8 —
Deferred income taxes  178.3  212.5
Non-current taxes payable 0.7 —
Other liabilities and reserves  112.6  68.2
Asset retirement obligation  262.3  217.7
Total non-current liabilities  8,072.7  6,458.5
Commitments and contingencies (Note 13)
STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY (NOTE 14)
Common stock par value $0.01; shares authorized, 2019 and 2018–2,000; shares issued, 2019
and 2018–884.6  8.8  8.8
Additional paid-in capital  3,424.9  3,393.7
Retained earnings  6,435.6  6,186.9
Accumulated other comprehensive income  (10.1) (2.4)
Treasury stock, at cost, common shares  (3,048.9) (3,019.6)
Total Southern Copper Corporation stockholders’ equity  6,810.3  6,567.4
Non-controlling interest  47.9  45.4
Total equity  6,858.2  6,612.8
Total liabilities and equity $ 16,407.4 $ 14,287.6
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
100Southern Copper Corporation
and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
            
2019 2018 2017
OPERATING ACTIVITIES
Net income $ 1,491.9 $ 1,548.2 $ 732.4
Adjustments to reconcile net earnings to net cash provided from
operating activities:
Depreciation, amortization and depletion  764.4  674.3  671.1
Equity earnings of affiliate, net of dividends received  (6.3) (3.9) (12.3)
Loss on foreign currency transaction effect  17.9  17.3  24.9
(Benefit) provision for deferred income taxes  (21.0) (51.5) 641.5
Other, net  12.0  27.0  8.9
Change in operating assets and liabilities:
(Increase) decrease in accounts receivable  (10.5) 68.3  (298.7)
(Increase) in inventories  (88.7) (190.8) (201.9)
Increase (decrease) in accounts payable and accrued liabilities  (184.9) 117.8  139.5
(Increase) decrease in other operating assets and liabilities  (62.9) 28.4  271.2
Net cash provided by operating activities  1,911.9  2,235.1  1,976.6
INVESTING ACTIVITIES
Capital expenditures  (707.5) (1,121.4) (1,023.5)
Purchase of short-term investments  (284.4) (310.6) (61.3)
Proceeds on sale of short-term investment  417.5  147.3  62.3
Other, net  0.4  (11.5) 3.5
Net cash used in investing activities  (574.0) (1,296.2) (1,019.0)
FINANCING ACTIVITIES
Proceeds from issuance of debt 987.3 — —
Capitalization of debt issuance cost (9.8) — —
Cash dividends paid to common stockholders  (1,236.9) (1,082.3) (456.1)
SCC shareholder derivative lawsuit — received from AMC 36.5 — —
SCC shareholder derivative lawsuit — dividend paid (36.5) — —
Distributions to non-controlling interest  (3.2) (1.5) (0.3)
Other, net  0.4  0.4  0.3
Net cash provided by (used in) financing activities  (262.2) (1,083.4) (456.1)
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents  4.8  (15.7) (42.7)
Increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents  1,080.5  (160.2) 458.8
Cash and cash equivalents, at beginning of year  844.6  1,004.8  546.0
Cash and cash equivalents, at end of year $ 1,925.1 $ 844.6 $ 1,004.8
    2019     2018     2017
(in millions)
Supplemental disclosure of cash flow information:
Cash paid during the year for:
Interest $ 356.7 $ 356.7 $ 356.7
Income taxes $1,138.7 $1,155.3 $ 889.8
Workers’ participation $ 224.5 $ 194.0 $ 136.0
Supplemental schedule of non-cash operating, investing and financing activities:
Decrease (increase) in pension and other post-retirement benefits $ (7.7)$ (2.9)$ 2.9
Capital expenditures incurred but not yet paid $ 2.1 $ 37.7 $ 137.7
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
101Southern Copper Corporation
and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CHANGES IN EQUITY
        
(in millions) 2019 2018 2017
TOTAL EQUITY, beginning of period $6,612.8$6,149.4$5,870.9
STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY, beginning of period  6,567.4 6,107.7 5,832.3
CAPITAL STOCK:
Balance at beginning and end of period:  8.8 8.8 8.8
ADDITIONAL PAID-IN CAPITAL:
Balance at beginning of period  3,393.7 3,373.3 3,358.2
Other activity of the period  31.2 20.4 15.1
Balance at end of period  3,424.9 3,393.7 3,373.3
TREASURY STOCK:
Southern Copper common shares
Balance at beginning of the period  (2,768.3) (2,768.7) (2,769.0)
Used for corporate purposes  0.4 0.4 0.3
Balance at end of period  (2,767.9) (2,768.3) (2,768.7)
Parent Company common shares
Balance at beginning of period  (251.3) (232.4) (218.6)
Other activity, including dividend, interest and foreign
currency transaction effect  (29.7) (18.9) (13.8)
Balance at end of period  (281.0) (251.3) (232.4)
Treasury stock balance at end of period  (3,048.9) (3,019.6) (3,001.1)
RETAINED EARNINGS:
Balance at beginning of period  6,186.9 5,726.2 5,455.3
Net earnings  1,485.8 1,543.0 728.5
Dividends declared and paid, common stock, per share, 2019-
$1.6, 2018– $1.4 2017 - $0.59  (1,236.9) (1,082.3) (456.1)
SCC shareholder derivative lawsuit — received from AMC 36.5 — —
SCC shareholder derivative lawsuit — dividend paid (36.5) — —
Other activity of the period (0.2) — (1.5)
Balance at end of period  6,435.6 6,186.9 5,726.2
ACCUMULATED OTHER COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(LOSS):
Balance at beginning and end of period  (2.4) 0.5 (2.4)
Other comprehensive income (loss)  (7.7) (2.9) 2.9
Balance at end of year  (10.1) (2.4) 0.5
STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY, end of period  6,810.3 6,567.4 6,107.7
NON-CONTROLLING INTEREST, beginning of period  45.4 41.7 38.6
Net earnings  6.1 5.2 3.9
Distributions paid  (3.6) (1.5) (0.8)
NON-CONTROLLING INTEREST, end of period  47.9 45.4 41.7
TOTAL EQUITY, end of period $6,858.2$6,612.8$6,149.4
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
102NOTE 1—DESCRIPTION OF THE BUSINESS:
The Company is a majority-owned, indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico S.A.B. de C.V. (“Grupo
Mexico”). At December 31, 2019, Grupo Mexico through its wholly-owned subsidiary Americas Mining
Corporation (“AMC”) owned 88.9% of the Company’s capital stock. The consolidated financial
statements presented herein consist of the accounts of Southern Copper Corporation ("SCC", "Southern
Copper" or the “Company”), a Delaware corporation, and its subsidiaries. The Company is an integrated
producer of copper and other minerals, and operates mining, smelting and refining facilities in Peru and
Mexico. The Company conducts its primary operations in Peru through a registered branch (the
"Peruvian Branch" or “Branch” or “SPCC Peru Branch”). The Peruvian Branch is not a corporation
separate from the Company. The Company's Mexican operations are conducted through subsidiaries. The
Company also conducts exploration activities in Argentina, Chile, Ecuador, Mexico and Peru.
NOTE 2—SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES:
Principles of consolidation—
The consolidated financial statements include the accounts of subsidiaries of which the Company has
voting control, in accordance with Accounting Standards Codification (“ASC”) 810 Consolidation. Such
financial statements are prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the
United States ("U.S. GAAP").
Basis of Presentation—
Other immaterial restatements – Subsequent to the issuance of the Company’s consolidated financial
statements as of December 31, 2018, the Company’s management identified certain immaterial errors in
the presentation of the balances of deferred income taxes in the consolidated balance sheet as of that date.
The Company’s management assessed the impact of this error and concluded that it was not material to
the consolidated financial statements taken as a whole for the year ended on December 31, 2018.
However, Company’s management determined that it was appropriate to make adjustment for such
immaterial error. This adjustment was to correct the presentation within the consolidated balance sheet
and the corresponding notes of deferred income tax balances. The amount reclassified between non-
current taxes payable that reduced the deferred income tax asset was $207.1 million. The amount
reclassified between deferred tax liability that increased the deferred tax asset was $9.9 million.
Use of estimates—
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires management to make
estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities, and disclosure of
contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements, and the reported amounts of
revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Significant items subject to such estimates and
assumptions include the carrying value of ore reserves that are the basis for future cash flow estimates
and amortization calculations; environmental reclamation, closure and retirement obligations; estimates
of recoverable copper in mill and leach stockpiles; asset impairments (including estimates of future cash
flows); unrecognized tax benefits; valuation allowances for deferred tax assets; and fair value of financial
instruments. Management basis its estimates on the Company's historical experience and on various other
assumptions that are believed to be reasonable under the circumstances. Actual results could differ from
those estimates.
Revenue recognition—
The Company adopted ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers, effective January 1, 2018, on
a modified retrospective basis, applying the standard to all contracts that are not completed as such date.
The Company’s revenue consists of product revenue resulting from the sale of copper and non-copper
products, such as molybdenum, silver, zinc, lead and gold. Other than increased disclosures, the adoption
of the new guidance did not have an impact on the Company's revenue recognition.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The Company accounts for a contract with a customer when there is a legally enforceable contract
between the Company and the customer, the rights of the parties are identified, the contract has
commercial substance, and collectability of the contract consideration is probable. The Company's
revenues are measured based on consideration specified in the contract with each customer. Disclosures
regarding disaggregation of revenues and contract balances are disclosed within Note 18 "Segment and
related information".
The Company’s marketing strategy and annual sales planning emphasize developing and maintaining
long-term customer relationships. Generally, 80% to 90% of the Company’s metal production is sold
under annual or longer-term contracts, which specify a volume of mineral to be sold over a stated period
and delivery schedule; the price at which mineral will be sold at each delivery date is generally
determined by the weekly or monthly average rate of the commodity published by major metal exchanges
at specific dates stipulated within each contract. The Company considers each contract to be a single
performance obligation, represented by the delivery of a series of distinct goods that are substantially the
same, with the same pattern of transfer to the Company’s customers. The Company concluded this as,
based on the nature of its contracts, customers receive the benefit of mineral sold as it is shipped per the
terms of the contracts at each contractual delivery date. Likewise, each shipment of product represents
the same measure of progress as other shipments within the contract. Accordingly, the Company
recognizes revenues for each contract over the period of time in which the specified quantity of mineral is
delivered. In doing so, the Company considers that it has a right to consideration from its customers in an
amount that corresponds directly to the value transferred to those customers that being the quantity of
mineral delivered at the price per unit delivered. Accordingly, the Company recognizes revenue at the
amount to which it has the right to invoice (the invoice practical expedient), as it believes that this
method is a faithful depiction of the transfer of goods to its customers.
For contracts with a term greater than one year, the Company is unable to disclose an allocation of the
transaction price to the remaining unsatisfied performance obligation, given that unit prices of mineral
sold are determined by published commodity prices at specified dates within the contract. The volume of
mineral to be delivered after the first year of the contract is subject to annual volume negotiations in
accordance with the terms of the contract. As of December 31, 2019, the Company has long-term
contracts with promises to deliver in 2020 a total of 870,000 metric tons of copper concentrate, 48,000
metric tons of copper cathodes, 24,000 tons of molybdenum concentrate and 292,400 tons of sulfuric
acid. This is an estimate that will vary in 2020 and 2021 based on the negotiations with the customers as
mentioned above.
The remainder of the Company’s revenues, including its by-product revenues, are generated by spot sales
that are recognized at a point in time.
Under both sales models, revenue is recognized when or as the performance obligations are satisfied,
when the Company transfers control of the goods and title passes to the customer. Considering the
International Commercial Terms (Incoterms) utilized by the Company, control is transferred generally
upon the completion of loading the material at the point of origin. This is the point at which the customer
obtains legal title to the product as well as the ability to direct the use of and obtain substantially all of the
remaining benefits of ownership of the asset. Additionally, payment is generally due upon the delivery of
the shipping and title documents at the point of origin, customers typically have 30 days to remit
payment. Copper and non-copper revenues are measured based on the monthly average of prevailing
commodity prices according to the terms of the contracts. The Company provides allowances for
doubtful accounts based upon historical bad debt and claims experience and periodic evaluation of
specific customer accounts.
Substantially all of the Company’s sales are made under carriage and insurance paid to, or cost, insurance
and freight Incoterms, whereby the Company is responsible for providing shipping and insurance after
control of the inventory has been transferred to the customer. According to the terms of the Company’s
contracts, these services are not distinct within the context of the contract, and they are not separately
identifiable from the other promises within the contract. Additionally, it is the Company policy and it has
a long-standing history of providing shipping and insurance services to
103
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
104its customers. Accordingly, shipping and insurance are not considered separate performance obligations. 
The related costs of shipping and insurance are presented within the cost of sales line in the 
accompanying consolidated statements of income.  
Furthermore, the Company considered the impact of the shipping and insurance services on the
determination of when control is transferred to its customers. It has concluded that the terms of these
services do not impact its customers’ ability to sell, pledge, or otherwise use the products in shipment.
Also, there is a small likelihood and minimal history of lost or damaged goods during shipment.
Considering these factors, combined with the other indicators of control previously mentioned, the
Company has concluded that these services do not impact the determination that control is transferred at
the point of origin.
For certain of the Company’s sales of copper and molybdenum products, customer contracts allow for
pricing based on a month subsequent to shipping, in most cases within the following three months and
occasionally in some cases a few additional months. In such cases, revenue is recorded at a provisional
price at the time of shipment. The provisionally priced copper sales are adjusted to reflect forward LME
or COMEX copper prices at the end of each month until a final adjustment is made to the price of the
shipments upon settlement with customers pursuant to the terms of the contract. In the case of
molybdenum sales, for which there are no published forward prices, the provisionally priced sales are
adjusted to reflect the market prices at the end of each month until a final adjustment is made to the price
of the shipments upon settlement with customers pursuant to the terms of the contract.
These provisional pricing arrangements are accounted for separately from the contract as an embedded
derivative instrument under ASC 815-30 “Derivatives and Hedging—Cash Flow Hedges.” The Company
sells copper in concentrate, anode, blister and refined form at industry standard commercial terms. Net
sales include the invoiced value of copper, zinc, silver, molybdenum, sulfuric acid and other metals and
the corresponding fair value adjustment of the related forward contract of copper and molybdenum.
Disclosure regarding adjustments to sales for provisionally priced contracts is disclosed within Note 18
“Segment and related information”.
Cash and cash equivalents—
Cash and cash equivalents include bank deposits, certificates of deposit and short-term investment funds
with original maturities of three months or less at the date of purchase. The carrying value of cash and
cash equivalents approximates fair value.
Short-term investments—
The Company accounts for short-term investments in accordance with ASC 320-10 “Investments Debt
and Equity Securities-Recognition.” The Company determines the appropriate classification of all short-
term investments as held-to-maturity, available-for-sale or trading at the time of purchase and re-
evaluates such classifications as of each balance sheet date. Unrealized gains and losses on available-for-
sale investments, net of taxes, are reported as a component of accumulated other comprehensive income
(loss) in stockholders’ equity, unless such loss is deemed to be other than temporary.
Inventories—
The Company principally produces copper and, in the production process, obtains several by-products,
including molybdenum, silver, zinc, sulfuric acid and other metals.
Metal inventories, consisting of work-in-process and finished goods, are carried at the lower of average
cost or net realizable value (NRV). Costs of work-in-process inventories and finished goods mainly
include power, labor, fuel, operating and repair materials, depreciation, amortization, depletion, and other
necessary costs related to the extraction
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
105and processing of ore, including mining, milling, concentrating, smelting, refining, leaching and chemical
processing. Costs incurred in the production of metal inventories exclude general and administrative
costs. Once molybdenum, silver, zinc and other by-products are identified, they are transferred to their
respective production facilities and the incremental cost required to complete production is assigned to
their inventory value.
Work-in-process inventories represent materials that are in the process of being converted into a saleable
product. Conversion processes vary depending on the nature of the copper ore and the specific mining
operation. For sulfide ores, processing includes milling and concentrating and results in the production of
copper and molybdenum concentrates.
Finished goods include saleable products (e.g., copper concentrates, copper anodes, copper cathodes,
copper rod, molybdenum concentrate and other metallurgical products).
Supplies inventories are carried at the lower of average cost or net realizable value (NRV).
Long-term inventory-Ore stockpiles on leach pads.
The leaching process is an integral part of the mining operations carried out at the Company’s open-pit
mines. The Company capitalizes the production cost of leachable material at its Toquepala, La Caridad
and Buenavista mines recognizing it as inventory. This cost includes mining and haulage costs incurred to
deliver ore to leach pads, depreciation, amortization, depletion and site overhead costs. The estimates of
recoverable mineral content contained in the leaching dumps are supported by engineering studies. As the
production cycle of the leaching process is significantly longer than the conventional process of
concentrating, smelting and electrolytic refining, the Company includes on its balance sheet current leach
inventory (included in work-in-process inventories) and long-term leach inventory. At the Company´s
Mexican operations, the amortization of leachable material is recorded by the units of production method.
At the Company´s Peruvian operations, the amortization is based on the historical recovery percentages
of each mine.
Property—
Property is recorded at acquisition cost, net of accumulated depreciation and amortization. Cost includes
major expenditures for improvements and replacements, which extend useful lives or increase capacity
and interest costs associated with significant capital additions. Maintenance, repairs, normal development
costs at existing mines and gains or losses on assets retired or sold are reflected in earnings as incurred.
Buildings and equipment are depreciated on the straight-line method over estimated lives from two to 50
years or the estimated life of the mine if shorter.
Mine development—
Mine development includes primarily the cost of acquiring land rights to an exploitable ore body, pre-
production stripping costs at new mines that are commercially exploitable, costs associated with bringing
new mineral properties into production, and removal of overburden to prepare unique and identifiable
areas outside the current mining area for such future production. Mine development costs are amortized
on a unit of production basis over the remaining life of the mines.
There is a diversity of practices in the mining industry in the treatment of drilling and other related costs
to delineate new ore reserves. The Company follows the practices outlined in the next two paragraphs in
its treatment of drilling and related costs.
Drilling and other associated costs incurred in the Company's efforts to delineate new resources, whether
near-mine or Greenfield are expensed as incurred. These costs are classified as mineral exploration costs.
Once the Company
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
determines through feasibility studies that proven and probable reserves exist and that the drilling and
other associated costs embody a probable future benefit that involves a capacity, singly or in combination
with other assets, to contribute directly or indirectly to future net cash inflow, then the costs are classified
as mine development costs. These mine development costs incurred prospectively to develop the property
are capitalized as incurred, until the commencement of production, and are amortized using the units of
production method over estimated life of the ore body. During the production stage, drilling and other
related costs incurred to maintain production are included in production cost in the period in which they
are incurred.
Drilling and other related costs incurred in the Company’s efforts to delineate a major expansion of
reserves at an existing production property are expensed as incurred. Once the Company determines
through feasibility studies that proven and probable incremental reserves exist and that the drilling and
other associated costs embody a probable future benefit that involves a capacity, singly or in combination
with other assets, to contribute directly or indirectly to future net cash inflow, then the costs are classified
as mine development costs. These incremental mine development costs are capitalized as incurred, until
the commencement of production and amortized using the units of production method over the estimated
life of the ore body. A major expansion of reserves is one that increases total reserves at a property by
approximately 10% or more.
For the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, the Company did not capitalize any drilling and
related costs.
Asset retirement obligations (reclamation and remediation costs)—
The fair value of a liability for asset retirement obligations is recognized in the period in which the
liability is incurred. The liability is measured at fair value and is adjusted to its present value in
subsequent periods as accretion expense is recorded. The corresponding asset retirement costs are
capitalized as part of the carrying value of the related long-lived assets and depreciated over the asset's
useful life.
Intangible assets—
Intangible assets include primarily the excess amount paid over the book value for investment shares
which are presented as mining concessions, and mining and engineering development studies. Intangible
assets are carried at acquisition costs, net of accumulated amortization and are amortized principally on a
unit of production basis over the estimated remaining life of the mines. Intangible assets are reviewed for
impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of the asset
may not be recoverable.
Debt issuance costs—
Debt issuance costs related to a recognized debt liability are  presented in the balance sheet as a direct 
deduction from the carrying amount of that debt liability, consistent with the treatment of a debt discount.
Ore reserves—
The Company periodically reevaluates estimates of its ore reserves, which represent the Company’s
estimate as to the amount of unmined copper remaining in its existing mine locations that can be
produced and sold at a profit. Such estimates are based on engineering evaluations derived from samples
of drill holes and other openings, combined with assumptions about copper market prices and production
costs at each of the respective mines.
The Company updates its estimate of ore reserves at the beginning of each year. In this calculation, the
Company uses current metal prices which are defined as the average metal price over the preceding three
years. The current price per pound of copper, as defined, was $2.82, $2.64 and $2.50 at the end of 2019,
2018 and 2017, respectively. The ore reserve estimates are used to determine the amortization of mine
development and intangible assets.
106
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
107Once the Company determines through feasibility studies that proven and probable reserves exist and that
the drilling and other associated costs embody a probable future benefit that involves a capacity, singly or
in combination with other assets, to contribute directly or indirectly to future net cash inflow, then the
costs are classified as mine development costs and the Company discloses the related ore reserves.
Exploration—
Tangible and intangible costs incurred in the search for mineral properties are charged against earnings
when incurred.
Income taxes—
Provisions for income taxes are based on taxes payable or refundable for the current year and deferred
taxes on temporary differences between the amount of taxable income and pretax financial income and
between the tax bases of assets and liabilities and their reported amounts in the financial statements.
Deferred tax assets and liabilities are included in the financial statements at currently enacted income tax
rates applicable to the period in which the deferred tax assets and liabilities are expected to be realized
and settled as prescribed in ASC 740 “Income taxes.” As changes in tax laws or rates are enacted,
deferred tax assets and liabilities are adjusted through the provision for income taxes. Deferred income
tax assets are reduced by any benefits that, in the opinion of management, are more likely not to be
realized.
The Company’s operations involve dealing with uncertainties and judgments in the application of
complex tax regulations in multiple jurisdictions. The final taxes paid are dependent upon many factors,
including negotiations with taxing authorities in various jurisdictions and resolution of disputes arising
from federal, state, and international tax audits. The Company recognizes potential liabilities and records
tax liabilities for anticipated tax audit issues in the U.S. and other tax jurisdictions based on its estimate
of whether, and the extent to which, additional taxes will be due. The Company follows the guidance of
ASC 740 “Income taxes” to record these liabilities. (See Note 7 “Income taxes” of the consolidated
financial statements for additional information). The Company adjusts these reserves in light of changing
facts and circumstances; however, due to the complexity of some of these uncertainties, the ultimate
resolution may result in a payment that is materially different from the Company’s current estimate of the
tax liabilities. If its estimate of tax liabilities proves to be less than the ultimate assessment, an additional
charge to expense would result. If payment of these amounts ultimately proves to be less than the
recorded amounts, the reversal of the liabilities would result in tax benefits being recognized in the period
when the Company determines the liabilities are no longer necessary.
The Company classifies income tax-related interest and penalties as income taxes in the financial
statements, as well as interest and penalties, if any, related to unrecognized tax benefits.
On December 22, 2017, the U.S. government enacted the “Tax Cuts and Jobs Act” (the “TCJA”). The 
TCJA contains numerous provisions, the following of which most significantly impact the Company:  (i) 
a decrease in the corporate tax rate from 35% to 21%;(ii) a transition of the U.S. taxation of international
operation from a worldwide system to a quasi-territorial system and a one-time transition tax on the
mandatory deemed repatriation of the higher accumulated post-1986 deferred foreign income as of
November 2, 2017 or December 31, 2017, (iii) generally eliminates U.S. federal income taxes on
dividends from foreign subsidiaries, requiring a current inclusion in U.S. federal taxable income of
certain earnings of controlled foreign corporations and (iv) limitations on the use of foreign tax credits to
reduce the U.S. income tax liability.
The U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”) issued Staff Accounting Bulletin No. 118 (“SAB 
118”), which provides guidance on accounting for the tax effects of the TCJA.  The Company has 
adopted SAB 118. Accordingly, the provisions of the TCJA deemed most relevant to the Company were 
considered in preparation of its financial statements as of December 31, 2017 based on the Company’s 
best estimate, and the provisions of the TCJA were finalized in its 
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
108financial statements as of December 31, 2018. See further disclosure regarding the impacts of the TCJA 
and the adoption of SAB 118 in Note 7 to the accompanying consolidated financial statements.
Foreign exchange—
The Company’s functional currency is the U.S. dollar. As required by local law, both the Peruvian Branch
and Minera Mexico maintain their books of accounts in Peruvian soles and Mexican pesos, respectively.
Foreign currency assets and liabilities are remeasured into U.S. dollars at current exchange rates, except
for non-monetary items such as inventory, property, intangible assets and other assets which are
remeasured at historical exchange rates. Revenues and expenses are generally translated at actual
exchange rates in effect during the period, except for those items related to balance sheet amounts that are
remeasured at historical exchange rates. Gains and losses from foreign currency remeasurement are
included in earnings of the period.
Gains and (losses) resulting from foreign currency transactions are included in "Cost of sales (exclusive
of depreciation, amortization and depletion)."
Asset impairments -
The Company evaluates long-term assets when events or changes in economic circumstances indicate
that the carrying amount of such assets may not be recoverable. These evaluations are based on business
plans that are prepared using a time horizon that is reflective of the Company’s expectations of metal
prices over its business cycle. The Company is currently using a long-term average copper price and an
average molybdenum price for impairment tests, reflective of what the Company believes is the lower
level of the current price environment. The results of its impairment tests using these long-term copper
and molybdenum prices show no impairment in the carrying value of their assets.
In recent years testing using assumptions for long-term average prices have resulted in stricter evaluation
for impairment analysis than would the higher three year average prices for copper and molybdenum
prices. Should this situation reverse in the future with three year average prices below the long-term price
assumption, the Company would assess the need to use the three year average prices in its evaluations.
The Company uses an estimate of the future undiscounted net cash flows of the related asset or asset
group over the remaining life to measure whether the assets are recoverable and measures any
impairment by reference to fair value.
Other comprehensive income—
Comprehensive income represents changes in equity during a period, except those resulting from
investments by owners and distributions to owners. During the fiscal years ended December 31, 2019,
2018 and 2017, the components of "other comprehensive income (loss)" were, the unrecognized gain
(loss) on employee benefit obligations and foreign currency translation adjustments.
Business segments-
Company management views Southern Copper as having three reportable segments and manages it on
the basis of these segments. The segments identified by the Company are: 1) the Peruvian operations,
which include the two open-pit copper mines in Peru and the plants and services supporting such mines,
2) the Mexican open-pit copper mines, which include La Caridad and Buenavista mine complexes and
their supporting facilities and 3) the Mexican underground mining operations, which include five
underground mines that produce zinc, lead, copper, silver and gold, a coal mine and a zinc refinery.
Please see Note 18 “Segments and Related Information.”
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
109Senior management of the Company focus on operating income as measure of performance to evaluate
different segments, and to make decisions to allocate resources to the reported segments. This is a
common measure in the mining industry.
Leases -
The Company adopted FASB ASC 842, Leases, effective January 1, 2019. The Company determined if a 
contract is or contained a lease at its inception. The Company evaluated if a contract gave the right to 
obtain substantially all of the economic benefits from use of an identified asset and the right to direct the 
use of the asset, in order to determine if a contract contained a lease. All of the Company’s existing lease 
contracts are operating lease contracts. For these leases, the Company recognized right-of-use assets and 
the corresponding operating lease liabilities on its consolidated balance sheet. Right-of-use assets 
represent the Company’s right to use an underlying asset for the lease term and lease liabilities represent 
an obligation by the Company to make lease payments which arise from the lease. Lease right-of-use 
assets and liabilities are recognized at the inception date based on the present value of lease payments 
over the lease term.  As the Company’s lease contracts do not provide an implicit rate, the Company uses 
its incremental borrowing rate based on the information available at the inception date in order to 
determine the present value of lease payments. Lease expense for lease payments is recognized on a 
straight-line basis over the lease term, in the cost of sales and operating expenses. The Company elected 
the transition approach whereby it applied the new leases standard at the adoption date and recognized a 
cumulative-effect adjustment to the opening balance of retained earnings in the period of adoption. The 
Company elected the short-term lease recognition exemption (short-term lease practical expedient) by 
class of underlying asset (which results in off-balance-sheet accounting for the lease).
NOTE 3—SHORT-TERM INVESTMENTS:
Short-term investments were as follows ($ in millions):
At December 31,  
2019    2018  
Trading securities $80.0 $213.1
Weighted average interest rate  2.0%   2.2%
Available-for-sale $ 0.7 $ 0.7
Weighted average interest rate  0.7%   0.7%
Total $80.7 $213.8
Trading securities consist of bonds issued by public companies and are publicly traded. Each financial
instrument is independent of the others. The Company has the intention to sell these bonds in the short-
term.
Available-for-sale investments consist of securities issued by public companies. Each security is
independent of the others and, as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, included corporate bonds and asset
and mortgage backed obligations. As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, gross unrealized gains and losses
on available-for-sale securities were not material.
Related to these investments the Company earned interest, which was recorded as interest income in the
consolidated statement of earnings. Also the Company redeemed some of these securities and recognized
gains (losses) due to changes in fair value, which were recorded as other income (expense) in the
consolidated statement of earnings.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
110The following table summarizes the activity of these investments by category (in millions):
Years ended 
December 31, 
2019    2018 
Trading:
Interest earned $0.6$0.5
Unrealized gain (loss)  at the end of the period $(*)  $(0.2)
Available-for-sale:
Interest earned  (*)  (*)  
Investment redeemed $— $0.3
(*)   Less than $0.1 million
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, contractual maturities of the available-for-sale debt securities are as
follows (in millions):
    2019    2018
One year or less $— $—
Maturing after one year through five years  —  —
Maturing after five years through ten years  —  —
Due after 10 years  0.7 0.7
Total debt securities $0.7$0.7
NOTE 4—INVENTORIES:
At December 31, 
(in millions) 2019     2018
Inventory, current:
Metals at average cost:
Finished goods $87.2$69.6
Work-in-process  259.7 256.8
Ore stockpiles on leach pads  358.4 328.0
Supplies at average cost  363.2 378.3
Total current inventory $1,068.5$1,032.7
Inventory, long-term:
Ore stockpiles on leach pads $1,230.3$1,177.4
Total leaching costs added as long-term inventory of ore stockpiles in leach pads amounted to $469.0
million, $506.6 million and $513.9 million in 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively. Long-term leaching
inventories recognized as cost of sales amounted to $385.8 million, $299.4 million and $333.5 million in
2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
111NOTE 5—PROPERTY:
At December 31, 
(in millions)     2019     2018
Buildings and equipment $15,016.1$14,294.0
Construction in progress  1,294.8 1,516.9
Mine development  267.5 267.9
Mineral assets 83.2 83.2
Land, other than mineral  200.1 164.1
Total property  16,861.7 16,326.1
Accumulated depreciation, amortization and depletion  (7,490.7) (6,922.3)
Total property and mine development, net $9,371.0$9,403.8
Construction in progress decreased in 2019 as a result of the completion of some of the Company
expansion projects. Depreciation and depletion expense for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018
and 2017, amounted to $759.9 million, $668.9 million and $665.2 million, respectively.
NOTE 6—INTANGIBLE ASSETS:
At December 31, 
(in millions)     2019    2018
Mining concessions $121.2$121.2
Mine engineering and development studies  19.8 19.8
Software  55.9 49.6
 196.9 190.6
Accumulated amortization:  
Mining concessions (38.0) (37.4)
Mine engineering and development studies (16.3) (15.3)
Software (36.1) (32.1)
(90.4) (84.8)
Goodwill  41.9 41.9
Intangible assets, net $148.4$147.7
Amortization of intangibles for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, amounted to $4.5
million, $5.4 million and $5.9 million, respectively. Estimated amortization is as follows:
Estimated amortization expense (in millions):     
2020 $ 9.6
2021 5.5
2022 5.6
2023 5.5
2024 4.3
Total 2020 - 2024 $30.5
Average annual $ 6.1
Goodwill includes $17.0 million generated in 1997 as a result of purchasing a third party interest in the
Buenavista mine. It also includes $24.9 million representing the amount of the purchase price in excess
of the fair value of the net assets acquired from El Pilar mine. This goodwill is attributable to future
benefits that the Company expects to realize from the mine and will not be deductible for income tax
purposes.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
112NOTE 7—INCOME TAXES:
Since March 2009, Grupo Mexico, through its wholly-owned subsidiary AMC, owns an interest in excess
of 80% of SCC. Accordingly, SCC’s results are included in the consolidated results of the Grupo Mexico
subsidiary for U.S. federal income tax reporting. SCC provides current and deferred income taxes, as if it
were filing a separate U.S. federal income tax return.
On December 22, 2017, the TCJA was signed into law, making substantial changes to the 1986 Internal
Revenue Code. Changes under the TCJA include, among others, a decrease in the corporate tax rate from
35% to 21%, the transition of the U.S. taxation of international operation from a worldwide system to a
quasi-territorial system, a one-time transition tax on the mandatory deemed repatriation of the higher of
the accumulated foreign income as of November 2, 2017 or December 31, 2017, a general elimination of
U.S. federal income taxes on dividends from foreign subsidiaries, and a current inclusion in U.S. federal
taxable income of certain earnings of controlled foreign corporations.
Although most provisions of the TCJA began on January 1, 2018, ASC 740  “Income Taxes” requires that 
the effects of tax law changes be recognized in the year and period of the law change and be reflected in 
the company’s financial results for 2017. On December 22, 2017, the SEC staff issued SAB 118 to 
address the application of U.S. GAAP in situations when a registrant did not have the necessary 
information available, prepared, or analyzed in reasonable detail to complete the accounting for certain 
income tax effects of the TCJA. SAB 118 required a company to reflect the income tax effects of the 
TCJA for which the accounting under ASC 740 “Income Taxes” is complete; if it is incomplete but the 
Company is able to determine a reasonable estimate, a provisional estimate must be provided in the 
financial statements.  If a provisional estimate cannot be reasonably prepared, the Company should 
continue to apply ASC 740 on the basis of the provision of the tax law that were in effect immediately 
before the enactment of the TCJA.   Companies had one year from the enactment of the TCJA to finalize 
accounting for the impacts of the TCJA. 
The Company adopted SAB 118 and accordingly recorded a provisional $785.9 million non-cash tax
expense for the estimated effects of the TCJA in its 2017 financial statements as a result of adjustments
related to the valuation allowances for foreign tax credits and other deferred tax assets, valuation of net
deferred tax assets due to the rate change from 35% to 21% and the transition tax on the repatriation of
cumulative foreign earnings. In 2018, the Company determined the final impact of the TCJA to be $816.8
million, a $30.9 million change from the provisional amount estimated at December 31, 2017.
For 2018, the TCJA created a new category of foreign income, the Global Intangible Low Tax Income or
GILTI.
The new GILTI provisions impose a tax on foreign income in excess of a deemed return on tangible
assets of foreign corporations. For 2018, there was no U.S. tax liability from the GILTI inclusion. The
Company does not anticipate a tax on GILTI in the future because of increased fixed asset amounts and
with a Mexican tax rate of 30% no U.S. deferred taxes would be recorded. Accordingly, the Company has
elected that if GILTI were to apply in the future, a current period expense would be recorded when
incurred.
The Base Erosion Anti-Abuse Tax (BEAT) is a 5% minimum tax for tax year 2018, 10% for the years
2019 through 2025 and 12.5% in years thereafter. It is calculated on a base equal to the Company’s
income determined without the tax benefit arising from base erosion payments. The Company did not
incur a BEAT liability in 2018 and 2019 since it has met the safe harbor rule that provides a Company not
to be subject to the BEAT if related party payments from the U.S. to foreign entities does not exceed 3%
of expenses excluding cost of goods sold. The Company must continue to analyze applicability of the
BEAT provisions on a quarterly basis.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
113The components of the provision for income taxes for the three years ended December 31, 2019, are as
follows:
(in millions)     2019    2018     2017
U.S. federal and state:
Current $— $ 2.6$ —
Deferred  —  (13.0) 686.2
Uncertain tax positions  (1.3) —  16.2
 (1.3) (10.4) 702.4
Foreign (Peru and Mexico):
Current  966.3 1,102.4 951.7
Deferred (30.1) (38.5) (60.7)
Uncertain tax positions  10.4 — —
 946.6 1,063.9 891.0
Total provision for income taxes $945.3$1,053.5$1,593.4
The source of income is as follows:
(in millions)     2019     2018     2017
Earnings by location:
U.S. $ (1.9)$ (2.3)$ (1.5)
Foreign
Peru  513.0 441.8 284.6
Mexico  1,915.4 2,149.9 2,019.6
 2,428.4 2,591.7 2,304.2
Earnings before taxes on income $2,426.5$2,589.4$2,302.7
The reconciliation of the statutory income tax rate to the effective tax rate for the three years ended
December 31, 2019, is as follows (in percentage points):
    2019    2018    2017 
Expected tax at U.S. statutory rate  21.0%  21.0%  35.0%
Foreign tax at other than statutory rate, net of foreign tax credit
benefit (1)  14.0 13.9 0.6
Percentage depletion  (2.7) (2.1) (2.9)
Other permanent differences  0.1 0.4 5.2
Change in 2017 valuation allowance on U.S. deferred tax assets,
foreign tax credits and U.S. tax effect on Peruvian deferred taxes — 7.5 26.9
Additional valuation allowance on 2018 U.S. deferred tax assets,
foreign tax credits and U.S. tax effect on Peruvian deferred taxes 10.1 1.0 —
Decrease in 2017 U.S. deferred tax asset due to tax rate changes — (0.2) 4.8
U.S. one time transition tax on accumulated foreign earnings — 0.4 2.4
Increase (decrease) in unrecognized tax benefits for uncertain tax
positions  (2.1) — 0.7
Repatriated foreign earnings  — — (2.0)
Amounts (over) / under provided in prior years  (1.1) (1.3) (0.1)
Other  (0.3) 0.1 (1.4)
Effective income tax rate  39.0%  40.7%  69.2%
(1)Foreign tax at other than statutory rates, net of foreign tax credit benefit, also includes the effects of
permanent differences in Peru and Mexico, that are determined at the local statutory rate.
The Company files income tax returns in three jurisdictions, Peru, Mexico and the United States. For the
three years presented above, the statutory income tax rate for Mexico was 30%. The United States tax
rate was 21% in 2019 and
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
1142018, and 35% for 2017. The Peruvian tax rate was 29.5% for the three years presented above. While the
largest components of income taxes are the Peruvian and Mexican taxes, the Company is a domestic U.S.
entity. Therefore, the rate used in the above reconciliation is the U.S. statutory rate.
For all of the years presented, both the Peruvian branch and Minera Mexico filed separate tax returns in
their respective tax jurisdictions. Although the tax rules and regulations imposed in the separate tax
jurisdictions may vary significantly, similar permanent items exist, such as items which are nondeductible
or nontaxable. Some permanent differences relate specifically to SCC such as the allowance in the United
States for percentage depletion.
Deferred taxes include the U.S., Peruvian and Mexican tax effects of the following types of temporary
differences and carryforwards:
At December 31, 
(in millions)     2019     2018
Assets:
Inventories $ 55.7$61.5
Capitalized exploration expenses  14.0 11.1
U.S. foreign tax credit carryforward, net of FIN 48 liability  731.8 483.4
U.S. tax effect of Peruvian deferred tax liability  131.3 165.1
Provisions  145.0 155.0
Mexican tax on consolidated dividends 9.0 14.8
Deferred workers participation 24.7 27.0
Accrued salaries, wages and vacations 10.0 9.1
Sales price adjustment (PUI) 3.0 2.7
Social responsibility expenses 2.1 2.1
Deferred charges 14.5 6.1
Valuation allowance on U.S. deferred tax assets, foreign tax
credits and U.S. tax effect on Peruvian deferred (1,097.0)(819.1)
Other  9.9 10.1
Total deferred tax assets  54.0 128.9
At December 31, 
(in millions)     2019     2018
Liabilities:
Property, plant and equipment  (45.4) (137.3)
Other  (3.0) (0.4)
Total deferred tax liabilities  (48.4) (137.7)
Total net deferred tax (liabilities) / assets $ 5.6$(8.8)
The valuation allowance increased by $277.9 million over 2018, mostly due to the valuation of unutilized
Foreign Tax Credits generated in 2019 and the valuation of Foreign Tax Credits that were not utilized in
the settlement of the 2011-2013 IRS field audit. The Peru branch operations are taxed in the U.S. as a
flow through entity to SCC. Prior to 2017 U.S. Tax Reform, the U.S. corporate income tax rate was 35%
on the Peru earnings, which enabled the company to use more currently generated foreign tax credits.
Since tax reform reduced the U.S. tax rate to 21%, there is less U.S. income tax to absorb currently
generated FTC’s or carryforwards. Additionally, allowable expenses in the U.S. for percentage depletion
and U.S. sourced interest expense on debt reduced the branch income subject to U.S. tax, further limiting
utilization of foreign tax credits.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
115U.S. Tax Matters—
As of December 31, 2019, the Company considers its ownership of the stock of Minera Mexico to be
essentially permanent in duration.
As of December 31, 2019, $1,106.7 million of the Company´s total cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash
and short-term investments of $2,005.8 million were held by foreign subsidiaries. The cash, cash
equivalents and short-term investments maintained in our foreign operations are generally used to cover
local operating and investment expenses. At December 31, 2017, Minera Mexico had determined that it
had earnings available for dividends to the United States of $555.5 million. The 2017 U.S. tax reform
introduced a one-time transition tax that is based upon the higher of the Company’s total accumulated
post-1986 deferred foreign income as of November 2, 2017 or December 31, 2017 estimated to be $8.9
billion, the majority of which was previously considered to be indefinitely reinvested and accordingly, no
U.S. federal and state income taxes were provided. During 2018, the Company finalized its transition tax
at $153.1 million, which was fully offset by foreign tax credits.  Upon enactment of the 2017 U.S. tax 
reform, the Company had calculated and recorded in 2017 a provisional amount of $181.1 million and
reduced it by $28 million in 2018 when the calculation was finalized. The Company also finalized its
calculation of the total accumulated post-1986 deferred foreign income for the applicable entities and
amounts held in liquid and non-liquid deferred income. The Company has determined that as of
December 31,2019, a deferred tax asset of $0.4 billion exists with respect to its investment in foreign
subsidiaries. Tax accounting guidance provided in ASC 740 requires this asset to be recognized only if
the basis difference will reverse in the foreseeable future. Management has no plans that would result in
the reversal of this temporary difference and consequently no deferred tax asset has been recorded. Future
dividends from these subsidiaries are no longer subject to federal income tax in the U.S., and the
Company incurs no state income tax liability. Additionally there are no withholding taxes due to the tax
treaty between the United States and Mexico. Earnings from the Company’s Peruvian branch are not
subject to transition taxes since they are taxed in the United States on a current basis.
At December 31, 2019, there were $790.2 million of foreign tax credits available for carryback or
carryforward. These credits have a one-year carryback and a ten-year carryforward period and can only
be used to reduce U.S. income tax on foreign earnings. There were no other unused U.S. tax credits at
December 31, 2019. These credits will expire as follows:
Year     Amount
2024  39.4
2025  102.0
2026 189.5
2027 105.6
2028 159.6
2030 194.1
Total $790.2
These foreign tax credits are presented above on a gross basis and have not been reduced here for any
unrecognized tax benefits. These foreign tax credits have been adjusted to include the 2016 Net
Operating Loss carryback in the U.S. jurisdiction, increasing foreign tax credits by approximately $15.9
million. In accordance with ASU 2013-11 the Company has recorded $58.4 million of an unrecognized
tax benefit as an offset to the Company’s deferred tax asset for foreign tax credits. The remaining foreign
tax credits of $731.8 million are being re-valued to zero at December 31, 2019. It is the opinion of
management that with the reduction in the U.S. corporate tax rate to 21% and the corporate tax rates in
Mexico of 30% and in Peru at 29.5%, it is unlikely the excess foreign tax credits can be utilized.
Additionally, foreign dividends will no longer be taxed in the U.S. thereby reducing the U.S. tax on the
foreign source income that the credits can be used to offset.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
116Peruvian Tax Matters—
Royalty mining charge: The royalty charge is based on operating income margins with graduated rates
ranging from 1% to 12% of operating profits, with a minimum royalty charge assessed at 1% of net sales.
The minimum royalty charge is recorded as cost of sales and those amounts assessed at higher rates are
included in the income tax provision. The Company has accrued $42.3 million, $32.9 million and $23.4
million of royalty charges in 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively, of which $14.2 million, $9.0 million and
$2.5 million were included in income taxes in 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
Peruvian special mining tax: This tax is based on operating income with graduated rates increasing from
2% to 8.4%. The Company recognized $38.1 million, $30.6 million and $23.3 million in 2019, 2018 and
2017, respectively, with respect to this tax. These amounts are included as “income taxes” in the
consolidated statement of earnings.
Mexican Tax Matters—
In 2013, the Mexican Congress enacted tax law changes that became effective on January 1, 2014.
Among other effects, the amounts that Minera Mexico recorded during 2019 were:
●Mining royalty at the rate of 7.5% on taxable earnings before taxes: $61.6 million.
●Additional royalty of 0.5% over gross income from sales of gold, silver and platinum: $0.9 million.
On December 28, 2018, the Federal Revenue Law for fiscal year 2019, was published in the Federal
Official Gazette, effective as of January 1, 2019. The main tax matters are reported as follows:
The option regarding the benefit of offsetting recoverable balances derived from different federal tax
liabilities (e. g. income taxes versus value added tax (VAT)), whether from their own tax obligations or
from withholding taxes to third parties, (“universal basis”) was eliminated.
Therefore, effective January 1, 2019, taxpayers will only be able to offset their recoverable balances
against those they must pay for their own tax liabilities, including ancillary charge (restatement for
inflation and surcharges).
As a consequence of the change mentioned in the previous paragraph, taxpayers will only be able to
credit their recoverable balance against their own VAT payable in subsequent months until its exhaustion,
or request for a tax refund in full on such recoverable balance.
Notwithstanding the above, the Mexican tax authorities issued a new rule where the taxpayers had the
possibility to apply in 2019 the benefit of offsetting recoverable balances from different tax liabilities
(VAT versus Income Tax or Income Tax versus VAT) generated up to December 31, 2018, against those
recoverable balances for which no offsetting had been made or no tax refund had been previously
requested. Based on such rule, taxpayers may offset recoverable balances from their own tax liabilities
generated up to December 31, 2018, against those taxes they must pay for their own tax liabilities derived
from different federal taxes generated in 2019, including ancillary charges.
The possibility to offset withholding taxes to third parties against taxpayers own tax liabilities is also
eliminated.
Effective January 1 2019, the annual income tax withholding rate applicable to interests paid by financial
entities to individuals and companies residents in Mexico increased from 0.46% in fiscal year 2018, to
1.04% for fiscal year 2019.
On December 31, 2018, the decree of tax incentives of the Northern Region of Mexico was published in
the Official Gazette intending to promote and develop an economic plan for this zone of the country.
Such decree provides for a reduction of the income tax at a rate of 20% (in general terms) and the value
added tax at a rate of 8%, by means of a tax
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
credit for such purposes, applicable to business activities carried out by individuals, companies and
permanent establishments located in the specified territories. These tax incentives are effective from
January 1, 2019, and shall be in force in fiscal years 2019 and 2020.
Accounting for Uncertainty in Income Taxes—
The total amount of unrecognized tax benefits in 2019, 2018 and 2017, was as follows (in
millions):
    2019    2018    2017
Unrecognized tax benefits, opening balance $214.5$214.5$304.0
Gross increases—tax positions in prior period  (7.5) —  (89.5)
Gross increases—current-period tax positions  (4.2) —  —
Decreases related to settlements with taxing
authorities  (144.4) —  —
 (156.1) —  (89.5)
Unrecognized tax benefits, ending balance $58.4$214.5$214.5
The amount of unrecognized tax benefits that, if recognized, would affect the effective tax rate was $10.5
million at December 31, 2019 for unrecognized tax benefits in the Peruvian jurisdiction. Any recognition
of unrecognized tax benefits within the U.S. jurisdiction would not affect the effective tax rate as long as
the Company continues to value U.S. deferred tax assets including foreign tax credits. The Company has
no unrecognized Mexican tax benefits.
The Company effectively settled and closed the U.S. 2011-2013 IRS field audit in the second quarter of
2019. The Company’s U.S. IRS audit of 2014 -2016 commenced in 2019.
As of December 31, 2019, the Company’s liability for uncertain tax positions included accrued interest
and penalties in the Peruvian jurisdiction of $ 10.5 million. As of December 31, 2018 and December 31,
2017 the Company’s liability for uncertain tax positions included U.S. accrued interest and penalties of
$1.9 million.
The following tax years remain open to examination and adjustment in the Company’s three major tax
jurisdictions:
Peru:     2014 and all subsequent years
U.S.: 2014 and all subsequent years
Mexico: 2014 and all subsequent years
Management does not expect that any of the open years will result in a cash payment within the U.S.
jurisdiction in the upcoming twelve months ending December 31, 2020. Management expects that $9.8
million in cash payments in the Peruvian jurisdiction will be paid within the upcoming twelve months
ending December 31, 2020. The Company’s reasonable expectations about future resolutions of uncertain
items did not materially change during the year ended December 31, 2019.
NOTE 8—WORKERS’ PARTICIPATION:
The Company's operations in Peru and Mexico are subject to statutory workers' participation.
In Peru, the provision for workers' participation is calculated at 8% of pre-tax earnings. The current
portion of this participation, which is accrued during the year, is based on the Peruvian Branch's taxable
income and is distributed to workers following determination of final results for the year. The annual
amount payable to an individual worker is capped at the worker’s salary for an 18 month period.
Amounts determined in excess of the 18 months of worker’s salary is no longer made as a payment to the
worker and is levied first for the benefit of the “Fondo Nacional de Capacitacion
117
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
118Laboral y de Promocion del Empleo” (National Workers’ Training and Employment Promotion Fund)
until this entity receives from all employers in its region an amount equivalent to 2,200 Peruvian taxable
units (approximately $2.8 million in 2019). Any remaining excess is levied as payment for the benefit of
the regional governments. These levies fund worker training, employment promotion, entrepreneurship
and various other programs.
In Mexico, workers' participation is determined using the guidelines established in the Mexican income
tax law at a rate of 10% of pre-tax earnings as adjusted by the tax law.
The provision for workers’ participation is allocated to “Cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation,
amortization and depletion)” and to “selling, general and administrative” in the consolidated statement of
earnings, proportional to the number of workers in the production and administrative areas, respectively.
Workers’ participation expense for the three years ended December 31, 2019 was as follows (in millions):
    2019    2018    2017
Current $188.8$219.9$192.7
Deferred  29.8 9.8 6.6
$218.6$229.7$199.3
NOTE 9—LEASES:
The Company has operating leases for power generating facilities, vehicles and properties. The Company
recognizes lease expense for these leases on a straight-line basis over the lease term. Some of the
Company’s leases include both lease and non-lease components which are accounted for separately. The
Company’s leases have remaining lease terms of two years to 13 years, and do not include options to
extend the leases. The Company’s lease agreements do not contain options to purchase the leased assets
or to terminate the leases before the expiration date. In addition, the Company’s lease contracts do not
have any material residual value guarantees or material restrictive covenants. As none of the Company’s
leases provides an implicit rate, the Company uses its incremental borrowing rate based on the
information available at commencement date in determining the present value of lease payments.
The weighted average remaining lease term for the Company’s leases is 9 years, and the weighted
average discount rate for these leases is 3.66%.
The operating lease expense recognized in the twelve months ended December 31, 2019 was classified as
follows (in millions):
Classification     2019
Cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion)  $ 114.4
Selling, general and administrative  0.2
Exploration  0.2
Total lease expense  $ 114.8
The Company’s short-term lease costs for the twelve months ended December 31, 2019 was $0.4 million.
Maturities of lease liabilities were as follows:
Lease liabilities
Year     (in millions)
2020  $ 116.1
2021  116.0
2022  112.9
2023  111.6
2024  103.6
After 2024  826.3
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
119Total lease payments  $ 1,386.5
Less: interest on lease liabilities  (340.1)
Present value of lease payments  $ 1,046.4
NOTE 10—ASSET RETIREMENT OBLIGATION:
The Company maintains an asset retirement obligation for its mining properties in Peru, as required by
the Peruvian Mine Closure Law. In accordance with the requirements of this law the Company’s closure
plans were approved by the Peruvian Ministry of Energy and Mines (“MINEM”). As part of the closure
plans, the Company is required to provide annual guarantees over the estimated life of the mines, based
on a present value approach, and to furnish the funds for the asset retirement obligation. This law requires
a review of closing plans every five years.
On June 24, 2019, MINEM approved a change to the guarantees required for the mining closure plans.
The new regulation specifies that the annual guarantees can be secured with real estate up to a maximum
of 50% and the remaining amount with credit instruments. Currently, the Company has pledged the value
of its Lima office complex for the 50% of the guarantee and with a stand-by letter of credit for the other
50% as security for this obligation. Through January 2020, the Company has provided total guarantees of
$47.1 million.
The closure cost recognized for this liability includes the cost, as outlined in its closure plans, of
dismantling the Toquepala and Cuajone concentrators, the Ilo smelter and refinery, and the shops and
auxiliary facilities at the three units. In March 2016, MINEM approved the Mining Closure Plan for the
Toquepala expansion project and the revised closure plans for the Cuajone mine and the Ilo facilities
were approved in January and October 2019, respectively. As result of these new estimates, the Company
increased the asset retirement obligation by $28.1 million in 2019. The closure plan for the Tia Maria
project was approved in February 2017. The Company, however, has not recorded a retirement obligation
for the project because the work on the project is on hold. The Company believes that under these
circumstances the recording of a retirement obligation is not appropriate.
The Company has recognized an estimated asset retirement obligation for its mining properties in Mexico
as part of its environmental commitment. Even though there is currently no enacted law, statute,
ordinance, written or oral contract requiring the Company to carry out mine closure and environmental
remediation activities, the Company believes that an obligation presently exists based on historical
government requirements for the closure of any facility. The overall cost recognized for mining closure in
Mexico includes the estimated costs of dismantling concentrators, smelter and refinery plants, shops and
other facilities. During 2018, the Company made a change in the estimate for the asset retirement
obligation for its Mexican operations, mainly due to a change in the discount rate used to determine such
obligation. The effect of this change was a reduction in the asset retirement obligation of $10.4 million,
which was recorded in the second quarter of 2018.
The following table summarizes the asset retirement obligation activity for years ended December 31,
2019 and 2018 (in millions):
    2019    2018
Balance as of January 1 $217.7$222.5
Changes in estimates  36.4 (15.6)
Closure payments  (5.3) (0.6)
Accretion expense  13.5 11.4
Balance as of December 31, $262.3$217.7
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
120NOTE 11—FINANCING:
Long-term debt (in millions):
Carrying
value as of
Face Issuance Issuance December 31, 
    amount    discount    costs     2019
5.375% Senior unsecured notes due 2020  $ 400 (0.1)$ (0.1)$ 399.8
3.500% Senior unsecured notes due 2022   300 (0.3) (0.5) 299.2
3.875% Senior unsecured notes due 2025   500 (1.6) (1.5) 496.9
9.250% Yankee bonds due 2028   51.2 — —  51.2
7.500% Senior unsecured notes due 2035   1,000 (12.4) (8.3) 979.3
6.750% Senior unsecured notes due 2040 1,100 (7.1) (5.7) 1,087.2
5.250% Senior unsecured notes due 2042   1,200 (19.0) (6.3) 1,174.7
5.875% Senior unsecured notes due 2045   1,500 (16.4) (8.6) 1,475.0
4.500% Minera Mexico Senior unsecured
notes due 2050 1,000 (12.7) (9.8) 977.5
Total $7,051.2 $ (69.6)$ (40.8) 6,940.8
Less, current portion  (399.8)
Total long-term debt $6,541.0
                Carrying
value as of
Face Issuance Issuance December 31, 
amount discount costs 2018
5.375% Senior unsecured notes due 2020 $400$(0.3)$(0.4)$ 399.3
3.500% Senior unsecured notes due 2022  300 (0.5) (0.6) 298.9
3.875% Senior unsecured notes due 2025  500 (1.8) (1.8) 496.4
9.250% Yankee bonds due 2028  125 — —  51.2
7.500% Senior unsecured notes due 2035  1,000 (12.9) (8.4) 978.7
6.750% Senior unsecured notes due 2040  1,100 (7.3) (5.8) 1,086.9
5.250% Senior unsecured notes due 2042  1,200 (19.4) (6.5) 1,174.1
5.875% Senior unsecured notes due 2045  1,500 (16.6) (8.8) 1,474.6
Total $6,125$(58.8)$(32.3) 5,960.1
Less, current portion  —
Total long-term debt $5,960.1
The bonds, referred above as “Yankee bonds”, contain a covenant requiring Minera Mexico to maintain a
ratio of EBITDA to interest expense of not less than 2.5 to 1.0 as such terms are defined in the debt
instrument. At December 31, 2019, Minera Mexico was in compliance with this covenant.
Between July 2005 and November 2012 the Company issued senior unsecured notes six times totaling
$4.2 billion, as listed above. Interest on the notes is paid semi-annually in arrears. The notes rank pari
passu with each other and rank pari passu in right of payment with all of the Company’s other existing
and future unsecured and unsubordinated indebtedness. On April 20, 2015, the Company issued $2.0
billion of fixed-rate senior unsecured notes. This debt was issued in two tranches, $500 million due 2025
at an annual interest rate of 3.875% and $1.5 billion due 2045 at an annual interest rate of 5.875%. These
notes are general unsecured obligations of the Company and rank equally with all of its existing and
future unsecured and unsubordinated debt. Net proceeds are being used for general corporate purposes,
including the financing of the Company´s capital investment program. The notes were issued with an
underwriters’ discount of $20.2 million. Additionally, issuance costs of $11.8 million associated with
these notes were paid and
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
121deferred. The unamortized balance of the discount and the costs are presented net of the carrying value of
the debt issued and are amortized as interest expense over the life of the loan.
The indentures relating to the notes contain certain restrictive covenants, including limitations on liens,
limitations on sale and leaseback transactions, rights of the holders of the notes upon the occurrence of a
change of control triggering event, limitations on subsidiary indebtedness and limitations on
consolidations, mergers, sales or conveyances. Certain of these covenants cease to be applicable before
the notes mature if the Company obtains an investment grade rating. The Company obtained investment
grade rating in 2005. The Company has registered these notes under the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended. The Company may issue additional debt from time to time pursuant to certain of the
indentures.
If the Company experiences a “Change of Control Triggering Event”, the Company must offer to
repurchase the notes at a purchase price equal to 101% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued and
unpaid interest, if any. A Change of Control Trigger Event means a Change of Control (as defined) and a
rating decline (as defined), that is, if the rating of the notes, by at least one of the rating agencies shall be
decreased by one or more gradations.
At December 31, 2019, the Company was in compliance with the covenants of the notes.
New Minera Mexico S.A. de C.V. Notes:
On September 26, 2019, SCC’s subsidiary Minera Mexico S.A. de C.V. issued $1.0 billion of fixed-rate
senior notes with a discount of $12.7 million, which is being amortized over the term of the related debt.
This debt was issued in one tranche, due in 2050 at an annual interest rate of 4.5%. Interest on the notes
will be paid semi-annually in arrears. The Company intends to use the net proceeds from this offering (i)
to finance Minera Mexico expansion program, including the Buenavista Zinc, Pilares and El Pilar
projects, (ii) for other capital expenditures and (iii) for general corporate purposes.
The notes constitute general unsecured obligations of Minera Mexico. The notes were issued in an
unregistered offering pursuant to Rule 144A and Regulation S under the Securities Act of 1933.
The Company capitalized the costs associated with the issuance of this facility, which are included as part
of the amortized cost of the long-term debt in the consolidated balance sheet.
In connection with the transaction, on September 26, 2019, Minera Mexico entered into an indenture with
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, which provided for the issuance, and set forth the
terms of the notes described above. The indenture contains covenants that limit Minera Mexico's ability
to, among other things, incur certain liens securing indebtedness, engage in certain sale and leaseback
transactions, and enter into certain consolidations, mergers, conveyances, transfers or leases of all or
substantially all the Minera Mexico's assets.
Credit risk rating:
On September 19, 2019 Moody’s investors service assigned Baa2 as debt rating on the new notes issued.
Also on September 19, 2019 Fitch and Standard & Poor’s ratings services assigned its ‘BBB+’, as debt
rating on the new notes issued.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
122Aggregate maturities of the outstanding borrowings at December 31, 2019, are as follows:
    Principal
Years Due(*)
(in millions)
2020  $400.0
2021 —
2022  300.0
2023  —
2024 —
Thereafter  6,351.2
Total $7,051.2
(*) Total debt maturities do not include the debt discount valuation account of $ 110.4 million.
NOTE 12—BENEFIT PLANS:
Post retirement defined benefit plans and defined contribution plan
The Company has two noncontributory defined benefit pension plans covering former salaried employees
in the United States and certain former expatriate employees in Peru (the “Expatriate Plan”). Effective
October 31, 2000, the Board of Directors amended the qualified pension plan to suspend the accrual of
benefits. In addition, the Company’s Mexican subsidiaries have a defined contribution pension plan for
salaried employees and a non-contributory defined benefit pension plan for union employees (the
“Mexican Plan”).
The components of net periodic benefit costs calculated in accordance with ASC 715 “Compensation
retirement benefits,” using December 31 as a measurement date, consist of the following:
(in millions)     2019     2018     2017
Service cost $ 1.1 $ 1.0 $ 0.8
Interest cost  1.8  1.6  1.4
Expected return on plan assets  (3.5) (3.4) (2.9)
Amortization of prior service cost / (credit)  0.2  0.2  0.1
Settlement / Curtailment — (0.2) 0.1
Amortization of net loss/(gain)  0.3  0.2  0.2
Net periodic benefit cost $ (0.1)$ (0.6)$ (0.3)
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
123The change in benefit obligation and plan assets and a reconciliation of funded status are as follows:
As of December  31, 
(in millions)     2019     2018
Change in benefit obligation:
Projected benefit obligation at beginning of year $27.4 $27.5
Service cost  1.1  1.0
Interest cost  1.8  1.6
Settlement  —  —
Benefits paid  (1.8) (1.6)
Actuarial (gain)/loss  3.6  (0.2)
Actuarial gain assumption changes  0.9  (0.8)
Inflation adjustment  0.7  (0.1)
Projected benefit obligation at end of year $33.7 $27.4
Change in plan assets:
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year $46.7 $51.6
Actual return on plan assets  4.8  (3.5)
Employer contributions  (0.6) (0.4)
Benefits paid  (0.9) (1.0)
Currency exchange rate adjustment  1.6  —
Fair value of plan assets at end of year $51.6 $46.7
Funded status at end of year: $17.9 $19.3
ASC-715 amounts r ecognized in statement of financial position
consists of:
Non-current assets $17.9 $19.4
Total $17.9 $19.4
ASC-715 amounts r ecognized in accumulated other compr ehensive
income (net of income taxes of $(5.4) million and $(4.3) million in
2019 and 2018, r espectively) consists of:
Net loss (gain) $ 7.6 $ 5.8
Prior service cost  1.4  1.4
Total $ 9.0 $ 7.2
The following table summarizes the changes in accumulated other comprehensive income for the years
ended December 31, related to the defined benefit pension plan, net of income tax:
(in millions)     2019    2018
Reconciliation of accumulated other comprehensive income:
Accumulated other comprehensive income at beginning of
plan year $ 7.2$ 3.8
Net loss/(gain) amortized during the year  1.9 3.6
Net loss/(gain) occurring during the year  (0.2) (0.1)
Prior service cost (credit) — —
Currency exchange rate adjustment  0.1 (0.1)
Net adjustment to accumulated other comprehensive income
(net of income taxes of $(2.2) million and $(2.2) million in 
2019 and 2018,  respectively)  1.8 3.4
Accumulated other comprehensive income at end of plan year$ 9.0$ 7.2
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
124The following table summarizes the amounts in accumulated other comprehensive income amortized and
recognized as a component of net periodic benefit cost in 2019 and 2018, net of income tax:
(in millions)     2019    2018
Net loss / (gain) $1.8$3.6
Amortization of net (loss) gain  (0.2) (0.1)
Amortization of prior services cost (credit) — —
Total amortization expenses $1.6$3.5
The assumptions used to determine the pension obligations are:
Expatriate Plan     2019    2018    2017 
Discount rate  2.85%  3.90%  3.25%
Expected long-term rate of return on plan asset  4.00%  4.00%  4.00%
Rate of increase in future compensation level  N/A N/A N/A
Mexican Plan(*)     2019    2018    2017 
Discount rate  7.15%  8.45%  7.80%
Expected long-term rate of return on plan asset  7.15%  8.45%  7.55%
Rate of increase in future compensation level  4.50%  4.50%  4.50%
(*) These rates are based on Mexican pesos as pension obligations are denominated in pesos.
The scheduled maturities of the benefits expected to be paid in each of the next five years, and thereafter,
are as follows:
    Expected
Years Benefit Payments
(in millions)
2020 $ 3.2
2021  1.9
2022  2.0
2023  2.0
2024  2.3
2025 to 2027  14.7
Total $ 26.1
Expatriate Plan
The Company’s funding policy is to contribute amounts to the qualified plan sufficient to meet the
minimum funding requirements set forth in the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 plus
such additional amounts as the Company may determine to be appropriate.
Plan assets are invested in a group annuity contract with Metropolitan Life Insurance Company
(“MetLife”). The Contract invests in the MetLife General Account Payment Fund (the "Money Fund")
and the MetLife Broad Market Core Bond Fund (the “Bond Fund”) managed by BlackRock, Inc.
The Money Fund seeks to earn interest and maintain a $1.00 per share net asset value, by investing in
U.S. Dollar-denominated money market securities.
The Bond Fund seeks to outperform the Bloomberg Barclays ® U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, net of fees,
over a full market cycle. The Bond Fund invests in publicly traded, investment grade securities. These
may include corporate securities, mortgage securities, treasuries and cash, agency securities, commercial
mortgage backed securities and other
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
125investment vehicles adhering to the fund’s investment objectives. These investments are classified as
Level 1 because they are valued using quoted prices of the same securities as they consist of instruments
which are publicly traded.
Plan assets are invested with the objective of maximizing returns with an acceptable level of risk and
maintaining adequate liquidity to fund expected benefit payments. The Company's policy for determining
asset mix-targets to meet investment objectives includes periodic consultation with recognized third party
investment consultants.
The expected long-term rate of return on plan assets is reviewed annually, taking into consideration asset
allocations, historical returns and the current economic environment. Based on these factors the Company
expects its assets will earn an average of 4.00% per annum assuming its long-term mix will be consistent
with its current mix.
Mexican Plan
Minera Mexico’s policy for determining asset mix targets includes periodic consultation with recognized
third party investment consultants. The expected long-term rate of return on plan assets is updated
periodically, taking into consideration assets allocations, historical returns and the current economic
environment. The fair value of plan assets is impacted by general market conditions. If actual returns on
plan assets vary from the expected returns, actual results could differ.
The plan assets are managed by three financial institutions, Scotiabank Inverlat S.A., Banco Santander
and GBM Grupo Bursatil Mexicano, S.A. 80% of the funds are invested in Mexican government
securities, including treasury certificates and development bonds of the Mexican government. The
remaining 20% is invested in common shares of Grupo Mexico. The plan assets are invested without
restriction in active markets that are accessible when required and are therefore considered as level 1, in
accordance with ASC 820 “Fair Value Measurement.”
These plans accounted for approximately 100% of benefit obligations. The following table represents the
asset mix of the investment portfolio as of December 31:
    2019    2018 
Asset category:
Treasury bills  80%  78%
Equity securities  20%  22%
 100%  100%
The amount of contributions that the Company expects to pay to the plan during 2020 is $2.5 million,
which excludes $1.7 million of pending payments to former Buenavista workers.
Post-retirement Health Care Plan:
United States: The Company adopted a post-retirement health care plan for retired salaried employees
eligible for Medicare in 1996. The Company manages the plan and is currently providing health benefits
to retirees. The plan is accounted for in accordance with ASC 715 “Compensation retirement benefits.”
In Mexico, health services are provided by the Mexican Social Security Institute.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
126The components of net period benefit costs for the three years ended December 31, 2019 are as follows:
(in millions)     2019     2018     2017
Interest cost $ 0.9$ 0.9$0.9
Amortization of prior service cost/ (credit)  (0.2) (0.2) (0.2)
Net periodic benefit cost $ 0.7$ 0.7$0.7
The change in benefit obligation and a reconciliation of funded status are as follows:
As of December 31, 
(in millions)     2019    2018
Change in benefit obligation:
Projected benefit obligation at beginning of year $11.9$12.5
Interest cost  0.9 0.9
Actuarial loss/ (gain)-claims cost  —  0.2
Benefits paid  (1.3) (0.9)
Actuarial (gain)/loss  8.6 (0.9)
Inflation adjustment  0.5 0.1
Projected benefit obligation at end of year $20.6$11.9
Change in plan assets:
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year $— $—
Employer contributions  0.1 0.1
Benefits paid  (0.1) (0.1)
Fair value of plan assets at end of year $— $—
Funded status at end of year: $20.6$11.9
ASC-715 amounts recognized in statement of financial position
consists of:
Current liabilities $(0.1)$(0.1)
Non-current liabilities  (20.5) (11.8)
Total $(20.6)$(11.9)
ASC-715 amounts recognized in accumulated other
comprehensive income consists of:
Net loss (gain) $1.5$(4.4)
Total (net of income taxes of $(0.7) million and $1.9 million in
2019 and 2018, respectively) $1.5$(4.4)
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
127The following table summarizes the changes in accumulated other comprehensive income for the years
ended December 31, related to the post-retirement health care plan, net of income tax:
As of December 31, 
(in millions)     2019    2018
Reconciliation of accumulated other comprehensive income:
Accumulated other comprehensive income at beginning of plan
year $(4.4)$(3.9)
Net loss/(gain) occurring during the year  6.0 (0.6)
Net loss/(gain) amortized during the year  0.1 0.1
Currency exchange rate adjustment  (0.2) —
Net adjustment to accumulated other comprehensive income
(net of income taxes of $(2.6) million and $0.2 million in 2019
and 2018, respectively)  5.9 (0.5)
Accumulated other comprehensive income at end of plan year $1.5$(4.4)
The following table summarizes the amounts in accumulated other comprehensive income amortized and
recognized as a component of net periodic benefit cost in 2019 and 2018, net of income tax:
As of December 31, 
(in millions)     2019    2018
Net loss / (gain) $5.9$(0.6)
Amortization of net (loss) gain  0.2 0.2
Total amortization expenses $6.1$(0.4)
The discount rates used in the calculation of other post-retirement benefits and cost as of December 31
were:
    2019    2018    2017 
Expatriate health plan
Discount rate  2.85%  3.90%  3.25%
Mexican health plan
Weighted average discount rate  7.15%  8.45%  7.80%
The benefits expected to be paid in each of the next five years, and thereafter, are as follows:
    Expected
Year Benefit Payments
(in millions)
2020 $ 1.3
2021 1.3
2022  1.3
2023  1.4
2024  1.4
2025 to 2029  7.3
Total $ 14.0
Expatriate Health Plan
For measurement purposes for pre 65 year old participants, a 5.8% annual rate of increase in the per
capita cost of covered health care benefits was assumed for 2019 which gradually decrease to 4.2%. For
post 65 year old the annual rate of increase in the per capita cost for 2019 is 5.2% which is assumed to
decrease gradually to 4.0%.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
128Assumed health care cost trend rates can have a significant effect on amounts reported for health care
plans. However, because of the size of the Company’s plan, a one percentage-point change in assumed
health care trend rate would not have a significant effect.
Mexican Health Plan
For measurement purposes, a 4.5% annual rate of increase in the per capita cost of covered health care
benefits was assumed for 2019 and remains at that level thereafter.
An increase in other benefit cost trend rates have a significant effect on the amount of the reported
obligations, as well as component cost of the other benefit plan. One percentage-point change in assumed
other benefits cost trend rates would have the following effects:
One Percentage
Point
(in millions)     Increase    Decrease
Effect on total service and interest cost components $1.4$0.9
Effect on the post-retirement benefit obligation $18.8$12.2
NOTE 13—COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES:
Environmental matters:
The Company has instituted extensive environmental conservation programs at its mining facilities in
Peru and Mexico. The Company’s environmental programs include, among others, water recovery
systems to conserve water and minimize the impact on nearby streams, reforestation programs to stabilize
the surface of the tailings dams and the implementation of scrubbing technology in the mines to reduce
dust emissions.
Environmental capital investments in years 2019, 2018 and 2017, were as follows (in millions):
    2019     2018     2017
Peruvian operations $18.6$59.3$93.7
Mexican operations  64.3 43.5 128.9
$82.9$102.8$222.6
Peruvian operations: The Company’s operations are subject to applicable Peruvian environmental laws
and regulations. The Peruvian government, through the Ministry of Environment (“MINAM”) conducts
annual audits of the Company’s Peruvian mining and metallurgical operations. Through these
environmental audits, matters related to environmental obligation, compliance with legal requirements,
atmospheric emissions, effluent monitoring and waste management are reviewed. The Company believes
that it is in material compliance with applicable Peruvian environmental laws and regulations. Peruvian
law requires that companies in the mining industry provide assurances for future mine closure and
remediation. In accordance with the requirements of this law, the Company’s closure plans were
approved by MINEM. See Note 10 “Asset retirement obligation,” for further discussion of this matter.
Air Quality Standards (“AQS”): In June 2017, MINAM enacted a supreme decree which defines new
AQS for daily sulfur dioxide in the air. As of December 31, 2019, the Company maintains a lower daily
average level of µg/m3 of SO2, than those required by the new AQS.
Soil Environmental Quality Standards (“SQS”): In 2013, the Peruvian government enacted SQS
applicable to any existing facility or project that generates or could generate the risk of soil
contamination in its area of operation or
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
129influence. In March 2014, MINAM issued a supreme decree, which established additional provisions for
the gradual implementation of SQS.
In accordance with the regulatory requirements, the Company has been working on the characterization
phase and a Soil Decontamination Plan (“SDP”) for environmentally impacted sites in each of its
operating units (Toquepala, Cuajone, and Ilo) with the assistance of consulting companies. The
Toquepala and Cuajone SDP were presented to the authorities for review and approval during the third
quarter of 2019, and the Ilo SDP was submitted in January 2020.
While the Company believes that there is a reasonable possibility that a potential loss contingency may
exist, it cannot currently reasonably estimate the amount of the contingency. The Company believes that
a reasonable determination of the loss will be possible once the characterization study and the SDP are
reviewed and approved by the Peruvian government, which is expected for 2020. At that time the
Company will be in a position to estimate the remediation cost. Furthermore, the Company does not
believe that it can estimate a reasonable range of possible costs until the noted studies have substantially
progressed and therefore is not able to disclose a range of costs that is meaningful.
Climate Change:  On April 17, 2018, the Peruvian government enacted Law N. 30754, establishing a 
Climate Change Framework. Through this law, promoting public and private investment in climate 
change management is declared to be of national interest. The law proposes to create an institutional 
framework to address climate change in Peru, outlining new measures, particularly with respect to 
climate change mitigation. It includes, for example, provisions dealing with: increasing carbon capture 
and use of carbon sinks; afforestation and reforestation practices; land use changes; and sustainable 
systems of transportation, solid waste management, and energy systems. It was the first Latin American 
climate change framework law to incorporate responsibilities from the Paris Agreement. Regulations to 
this law were enacted by Supreme Decree 013-2019 published on December 31, 2019 and are applicable 
to all Peruvian institutions and agencies. It is expected that further Peruvian regulations would be 
applicable to non-governmental entities. The Company anticipates initiating a multi-year process to adopt 
applicable reporting recommendations of the Task-Force on Climate Related Financial Disclosures 
(TCFD) once new Peruvian climate change regulations applicable to non-governmental entities are 
implemented. The Company is committed to the environment and to manage climate-related impacts. 
The Company’s focus is to seek continuous improvement in the responsible use of natural resources 
while complying with strict applicable legal standards for prevention, mitigation, control and remediation 
of environmental impacts.  Implementing continuous improvement in the Company’s processes allows 
greater efficiency in the use and consumption of energy, water, and other natural resources.
Mexican operations: The Company’s operations are subject to applicable Mexican federal, state and
municipal environmental laws, to Mexican official standards, and to regulations for the protection of the
environment, including regulations relating to water supply, water quality, air quality, noise levels and
hazardous and solid waste.
The principal legislation applicable to the Company’s Mexican operations is the Federal General Law of
Ecological Balance and Environmental Protection (the “General Law”), which is enforced by the Federal
Bureau of Environmental Protection (“PROFEPA”). PROFEPA monitors compliance with environmental
legislation and enforces Mexican environmental laws, regulations and official standards. It may also
initiate administrative proceedings against companies that violate environmental laws, which in the most
extreme cases may result in the temporary or permanent shutdown of non-complying facilities, the
revocation of operating licenses and/or other sanctions or fines.
In 2011, the General Law was amended, giving an individual or entity the ability to contest
administrative acts, including environmental authorizations, permits or concessions granted, without the
need to demonstrate the actual existence of harm to the environment as long as it can be argued that the
harm may be caused. In addition, in 2011, amendments to the Civil Federal Procedures Code (“CFPC”)
were enacted. These amendments establish three categories of collective actions by means of which 30 or
more people claiming injury derived from environmental, consumer protection, financial services and
economic competition issues will be considered to be sufficient in order to have a legitimate interest to
seek through a civil procedure restitution or economic compensation or suspension of the activities from
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
130which the alleged injury derived. The amendments to the CFPC may result in more litigation, with
plaintiffs seeking remedies, including suspension of the activities alleged to cause harm.
In 2013, the Environmental Liability Federal Law was enacted. The law establishes general guidelines for
actions to be considered to likely cause environmental harm. If a possible determination regarding harm
occurs, environmental clean-up and remedial actions sufficient to restore environment to a pre-existing
condition should be taken. Under this law, if restoration is not possible, compensation measures should
be provided. Criminal penalties and monetary fines can be imposed under this law.
On February 2019, the Mexican Supreme Court confirmed the constitutionality of an ecological tax to
extractive activities developed in the state of Zacatecas, which taxes the environmental remediation
actions, emissions of certain gases to the atmosphere, emissions of pollutant substances to the soil or
water, and waste storage within the state territory. The Company has determined that this new
environmental regulation will have no impact on its financial position.
Guaymas sulfuric acid spill:
On July 9, 2019, there was an incident at the Company´s Marine Terminal in Guaymas, Sonora, that
caused the discharge of approximately three cubic meters of sulfuric acid into the sea in the industrial
port area.
The Guaymas bay has an estimated water volume of 340 million cubic meters. The discharge of sulfuric
acid was quickly diluted upon entering in contact with the sea’s alkaline conditions and was naturally and
immediately neutralized. As a result the discharge was considered harmless, and it was found that neither
the flora nor fauna of the port area were affected, according to the report from the Ministry of Navy.
On July 10, 2019, the Mexican Environmental Protection Agency (“PROFEPA”) made a first inspection 
of the area, concluding that the Company executed all the correct procedures in order to contain the 
discharge, and no  reference was made to the existence of negative impacts on the environment resulting 
from the incident.
On Friday, July 19, 2019, PROFEPA revisited the facilities to carry out a second inspection, declaring a
partial temporary shutdown related only to the storage process and transportation of sulfuric acid at the
terminal, arguing the absence of an authorization of environmental impact. It is important to note that
these facilities have been in operation since 1979, prior to the 1988 Mexican General Law of Ecological
Balance and the Protection of the Environment. Therefore, these licenses are not a requirement for
companies that have been operating before the aforementioned law. In addition, in 2009 the facility was
awarded by PROFEPA a certification of “Clean Industry and Environmental Quality”, which was
subsequently renewed four times (for a two-year periods each time).
The Company does not know the reasons or causes for this partial and temporary closure, but it will
continue cooperating with the environmental authorities in order to provide certainty that the operation is
in strict compliance with the environmental regulations. The Company expects the environmental
authorities to suspend the partial temporary shutdown, once they resolve their concerns. Currently, the
Company does not expect any impact on its operations. As of December 31, 2019, the matter is pending
resolution.
Climate Change:
Grupo Mexico, the indirect parent of SCC, has for more than 10 years issued sustainability reports under
the Global Reporting Initiative (GRI). Grupo Mexico also participates in different Mexican and
international reporting programs such as the Greenhouse Gases (GHG) Mexico Program and the Carbon
Disclosure Program (CDP). Since 2013, GHG and CDP have signed a memorandum of understanding to
work on aligning their reporting frameworks. Grupo Mexico’s 2018 CDP questionnaire included
responses to the Task Force on Climate-Related Disclosure or TCFD concerns. In compliance with the
2012 Mexican Climate Change Law Grupo Mexico’s GHG emissions are reported and verified
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
131independently. Grupo Mexico’s Sustainability Reports disclosing inventories of GHG emissions can be
located at http://www.gmexico.com/site/en/sustainable/sustainability_reports.html. On October 18, 2017,
Grupo Mexico was selected to join the S&P Sustainability Indices MILA Pacific Alliance (DJSI MILA).
This regional sustainability index included for 2017, 42 leading companies in sustainability from the
countries that form part of the Pacific Alliance: Mexico, Chile, Colombia and Peru.
The Company believes that all of its facilities in Peru and Mexico are in material compliance with
applicable environmental, mining and other laws and regulations. The Company also believes that
continued compliance with environmental laws of Mexico and Peru will not have a material adverse
effect on the Company’s business, properties, result of operations, financial condition or prospects and
will not result in material capital investments.
Litigation matters:
Peruvian operations
The Tia Maria Mining Project
There are four lawsuits filed against the Peruvian Branch of the Company related to the Tia Maria
project. The lawsuits seek (i) to declare null and void the resolution which approved the Environmental
Impact Assessment of the project; (ii) the cancellation of the project and the withdrawal of mining
activities in the area and (iii) to declare null and void the mining concession application of the Tia Maria
project. The lawsuits were filed by Messrs. Jorge Isaac del Carpio Lazio (filed May 22, 2015), Ernesto
Mendoza Padilla (filed May 26, 2015), Juan Alberto Guillen Lopez (filed June 18, 2015) and Junta de
Usuarios del Valle del Tambo (filed April 30, 2015).
The del Carpio Lazio case was rejected by the court of first instance on November 14, 2016. The plaintiff
filed an appeal before the Superior Court on January 3, 2017. On January 9, 2018, the lawyers of both
parties presented their respective arguments before the Appellate Court. On March 8, 2018, the Appellate
Court issued its final decision, which upholds the ruling of the Court of first instance. On April 27, 2018,
the plaintiff filed an extraordinary appeal before the Supreme Court. As of December 31, 2019, the case
remains pending resolution.
The Mendoza Padilla case was initially rejected by the lower court on July 8, 2015. This ruling was
confirmed by the Superior Court on June 14, 2016. On July 12, 2016, the case was appealed before the
Constitutional Court. On November 20, 2018, the Constitutional Court reversed the previous decisions
and remanded the case to the lower court for further action. As of December 31, 2019, the Company has
not received notice of the lawsuit from the lower court.
The Guillen Lopez case is currently before the lower court. On July 19, 2019, the oral arguments took
place. On January 7, 2020, the Judge decided to suspend the proceeding until the del Carpio Lazio case is
concluded. Therefore, as of December 31, 2019, the case remains pending resolution.
.
The Junta de Usuarios del Valle del Tambo case is currently before the lower court. On May 2016, the
Company was included in the process, after the Ministry of Energy and Mines filed a civil complaint. On
March 6, 2019, the Company was formally notified of the lawsuit and answered the complaint on March
20, 2019. As of December 31, 2019, the case remains pending resolution.
The Company asserts that these lawsuits are without merit and is vigorously defending against them. The
potential contingency amount for these cases cannot be reasonably estimated by management at this time.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
132Special Regional Pasto Grande Project (“Pasto Grande Project”)
In 2012, the Pasto Grande Project, an entity of the Regional Government of Moquegua, filed a lawsuit
against SCC’s Peruvian Branch alleging property rights over a certain area used by the Peruvian Branch
and seeking the demolition of the tailings dam where SCC’s Peruvian Branch has deposited its tailings
from the Toquepala and Cuajone operations since 1995. The Peruvian Branch has had title to use the area
in question since 1960 and has constructed and operated the tailings dams with proper governmental
authorization, since 1995. Upon a motion filed by the Peruvian Branch, the lower court has included
MINEM as a defendant in this lawsuit. MINEM has answered the complaint and denied the validity of
the claim. As of December 31, 2019, the case remains pending resolution. SCC’s Peruvian Branch asserts
that the lawsuit is without merit and is vigorously defending against it. The amount of this contingency
cannot be reasonably estimated by management at this time.
Mexican operations
The 2014 Accidental Spill at Buenavista Mine
In relation to the 2014 accidental spill of copper sulfate solution that occurred at a leaching pond of the
Buenavista mine, the following legal procedures are pending against the Company:
On August 19, 2014, PROFEPA, as part of the administrative proceeding initiated after the spill,
announced the filing of a criminal complaint against Buenavista del Cobre S.A. de C.V. (“BVC”), a
subsidiary of the Company, in order to determine those responsible for the environmental damages.
During the second quarter of 2018, the criminal complaint was dismissed. This decision was appealed
and remains pending resolution as of December 31, 2019.
Through the first half of 2015, six collective action lawsuits were filed in federal courts in Mexico City
and Sonora against two subsidiaries of the Company seeking economic compensation, clean up and
remedial activities in order to restore the environment to its pre-existing conditions. Two of the collective
action lawsuits have been dismissed by the court. As of December 31, 2019, three lawsuits continue in
process: two were filed by Acciones Colectivas de Sinaloa, A.C. and one was filed by Defensa Colectiva,
A.C.; who have requested precautionary measures about construction of facilities for monitoring public
health services and prohibiting the closure of the Rio Sonora Trust.
Similarly, during 2015, eight civil action lawsuits were filed against BVC in the state courts of Sonora
seeking damages for alleged injuries and for moral damages as a consequence of the spill. The plaintiffs
in the state court lawsuits are: Jose Vicente Arriola Nunez et al; Santana Ruiz Molina et al; Andres
Nogales Romero et al; Teodoro Javier Robles et al; Gildardo Vasquez Carvajal et al; Rafael Noriega
Souffle et al; Grupo Banamichi Unido de Sonora El Dorado, S.C. de R.L. de C.V; and Marcelino
Mercado Cruz. In 2016, three additional civil action lawsuits, claiming similar damages, were filed by
Juan Melquicedec Lebaron; Blanca Lidia Valenzuela Rivera et al and Ramona Franco Quijada et al. In
2017, BVC was served with thirty-three additional civil action lawsuits, claiming similar damages. The
lawsuits were filed by Francisco Javier Molina Peralta et al; Anacleto Cohen Machini et al; Francisco
Rafael Alvarez Ruiz et al; Jose Alberto Martinez Bracamonte et al; Gloria del Carmen Ramirez Duarte et
al; Flor Margarita Sabori et al; Blanca Esthela Ruiz Toledo et al; Julio Alfonso Corral Dominguez et al;
Maria Eduwiges Bracamonte Villa et al; Francisca Marquez Dominguez et al; Jose Juan Romo Bravo et
al; Jose Alfredo Garcia Leyva et al; Gloria Irma Dominguez Perez et al; Maria del Refugio Romero et al;
Miguel Rivas Medina et al; Yolanda Valenzuela Garrobo et al; Maria Elena Garcia Leyva et al; Manuel
Alfonso Ortiz Valenzuela et al; Francisco Alberto Arvayo Romero et al; Maria del Carmen Villanueva
Lopez et al; Manuel Martin Garcia Salazar; Miguel Garcia Arguelles et al; Dora Elena Rodriguez Ochoa
et al; Honora Eduwiges Ortiz Rodriguez et al; Francisco Jose Martinez Lopez et al; Maria Eduwiges
Lopez Bustamante; Rodolfo Barron Villa et al, Jose Carlos Martinez Fernandez et al, Maria de los
Angeles Fabela et al; Rafaela Edith Haro et al; Luz Mercedes Cruz et al; Juan Pedro Montaño et al; and
Juana Irma Alday Villa. During the first quarter of 2018, BVC was served with another civil action
lawsuit, claiming similar damages. The lawsuit was filed by Alma Angelina
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
133Del Cid Rivera et al. During the last quarter of 2018, BVC was served with other three civil action
lawsuits, claiming similar damages, such lawsuits were filed by Los Corrales de la Estancia, S.C. de R.L.;
Jose Antonio Navarro; Jesus Maria Peña Molina, et al; those actions were dismissed by the court, because
of their expiration. As of December 31, 2019, forty-five cases remain pending resolution.
During 2015, four constitutional lawsuits (juicios de amparo) were filed before Federal Courts against
various authorities and against a subsidiary of the Company, arguing; (i) the alleged lack of a waste
management program approved by SEMARNAT; (ii) the alleged lack of a remediation plan approved by
SEMARNAT with regard to the August 2014 spill; (iii) the alleged lack of community approval regarding
the environmental impact authorizations granted by SEMARNAT to one subsidiary of the Company; and
(iv) the alleged inactivity of the authorities with regard of the spill in August 2014. The plaintiffs of these
lawsuits are: Francisca Garcia Enriquez, et al which established two lawsuits, Francisco Ramon Miranda,
et al and Jesus David Lopez Peralta et al. During the third quarter of 2016, four additional constitutional
lawsuits, claiming similar damages were filed by Mario Alberto Salcido et al; Maria Elena Heredia
Bustamante et al; Martin Eligio Ortiz Gamez et al; and Maria de los Angeles Enriquez Bacame et al.
During the third quarter of 2017, BVC was served with another constitutional lawsuit filed by Francisca
García Enriquez et al. In 2018, BVC was served with two additional constitutional lawsuits that were
filed against SEMARNAT by Norberto Bustamante et al. Regarding the constitutional lawsuit filed by
Maria Elena Heredia Bustamante et al; in which it was claimed the lack of community approval
regarding the authorization granted by SEMARNAT to build the new BVC tailings dam, on September 5,
2018, the Supreme Court of Justice issued a resolution which established that such authorization was
granted to BVC in compliance with the applicable legislation. However, SEMARNAT must carry out a
public meeting to inform the community of the technical aspects required to build the dam, potential
impacts and prevention measures, with no material effects to BVC’s operations. SEMARNAT has carried
out the consultation ordered by the Supreme Court and as a result, has informed the corresponding Judge
about its compliance with the resolution, in which BVC was imposed additional measures of
environmental impact prevention, such as: (i) the building of at least three monitoring wells downstream
from the curtain of the contingency dam in a period six months period; (ii) monitoring of the groundwater
level and water quality every six months; (iii) carrying out rain collection work in order to restore water
to the Sonora River basin, for which six months are granted to present the execution program; (iv)
determine the location of wildlife conservation and protection areas and define the need to establish
biological corridors; (v) obtain photographic or videographic evidence every six months; (vi) submitting
to SEMARNAT two years before the closure and abandonment of the site, or earlier if necessary, the
closure program that includes the cleaning and restoration of the soil including Mexican regulation
NOM-141; (vii) include the measures in the Environmental Monitoring Program according to the
environmental components impacted; and (viii) hiring an external environmental consultant to validate
compliance with the current and new conditions that are imposed. The foregoing does not impact BVC’s
operations. Likewise, it is noted that the lawsuits promoted by Maria de los Angeles Enriquez Bacame
and Norberto Bustamante have been dismissed and closed without prejudice to the Company. As of
December 31, 2019, the remaining cases are pending resolution.
It is not currently possible to determine the extent of the damages sought in these state and federal
lawsuits but the Company considers that these lawsuits are without merit. Accordingly, the Company is
vigorously defending against them. Nevertheless, the Company considers that none of the legal
proceedings resulting from the spill, individually or in the aggregate, would have a material effect on its
financial position or results of operations.
Corporate operations
Carla Lacey, on behalf of herself and all other similarly situated stockholders of Southern Copper
Corporation, and derivatively on behalf of Southern Copper Corporation
In April 2019, a derivative lawsuit was filed against the Company, certain of its current and former
Directors, and Grupo Mexico in the Delaware Court of Chancery relating to certain construction
contracts, contracts for the purchase and sale
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
134of minerals, and transportation contracts entered into between the Company’s subsidiaries and
subsidiaries of Grupo Mexico.
In October 2019, the plaintiff amended the complaint to include claims related to certain administrative
services contracts between the Company’s subsidiaries and Grupo Mexico. The amended complaint
alleges, among other things, that the construction contracts, the mineral contracts, the transportation
contracts, and the administrative services contracts were unfair as a result of breaches of fiduciary duties
and the Company’s charter. The amended complaint seeks, among other things, unspecified monetary
damages. In January 2020, the Company, the current and former Directors, and Grupo Mexico responded
to the complaint by filing motions to dismiss. The plaintiff must respond on or before March 13, 2020 to
the motions. Because the Company has not formed a conclusion as to whether an unfavorable outcome is
either probable or remote, the Company expresses no opinion as to the likelihood of an unfavorable
outcome or the amount or range of any possible loss to the Company.
Labor matters:
Peruvian operations: 65% of the Company's 4,890 Peruvian employees were unionized at December 31,
2019. Currently, there are six separate unions, one large union and five smaller unions. In June 2018, the
Company signed a three-year collective bargaining agreement with one of the smaller unions. This
agreement includes, among other things, annual salary increases of 5% for each year starting September
2018, and a signing bonus of S/ 45,000 (approximately $13,600) which was recorded as labor expense. In
August 2018, the Company signed a three-year collective bargaining agreement with three additional
unions. This agreement includes, among other things, annual salary increases of 5% for each year starting
December 2018, and a signing bonus of S/ 45,000 (approximately $13,600) which was recorded as labor
expense. In March 2019, the Company signed an agreement with one additional union. The agreement
also included annual salary increases of 5% for each year starting September 2018, and a signing bonus
of S/45,000 (approximately $13,600) which was recorded as labor expense in the first quarter of 2019.
In November 2019, the Company signed two agreements with the remaining union, one of them for one 
year and the other one consisting of a three-year collective bargaining agreement. The agreements also 
included annual salary increases of 5% for each year starting September 2018, and a signing bonus of 
S/15,000 (approximately $4,500) for the one-year agreement and S/45,000 for the three-year agreement 
(approximately $13,600) which were recorded as labor expense in the fourth quarter of 2019.
Mexican operations: In recent years, the Mexican operations have experienced a positive improvement of
their labor environment, as its workers opted to change their affiliation from the Sindicato Nacional de
Trabajadores Mineros, Metalurgicos y Similares de la Republica Mexicana (the “National Mining
Union”) to other less politicized unions.
The workers of the San Martin mine were on strike since July 2007. On February 28, 2018, the striking
workers of the San Martín mine of IMMSA held an election to vote on the union that will hold the
collective bargaining agreement at the San Martín mine. The Federacion Nacional de Sindicatos
Independientes (the National Federation of Independent Unions) won the vote by a majority.
Nevertheless, the vote was challenged by the National Mining Union. On June 26, 2018, the Federal
Mediation and Arbitration Board issued a ruling recognizing the election results. Due to the agreement
between workers and the Company to end the protracted strike, on August 22, 2018, the Federal
Mediation and Arbitration Board authorized the restart of operations of the San Martín mine. Such
authorization was challenged by the National Mining Union. On April 4, 2019, the Federal Mediation and
Arbitration Board recognized again the election results from February 28, 2018; in which the National
Federation of Independent Unions won by a majority. During the last quarter of 2019, a Federal Court
issued a resolution that established that the Labor Court should analyze the list of workers with the right
to vote in the union election. The Company and the National Federation of Independent Unions
challenged such determination before the Supreme Court of Justice and it is still pending resolution. The
Company undertook a major restoration plan at the San Martin mine with a budget of $97.7 million. At
December 31, 2019, the plan is in progress with a total expense of $73.6 million.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
135In the case of the Taxco mine, its workers have been on strike since July 2007. After several legal
procedures, in August 2015, the Supreme Court decided to assert jurisdiction over the case and to rule on
it directly. As of December 31, 2019, the case remains pending resolution without further developments.
It is expected that operations at the Taxco mine will remain suspended until the labor issues are resolved.
In view of the lengthy strike, the Company has reviewed the carrying value of the Taxco mine to
ascertain whether impairment exists. The Company concluded that there is a non-material impairment of
the assets located at this mine.
Other legal matters:
The Company is involved in various other legal proceedings incidental to its operations, but does not
believe that decisions adverse to it in any such proceedings, individually or in the aggregate, would have
a material effect on its financial position or results of operations.
Other commitments:
Peruvian Operations
Tia Maria:
On August 1, 2014, the Company received the final approval of Tia Maria’s Environmental Impact
Assessment (“EIA”). On July 8, 2019, the Company received the construction permit for this 120,000 ton 
annual  SX-EW copper greenfield project with a total capital budget of $1,400 million. This permit was
obtained after completing an exhaustive review process of environmental and social matters, complying
with all established regulatory requirements and addressing all observations raised.
On July 15, 2019, anti-mining groups staged a violent demonstration affecting economic as well as other
activities in the Islay province. These actions were followed by the filing of three complaints, sponsored
by groups opposing the Tia Maria project, with the Mining Council, which is the Peruvian administrative
authority responsible to resolve on these complaints. The Mining Council temporarily suspended the
construction permit on August 8, 2019 until a decision was reached on the merits of the complaints. On
October 7, 2019, as part of the process, the Mining Council conducted a hearing on the complaints and
the Company’s position. On October 30, 2019, the Mining Council of the Peruvian Ministry of Energy
and Mines ratified the construction permit for the Tia Maria project.
In coordination with the Peruvian Government, Southern Copper continues to work on common grounds
for dialogue with the neighboring communities to address any concerns they may have on the project and
is awaiting the proper economic and political conditions to move ahead with the project. Meanwhile, the
Company reiterates its commitment to delay the construction of the project.
The Company´s commitment is to guarantee the population of Islay that the Tia Maria project will not
adversely affect other local economic activities. The project will use only desalinated seawater for its
operations and, for the transportation of its supplies and copper production, the Company will build a 32
kilometer industrial railway and an access road at a safe distance from the Tambo Valley.
The Company´s social programs in education, healthcare and productive development will continue to
improve the quality of life and the agricultural and livestock activities in the Tambo Valley, as well as
develop fishing and tourism in Islay. During the construction and operation phase, hiring local labor will
be a priority. The Company has launched in June the free technical training program “Forging the
Future”, which will benefit 700 persons in this province in 2019-20. After training, the participants will
be eligible to apply for one of the estimated 9,000 jobs (3,600 direct and 5,400 indirect) required during
the Tia Maria construction phase.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
136When in operation, the Company expects Tia Maria will generate a significant contribution through
mining royalties and taxes from day-one and will directly employ 600 workers and indirectly provide
jobs to another 4,200.
Tia Maria’s project budget is approximately $1.4 billion, of which $338.7 million has been invested
through December 31, 2019. This project will use state-of-the-art SX-EW technology with the highest
international environmental standards. SX-EW facilities are the most environmentally friendly in the
industry as they do not require a smelting process and consequently, no emissions are released into the
atmosphere.
Michiquillay:
In June 2018, the Company signed a contract for the acquisition of the Michiquillay copper project in
Cajamarca, Peru, at a purchase price of $400 million. Michiquillay is a world class mining project with
estimated mineralized material of 1,150 million tons and a copper grade of 0.63%. It is expected to
produce 225,000 tons of copper per year (along with by-products of molybdenum, gold and silver) for an
initial mine life of more than 25 years.
The Company paid $12.5 million at the signing of the contract. The balance of $387.5 million will be
paid if the Company decides to develop the project and it is not a present obligation.
Toquepala Concentrator Expansion:
The project budget is $1.3 billion, of which $1,280.1 million has been invested through December 31,
2019. This project has increased Toquepala’s annual copper production to 258,000 tons in 2019, a 51.5% 
production increase, when compared to 2018. The construction of the project was completed and the 
project began production in the fourth quarter of 2018.  Full production was reached in the second quarter 
of 2019.
Corporate Social Responsibility:
The Company has a corporate social responsibility policy to maintain and promote continuity of its
mining operations and obtain the best results. The main objective of this policy is to integrate its
operations with the local communities in the areas of influence of its operations by creating a permanent
positive relationship with them, in order to develop the optimum social conditions and to promote
sustainable development in the area. Accordingly, the Company has made the following commitments:
Tacna Region: In connection with the Toquepala concentrator expansion, the Company has committed to
fund various social and infrastructure improvement projects in Toquepala's neighboring communities.
The total amount committed for these purposes is S/ 445.0 million (approximately $134.2 million).
As the Toquepala expansion project has been completed, the Company considers that these commitments
constitute present obligations of the Company and consequently has recorded a liability of $59.1 million
in its consolidated financial statements as of December 31, 2019.
In addition, the Company has committed S/ 0.7 million (approximately $0.2 million) for the construction
of three infrastructure projects in the Tacna region under the “social investment for taxes” (obras por
impuestos) program which allows the Company to use these amounts as an advance payment of taxes.
Moquegua Region: In the Moquegua region, the Company is part of a “development roundtable” in
which the local municipal authorities, the community representatives and the Company discuss the social
needs and the way the Company could contribute to sustainable development in the region. As part of
this, the roundtable is discussing the creation of a Moquegua Region Development Fund for which the
Company has offered a contribution of S/ 700 million (approximately $211.0 million). While final
funding is not yet settled, the Company has committed to contribute S/
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
137108.5 million (approximately $32.7 million) in advance, which is being utilized in an educational project
and S/ 48.4 million (approximately $14.6 million) for a residual water treatment plant in Ilo, a sea-wall 
embankment and a fresh water facility at El Algarrobal.  
In addition, the Company has committed S/ 59.5 million (approximately $17.9 million) for the
construction of two infrastructure projects in the Moquegua region under the “social investment for
taxes” (obras por impuestos) program which allows the Company to use these amounts as an advance
payment of taxes.
Power purchase agreements:
●Electroperu S.A.: In June 2014, the Company entered into a power purchase agreement for 120
megawatt (“MW”) with the state power company Electroperu S.A., under which Electroperu S.A.
began supplying energy for the Peruvian operations for twenty years starting on April 17, 2017.
●Kallpa Generacion S.A. (“Kallpa”): In July 2014, the Company entered into a power purchase
agreement for 120MW with Kallpa, an independent Israeli owned power company, under which
Kallpa will supply energy for the Peruvian operations for ten years starting on April 17, 2017 and
ending on April 30, 2027. In May 2016, the Company signed an additional power purchase
agreement for a maximum of 80MW with Kallpa, under which Kallpa began supplying energy for
the Peruvian operations related to the Toquepala Expansion and other minor projects for ten years
starting on May 1, 2017 and ending after ten years of commercial operation of the Toquepala
Expansion or on April 30, 2029; whichever occurs first.
Mexican operations
Power purchase agreements:
●MGE: In 2012, the Company signed a power purchase agreement with MGE, an indirect subsidiary
of Grupo Mexico, to supply power to some of the Company’s Mexican operations through 2032. For
further information, please see Note 17 “Related party transactions”.
●Eolica el Retiro, S.A.P.I. de C.V.: In 2013, the Company signed a power purchase agreement with
Eolica el Retiro, S.A.P.I de C.V. a windfarm energy producer that is an indirect subsidiary of Grupo
Mexico, to supply power to some of the Company’s Mexican operations. For further information,
please see Note 17 “Related party transactions”.
Corporate operations
Commitment for Capital projects:
As of December 31, 2019, the Company has committed approximately $198.2 million for the
development of its capital investment projects.
Tax contingency matters:
Tax contingencies are provided for under ASC 740-10-50-15 Uncertain tax position (see Note 7 “Income
taxes”).
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
138NOTE 14—STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY
Treasury Stock:
Activity in treasury stock in the years 2019 and 2018 was as follows (in millions):
    2019     2018
Southern Copper common shares
Balance as of January 1, $2,768.3$2,768.7
Used for corporate purposes  (0.4) (0.4)
Balance as of December 31,  2,767.9 2,768.3
Parent Company (Grupo Mexico) common shares
Balance as of January 1,  251.3 232.4
Other activity, including dividend, interest and foreign
currency transaction effect  29.7 18.9
Balance as of December 31,  281.0 251.3
Treasury stock balance as of December 31, $3,048.9$3,019.6
SCC shares of common stock in treasury:
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, treasury stock holds 111,537,217 shares and 111,551,617 shares of
SCC’s common stock with a cost of $2,767.9 million and $2,768.3 million, respectively. The shares of
SCC’s common stock held in treasury are used for Director’s stock award plans and available for general
corporate purposes.
SCC share repurchase program:
In 2008, the Company’s Board of Directors (“BOD”) authorized a $500 million share repurchase
program that has since been increased by the BOD and is currently authorized to $3 billion. Pursuant to
this program, the Company has purchased 119.5 million shares of common stock at a cost of $2.9 billion.
These shares are available for general corporate purposes. The Company may purchase additional shares
of its common stock from time to time, based on market conditions and other factors. This repurchase
program has no expiration date and may be modified or discontinued at any time.
There has not been activity in the SCC share repurchase program since the third quarter of 2016. The
NYSE closing price of SCC common shares at December 31, 2019 was $42.48 and the maximum
number of shares that the Company could purchase at that price is 1.9 million shares.
Grupo Mexico’s direct and indirect ownership remains at 88.9% as of December 31, 2019.
Directors’ Stock Award Plan:
The Company established a stock award compensation plan for certain directors who are not
compensated as employees of the Company. Under this plan, participants received 1,200 shares of
common stock upon election and 1,200 additional shares following each annual meeting of stockholders
thereafter. 600,000 shares of Southern Copper common stock have been reserved for this plan. On April
26, 2018, the Company’s stockholders approved a five-year extension of the Plan until January 28, 2023
and an increase of the shares award from 1,200 to 1,600. The fair value of the award is measured each
year at the date of the grant. In 2019 and 2018 the stock based compensation expense under this plan
equaled $0.4 million for each of these years.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
139The activity of this plan for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 was as follows:
    2019     2018
Total SCC shares reserved for the plan  600,000 600,000
Total shares granted at January 1,  (362,800) (346,800)
Granted in the period  (14,400) (16,000)
Total shares granted at December 31,  (377,200) (362,800)
Remaining shares reserved  222,800 237,200
Parent Company common shares:
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, there were in treasury 93,082,532 and 100,188,809 of Grupo Mexico’s
common shares, respectively.
Employee Stock Purchase Plan:
2015 Plan: In January 2015, the Company offered to eligible employees a new stock purchase plan
through a trust that acquires series B shares of Grupo Mexico stock for sale to its employees, and
employees of subsidiaries, and certain affiliated companies. The purchase price was established at 38.44
Mexican pesos (approximately $1.86) for the initial subscription, which expires in January 2023. Every
two years employees will be able to acquire title to 50% of the shares paid in the previous two years. The
employees will pay for shares purchased through monthly payroll deductions over the eight year period
of the plan. At the end of the eight year period, the Company will grant the participant a bonus of 1 share
for every 10 shares purchased by the employee. Any future subscription will be at the average market
price at the date of acquisition or the grant date.
If Grupo Mexico pays dividends on shares during the eight year period, the participants will be entitled to
receive the dividend in cash for all shares that have been fully purchased and paid as of the date that the
dividend is paid. If the participant has only partially paid for shares, the entitled dividends will be used to
reduce the remaining liability owed for purchased shares.
In the case of voluntary or involuntary resignation/termination of the employee, the Company will pay to
the employee the fair market sales price at the date of resignation of the fully paid shares, net of costs and
taxes. When the fair market sales value of the shares is higher than the purchase price, the Company will
apply a deduction over the amount to be paid to the employee based on a decreasing schedule specified in
the plan.
In case of retirement or death of the employee, the Company will render the buyer or his legal
beneficiary, the fair market sales value as of the date of retirement or death of the shares effectively paid,
net of costs and taxes.
The stock based compensation expense for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 and the
unrecognized compensation expense under this plan were as follows (in millions):
    2019     2018  2017
Stock based compensation expense $ 0.6$ 0.6$0.6
Unrecognized compensation expense $ 2.0$ 2.6$3.2
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
140The following table presents the stock award activity of this plan for the years ended December 31, 2019
and 2018:
        Unit Weighted Average
Shares Grant Date Fair Value
Outstanding shares at January 1, 2019  1,840,336$ 2.63
Granted  —  —
Exercised  (460,602)$ 2.63
Forfeited  —  —
Outstanding shares at December 31, 2019  1,379,734$ 2.63
Outstanding shares at January 1, 2018  2,293,120$ 2.63
Granted  —  —
Exercised  (452,784)$ 2.63
Forfeited  —  —
Outstanding shares at December 31, 2018  1,840,336$ 2.63
2018 Plan: In November 2018, the Company offered to eligible employees a new stock purchase plan
(the "New Employee Stock Purchase Plan") through a trust that acquires series B shares of Grupo Mexico
stock for sale to its employees, and employees of subsidiaries, and certain affiliated companies. The
purchase price was established at 37.89 Mexican pesos (approximately $1.86) for the initial subscription,
which expires in October 2026. Every two years employees will be able to acquire title to 50% of the
shares paid in the previous two years. The employees will pay for shares purchased through monthly
payroll deductions over the eight year period of the plan. At the end of the eight year period, the
Company will grant the participant a bonus of 1 share for every 10 shares purchased by the employee.
Any future subscription will be at the average market price at the date of acquisition or the grant date.
If Grupo Mexico pays dividends on shares during the eight year period, the participants will be entitled to
receive the dividend in cash for all shares that have been fully purchased and paid as of the date that the
dividend is paid. If the participant has only partially paid for shares, the entitled dividends will be used to
reduce the remaining liability owed for purchased shares.
In the case of voluntary or involuntary resignation/termination of the employee, the Company will pay to
the employee the fair market sales price at the date of resignation of the fully paid shares, net of costs and
taxes. When the fair market sales value of the shares is higher than the purchase price, the Company will
apply a deduction over the amount to be paid to the employee based on a decreasing schedule specified in
the plan.
In case of retirement or death of the employee, the Company will render the buyer or his legal
beneficiary, the fair market sales value as of the date of retirement or death of the shares effectively paid,
net of costs and taxes.
The stock based compensation expense for the year ended December 31, 2019 and the unrecognized
compensation expense under this plan were as follows (in millions):
    2019
Stock based compensation expense $ 0.7
Unrecognized compensation expense $ 4.5
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
141The following table presents the stock award activity of this plan for the years ended December 31, 2019
and 2018:
Unit Weighted Average
    Shares    Grant Date Fair Value
Outstanding shares at January 1, 2019  2,782,424 1.86
Granted  1,238,169 1.86
Exercised  (17,695) 1.86
Forfeited  — —
Outstanding shares at December 31, 2019  4,002,898 1.86
Outstanding shares at January 1, 2018 — —
Granted 2,782,424 1.86
Exercised — —
Forfeited — —
Outstanding shares at December 31, 2018  2,782,424 1.86
Executive Stock Purchase Plan:
Grupo Mexico also offers a stock purchase plan for certain members of its executive management and the
executive management of its subsidiaries and certain affiliated companies. Under this plan, participants
will receive incentive cash bonuses which are used to purchase shares of Grupo Mexico which are
deposited in a trust.
Retained earnings:
As part of the settlement of claims brought on behalf of the Company and its shareholders against Grupo
Mexico, AMC and certain current and former directors (together with Grupo Mexico and AMC, the
‘‘Defendants’’) a dividend of $0.44428 per share was paid on February 21, 2019 to shareholders of record
at the close of business on February 11, 2019, other than the Defendants. The settlement dividend,
totaling $36.5 million was an obligation of Grupo Mexico and
AMC and therefore, have been funded by them. In addition, Grupo Mexico and AMC paid $13.5 million
of legal fees.
Non-controlling interest:
For all the years presented, in the consolidated statement of earnings the income attributable to non-
controlling interest is based on the earnings of the Company's Peruvian Branch.
The non-controlling interest of the Company’s Peruvian Branch is for investment shares. These shares
were generated by legislation in place in Peru from the 1970s through 1991; such legislation provided for
the participation of mining workers in the profits of the enterprises for which they worked. This
participation was divided between equity and cash. The investment shares included in the non-controlling
interest on the consolidated balance sheets are the still outstanding equity distributions made to the
Peruvian Branch’s employees.
In prior years, the Company acquired some Peruvian investment shares in exchange for newly issued
common shares of the Company and through purchases at market value. These acquisitions were
accounted for as purchases of non-controlling interests. The excess paid over the carrying value was
assigned to intangible assets and is being amortized based on production. As a result of these
acquisitions, the remaining investment shareholders hold a 0.71% interest in the Peruvian Branch and are
entitled to a pro rata participation in the cash distributions made by the Peruvian Branch. The shares are
recorded as a non-controlling interest in the Company's financial statements.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
142NOTE 15—FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENT:
Subtopic 820-10 of ASC “Fair value measurement and disclosures -Overall” establishes a fair value
hierarchy that prioritizes the inputs to valuation techniques used to measure fair value. The hierarchy
gives the highest priority to unadjusted quoted prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities
(Level 1 measurements) and the lowest priority to unobservable inputs (Level 3 measurements). The
three levels of the fair value hierarchy under Subtopic 820-10 are described below:
Level 1 -Unadjusted quoted prices in active markets that are accessible at the measurement date for
identical, unrestricted assets or liabilities.
Level 2 -Inputs that are observable, either directly or indirectly, but do not qualify as Level 1 inputs. (i.e.,
quoted prices for similar assets or liabilities).
Level 3 -Prices or valuation techniques that require inputs that are both significant to the fair value
measurement and unobservable (i.e., supported by little or no market activity).
The carrying amounts of certain financial instruments, including cash and cash equivalents, accounts
receivable (other than accounts receivable associated with provisionally priced sales) and accounts
payable approximate fair value due to their short maturities. Consequently, such financial instruments are
not included in the following table that provides information about the carrying amounts and estimated
fair values of other financial instruments that are not measured at fair value in the consolidated balance
sheet as of December 31, 2019 and December 31, 2018 (in millions):
At December 31, 2019 At December 31, 2018
    Carrying Value    Fair Value    Carrying Value    Fair Value
Liabilities:
Long-term debt level 1 $ 6,190.6$7,675.3$ 5,210.7$5,540.0
Long-term debt level 2 750.2 776.1 749.4 761.7
Total long-term debt $ 6,940.8$8,451.4$ 5,960.1$6,301.7
Long-term debt is carried at amortized cost and its estimated fair value is based on quoted market prices
classified as Level 1 in the fair value hierarchy except for the cases of the Yankee bonds, the notes due
2020 and the notes due 2022, which qualify as Level 2 in the fair value hierarchy as they are based on
quoted priced in market that are not active.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
143Fair values of assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis were calculated as of
December 31, 2019 and 2018, as follows (in millions):
Fair Value at Measurement Date Using:
            Significant    
Fair Value Quoted prices in other Significant
as of active markets for observable unobservable
December 31, identical assets inputs inputs
Description 2019 (Level 1) (Level 2) (Level 3)
Assets:
Short term investment:
—Trading securities $ 80.0$ 80.0$ — $ —
—Available-for-sale debt securities:
Corporate bonds  — — — —
Asset backed securities  0.4 — 0.4 —
Mortgage backed securities  0.3 — 0.3 —
Accounts receivable:
—Embedded derivatives—Not classified as
hedges:
Provisionally priced sales:
Copper  326.5 326.5 — —
Molybdenum  126.8 126.8 — —
Total $ 534.0$ 533.3$ 0.7$ —
Fair Value at Measurement Date Using:
            Significant    
Fair Value Quoted prices in other Significant
as of active markets for observable unobservable
December 31, identical assets inputs inputs
Description 2018 (Level 1) (Level 2) (Level 3)
Assets:
Short term investment:
—Trading securities $ 213.1$ 213.1$ — $ —
—Available-for-sale debt securities:
Corporate bonds  — — — —
Asset backed securities  0.4 —  0.4 —
Mortgage backed securities  0.3 — 0.3 —
Accounts receivable:
—Embedded derivatives-Not classified as
hedges:
Provisionally priced sales:
Copper  274.3 274.3 — —
Molybdenum  107.4 107.4 — —
Total $ 595.5$ 594.8$ 0.7$ —
The Company’s short-term trading securities investments are classified as Level 1 because they are
valued using quoted prices of the same securities as they consist of bonds issued by public companies and
publicly traded. The Company’s short-term available-for-sale investments are classified as Level 2
because they are valued using quoted prices for similar investments.
The Company’s accounts receivables associated with provisionally priced copper sales are valued using
quoted market prices based on the forward price on the LME or on the COMEX. Such value is classified
within Level 1 of the fair value hierarchy. Molybdenum prices are established by reference to the
publication Platt’s Metals Week and are considered Level 1 in the fair value hierarchy.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
144NOTE 16—CONCENTRATION OF RISK:
The Company operates four open-pit copper mines, five underground poly-metallic mines, two smelters
and ten refineries in Peru and Mexico and substantially all of its assets are located in these countries.
There can be no assurances that the Company’s operations and assets that are subject to the jurisdiction of
the governments of Peru and Mexico will not be adversely affected by future actions of such
governments. Much of the Company’s products are exported from Peru and Mexico to customers
principally in the United States, Europe, Asia and South America.
Financial instruments, which potentially subject the Company to a concentration of credit risk, consist
primarily of cash and cash equivalents, short-term investments and trade accounts receivable. The
Company invests or maintains available cash with various banks, principally in the United States,
Mexico, Europe and Peru, or in commercial papers of highly-rated companies. As part of its cash
management process, the Company regularly monitors the relative credit standing of these institutions. At
December 31, 2019, SCC had invested its cash and cash equivalents and short-term investments as
follows:
$ in % of total % in one institution  
Country     million    cash (1)    of country    of total cash 
United States $1,726.7 86.1%  14.2%  12.2%
Switzerland 126.3 6.3%  100.0%  6.3%
Peru  24.6 1.2%  72.5%  0.9%
Mexico  128.2 6.4%  87.0%  5.6%
Total cash and short-term
investment $2,005.8 100.0%  
(1)97.4% of the Company’s cash is in U.S. dollars.
During the normal course of business, the Company provides credit to its customers. Although the
receivables resulting from these transactions are not collateralized, the Company has not experienced
significant problems with the collection of receivables.
The Company is exposed to credit loss in cases where the financial institutions with which it has entered
into derivative transactions (commodity, foreign exchange and currency/interest rate swaps) are unable to
pay when they owe funds as a result of protection agreements with them. To minimize the risk of such
losses, the Company only uses highly-rated financial institutions that meet certain requirements. The
Company also periodically reviews the creditworthiness of these institutions to ensure that they are
maintaining their ratings. The Company does not anticipate that any of the financial institutions will
default on their obligations.
The Company’s largest customers as percentage of accounts receivable and total sales were as follows:
    2019    2018    2017 
Accounts receivable trade as of December 31, 
Five largest customers  37.6%  34.2%  28.4%
Largest customer  13.0%  10.9%  8.2%
Total sales in year
Five largest customers  28.0%  28.4%  25.1%
Largest customer  10.4%  9.3%  8.8%
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
145NOTE 17—RELATED PARTY TRANSACTIONS:
The Company has entered into certain transactions in the ordinary course of business with parties that are
controlling shareholders or their affiliates. These transactions include the lease of office space, air and
railroad transportation, construction services, energy supply, and other products and services related to
mining and refining. The Company lends and borrows funds among affiliates for acquisitions and other
corporate purposes. These financial transactions bear interest and are subject to review and approval by
senior management, as are all related party transactions. It is the Company’s policy that the Audit
Committee of the Board of Directors shall review all related party transactions. The Company is
prohibited from entering or continuing a material related party transaction that has not been reviewed and
approved or ratified by the Audit Committee.
Receivable and payable balances with related parties are shown below (in millions):
At December 31, 
    2019    2018
Related parties receivable current:
Grupo Mexico and affiliates:
Asarco LLC $10.8$74.4
Americas Mining Corporation (“AMC”) — 11.0
AMMINCO Apoyo Administrativo, S.A. de C.V.
(“AMMINCO”)  0.1 0.2
Compania Perforadora Mexico S.A.P.I. de C.V. and affiliates  0.3 1.4
Ferrocarril Mexicano, S.A. de C.V.  —  0.1
Grupo Mexico  2.7 2.7
Mexico Generadora de Energia S. de R.L. ("MGE") 15.3 10.3
Mexico Proyectos y Desarrollos, S.A. de C.V. and affiliates 0.2 0.6
Related to the controlling group:
Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A. de C.V. 0.1 0.3
Mexico Transportes Aereos, S.A. de C.V. ("Mextransport") 0.4 0.1
Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V. 0.1 0.4
$30.0$101.5
Related parties receivable non-current:
Grupo Mexico and affiliates:
Asarco LLC $59.5 —
Related parties payable:
Grupo Mexico and affiliates:
Asarco LLC $4.3$4.1
AMMINCO 16.9 8.0
Eolica El Retiro, S.A.P.I. de C.V.  —  1.0
Ferrocarril Mexicano S.A. de C.V.  6.4 6.4
Grupo Mexico  1.1 0.6
MGE 40.2 40.6
Mexico Proyectos y Desarrollos S.A. de C.V. and affiliates 16.0 14.4
Related to the controlling group:
Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A. de C.V.  0.2 0.1
Mexico Transportes Aereos S.A. de C.V. (“Mextransport”)  1.2 —
Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V. 0.1 0.1
$86.4$75.3
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
146Purchase and sale activity:
Grupo Mexico and affiliates:
The following table summarizes the purchase and sale activities with Grupo Mexico and its affiliates in
2019, 2018 and 2017 (in millions):
    2019     2018     2017
Purchase activity
Asarco LLC $37.6$37.2$37.2
AMMINCO 17.8 8.0 —
Eolica El Retiro, S.A.P.I. de C.V.  2.9 3.6 3.3
Ferrocarril Mexicano, S.A. de C.V.  44.1 41.7 43.5
Grupo Mexico 10.0 10.1 14.0
MGE  202.2 200.1 223.7
Mexico Proyectos y Desarrollos S.A. de C.V. and
affiliates  71.0 79.8 152.9
Total purchases $385.6$380.5$474.6
Sales activity
Asarco LLC $11.3$81.8$96.2
AMMINCO 0.1 0.3 —
Compania Perforadora Mexico, S.A.P.I. de C.V.
and
affiliates — — 0.2
Ferrocarril Mexicano, S.A. de C.V.  0.1 —  —
Grupo Mexico  —  —  0.2
MGE 47.4 68.2 101.0
Total sales $58.9$150.3$197.6
Grupo Mexico, the parent and the majority indirect stockholder of the Company, and its affiliates provide
various services to the Company. These services are primarily related to accounting, legal, tax, financial,
treasury, human resources, price risk assessment and hedging, purchasing, procurement and logistics,
sales and administrative and other support services. In 2018, AMMINCO, a subsidiary of Grupo Mexico,
began providing these services for the Company's Peruvian operations. The Company pays Grupo
Mexico and AMMINCO for these services and expects to continue requiring these services in the future.
In 2018, the Company sold vehicles to AMMINCO.
In 2019 and 2018, the Company donated $9.6 million and $6.2 million, respectively, to Fundacion Grupo
Mexico,A.C., an organization dedicated to promoting the social and economic development of the
communities close to the Company’s Mexican operations.
In addition, in December 2018, in accordance with the Company´s tax sharing agreement with its parent,
the Company´s Peruvian operations advanced $11 million to AMC for the payment of the Company's
GILTI tax that later was determined not to be necessary. This amount was reimbursed to the Company in
the first quarter of 2019.
The Company’s Mexican operations paid fees for freight services provided by Ferrocarril Mexicano, S.A
de C.V., for construction services provided by Mexico Proyectos y Desarrollos, S.A. de C.V. and its
affiliates, and for drilling services provided by Compañia Perforadora Mexico S.A.P.I. de C.V. All of
these companies are subsidiaries of Grupo Mexico.
The Company’s Mexican operations purchased scrap and other residual copper mineral from Asarco
LLC, and power from MGE. Both companies are subsidiaries of Grupo Mexico.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
147In 2012, the Company signed a power purchase agreement with MGE, whereby MGE will supply some
of the Company’s Mexican operations with power through 2032. MGE has two natural gas-fired
combined cycle power generating units, with a net total capacity of 516.2 megawatts and has been
supplying power to the Company since December 2013. Currently, MGE is supplying 5.2% of its power
output to third-party energy users; compared to 17.1% at December 31, 2018.
In 2014, Mexico Generadora de Energia Eolica, S. de R.L. de C.V, an indirect subsidiary of Grupo
Mexico, located in Oaxaca, Mexico, acquired Eolica el Retiro, a windfarm with 37 wind turbines. This
company started operations in January 2014 and started to sell power to Industrial Minera Mexico and
subsidiaries (IMMSA) and other subsidiaries of Grupo Mexico in the third quarter of 2014. Currently,
Eolica el Retiro is supplying approximately 18.2% of its power output to IMMSA; compared to 18% at
December 31, 2018.
The Company sold copper cathodes and rod, as well as sulfuric acid, silver and gold to Asarco LLC.
In September 2019, Asarco LLC signed a promissory agreement to pay to the Company´s Mexican
operations $62.0 million plus interest no later than October 31, 2021, with quarterly payments of $0.5
million. The annual interest rate of the note is Libor plus 200 basis points, 4.08513%, which will be
reviewed annually. As of December 31, 2019, $59.5 million is recorded in a separate line as a long-term
related party receivable in the consolidated balance sheet. Related to this agreement, the Company
recorded interest income of $2.3 million in 2019.
In addition, the Company received fees for building rental and maintenance services provided to
Perforadora Mexico S.A.P.I de C.V., and for natural gas and services provided by MGE, all subsidiaries
of Grupo Mexico.
Companies with relationships with the controlling group:
The following table summarizes the purchase and sales activities with other Larrea family companies in
2019, 2018 and 2017 (in millions):
    2019     2018     2017
Purchase activity
Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A. de C.V. $ 0.4$ 0.3$0.3
Mextransport 2.3 12.4 1.3
Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V. 0.2 0.2 0.1
Total purchases $ 2.9$12.9$1.7
Sales activity
Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A. de C.V. $ 0.1$ 0.2$0.2
Empresarios Industriales de Mexico, S.A. de C.V. 0.2 — —
Mextransport 1.8 1.2 0.3
Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V. 0.1 0.1 0.2
Total sales $ 2.2$ 1.5$0.7
The Larrea family controls a majority of the capital stock of Grupo Mexico, and has extensive interests in
other businesses, including transportation, real estate and entertainment. The Company engages in certain
transactions in the ordinary course of business with other entities controlled by the Larrea family relating
to the lease of office space, air transportation and entertainment.
The Company’s Mexican operations paid fees for entertainment services provided by Boutique Bowling
de Mexico S.A de C.V. and Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V. Both companies are controlled by the
Larrea family.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
148MexTransport provides aviation services to the Company’s Mexican operations. This is a company
controlled by the Larrea family.
In addition, the Company received fees for building rental and maintenance services provided to
Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A de C.V. and Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V. The Company also
received fees for building rental as well as aircraft operation services provided to Mextransport. The
Company´s Mexican operations received fees for security services provided to Empresarios Industriales
de Mexico, S.A. de C.V. This is also a company controlled by the Larrea family.
Equity Investment in Affiliate: The Company has a 44.2% participation in Compañia Minera
Coimolache S.A. (“Coimolache”), which it accounts for on the equity method. Coimolache owns
Tantahuatay, a gold mine located in northern Peru.
In addition, the Company has a 30.0% participation in Apu Coropuna S.R.L. (“Apu Coropuna”), which it
accounts for
on the equity method. Apu Coropuna is a company, which undertakes exploration activities in the Pucay
prospect, located in Arequipa, Peru.
It is anticipated that in the future the Company will enter into similar transactions with these same
parties.
Companies with relationships with SCC executive officers:
In 2019 and 2018, the Company did not have purchase activities with companies having relationships
with SCC executive officers. In 2017 the Company purchased industrial material from these companies
amounting to $0.2 million. It is anticipated that in the future the Company will not enter into similar
transactions with these same parties.
Tax Agreement: On February 28, 2017, AMC and the Company entered into a tax agreement, effective as
of February 20, 2017, pursuant to which AMC, as the parent of the consolidated group of which the
Company is a member and joins in the filing of a U.S. federal income tax return, (a) will be responsible for
and discharge, any and all liabilities and payments due to the IRS on account of any incremental tax
liabilities of the Company in connection with the potential adjustments being considered by the IRS in
connection with the interest of the 2012 Judgment, (b) will not seek reimbursement, contribution or
collection of any amounts of money or any other asset in connection therewith from the Company, and (c)
will indemnify, defend and hold harmless the Company from any such liability, including the cost of such
defense.
NOTE 18—SEGMENT AND RELATED INFORMATION:
Company management views Southern Copper as having three reportable segments and manages it on
the basis of these segments. The reportable segments identified by the Company are: the Peruvian
operations, the Mexican open-pit operations and the Mexican underground mining operations segment
identified as the IMMSA unit.
The three reportable segments identified are groups of mines, each of which constitute an operating
segment, with similar economic characteristics, type of products, processes and support facilities, similar
regulatory environments, similar employee bargaining contracts and similar currency risks. In addition,
each mine within the individual group earns revenues from similar type of customers for their products
and services and each group incurs expenses independently, including commercial transactions between
groups.
Intersegment sales are based on arm’s length prices at the time of sale. These may not be reflective of
actual prices realized by the Company due to various factors, including additional processing, timing of
sales to outside customers and
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
149transportation cost. Added to the segment data is information regarding the Company’s sales. The
segments identified by the Company are:
1.Peruvian operations, which include the Toquepala and Cuajone mine complexes and the smelting
and refining plants, including a precious metals plant, industrial railroad and port facilities that
service both mines. The Peruvian operations produce copper, with production of by-products of
molybdenum, silver and other material.
2.Mexican open-pit operations, which include La Caridad and Buenavista mine complexes and the
smelting and refining plants, including a precious metals plant and a copper rod plant and support
facilities that service both mines. The Mexican open-pit operations produce copper, with production
of by-products of molybdenum, silver and other material.
3.Mexican underground mining operations, which include five underground mines that produce zinc,
copper, silver and gold, a coal mine which produces coal and coke, and a zinc refinery. This group is
identified as the IMMSA unit.
The Peruvian operations include two open-pit copper mines whose mineral output is transported by rail to
Ilo, Peru where it is processed at the Company’s Ilo smelter and refinery, without distinguishing between
the products of the two mines. The resulting product, anodes and refined copper, are then shipped to
customers throughout the world. These shipments are recorded as revenue of the Company’s Peruvian
mines.
The Mexican open-pit segment includes two copper mines whose mineral output is processed in the same
smelter and refinery without distinguishing between the products of the two mines. The resultant product,
anodes and refined copper, are then shipped to customers throughout the world. These shipments are
recorded as revenues of the Company’s Mexican open-pit mines.
The Company has determined that it is necessary to classify the Peruvian open-pit operations as a
separate operating segment from the Mexican open-pit operations due to the very distinct regulatory and
political environments in which they operate. The Company’s senior management must consider the
operations in each country separately when analyzing results of the Company and making key decisions.
The open-pit mines in Peru must comply with stricter environmental rules and must continually deal with
a political climate that has a very distinct vision of the mining industry as compared to Mexico. In
addition, the collective bargaining agreement contracts are negotiated differently in each of the countries.
These key differences result in the Company taking varying decisions with regards to open-pit operations
in the two countries.
The IMMSA segment includes five mines whose minerals are processed in the same refinery. This
segment also includes an underground coal mine. Sales of product from this segment are recorded as
revenues of the Company’s IMMSA unit. While the Mexican underground mines are subject to a very
similar regulatory environment of the Mexican open-pit mines, the nature of the products and processes
of two Mexican operations vary distinctly. These differences cause the Company’s senior management to
take a very different approach when analyzing results and making decisions regarding the two Mexican
operations.
Financial information is regularly prepared for each of the three segments and the results of the
Company’s operations are regularly reported to senior management on the segment basis. Senior
management of the Company focus on operating income and on total assets as measures of performance
to evaluate different segments and to make decisions to allocate resources to the reported segments.
These are common measures in the mining industry.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
150Financial information relating to Company’s segments is as follows:
Year Ended December 31, 2019
(in millions)
        Mexican        Corporate, other    
Mexican IMMSA Peruvian and
Open-pit Unit Operations eliminations Consolidated
Net sales outside of segments $3,963.9$381.6$2,940.1$ — $7,285.6
Intersegment sales  — 83.2 —  (83.2) —
Cost of sales (exclusive of
depreciation, amortization and
depletion)  1,613.1 380.3 1,702.1 (89.1) 3,606.4
Selling, general and administrative  78.6 7.9 38.5 6.8 131.8
Depreciation, amortization and
depletion  351.9 52.3 328.1 32.1 764.4
Exploration  1.8 9.0 16.5 2.7 30.0
Operating income $1,918.5$ 15.3$854.9$ (35.7) 2,753.0
Less:
Interest, net  (319.5)
Other income (expense)  (7.0)
Income taxes  (945.3)
Equity earnings of affiliate  10.7
Non-controlling interest  (6.1)
Net income attributable to SCC $1,485.8
Capital investment $244.3$106.3$350.1$ 6.8$ 707.5
Property and mine development, net $4,648.5$497.1$3,879.2$ 346.2$9,371.0
Total assets $8,081.9$837.6$5,017.9$ 2,470.0$16,407.4
Year Ended December 31, 2018
(in millions)
        Mexican        Corporate, other    
Mexican IMMSA Peruvian and
Open-pit Unit Operations eliminations Consolidated
Net sales outside of segments $4,075.9$448.6$2,572.2$ — $7,096.7
Intersegment sales  —  79.3 —  (79.3) —
Cost of sales (exclusive of
depreciation, amortization and
depletion)  1,611.0 377.2 1,509.4 (88.6) 3,409.0
Selling, general and administrative  55.3 8.5 36.7 2.1 102.6
Depreciation, amortization and
depletion  360.4 47.6 237.4 28.9 674.3
Exploration  2.0 5.3 18.5 3.8 29.6
Operating income $2,047.2$ 89.3$770.2$ (25.5) 2,881.2
Less:
Interest, net  (261.1)
Other income (expense)  (30.7)
Income taxes  (1,053.5)
Equity earnings of affiliate  12.3
Non-controlling interest  (5.2)
Net income attributable to SCC $1,543.0
Capital investment $266.8$ 60.0$774.0$ 20.6$1,121.4
Property and mine development, net $4,783.8$448.3$3,797.2$ 374.5$9,403.8
Total assets $8,165.2$930.2$4,813.1$ 379.1$14,287.6
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
151Year Ended December 31, 2017
(in millions)
        Mexican        Corporate, other    
Mexican IMMSA Peruvian and
Open-pit Unit Operations eliminations Consolidated
Net sales outside of segments $3,972.7$437.7$2,244.1$ — $6,654.5
Intersegment sales —  71.0 —  (71.0) —
Cost of sales (exclusive of
depreciation, amortization and
depletion)  1,594.3 365.3 1,362.8 (69.6) 3,252.8
Selling, general and administrative  47.9 7.9 36.2 1.1 93.1
Depreciation, amortization and
depletion  401.0 56.2 203.6 10.3 671.1
Exploration 2.7 5.5 14.4 6.2 28.8
Environmental remediation  (10.2) — — — (10.2)
Operating income $1,937.0$ 73.8$627.1$ (19.0) 2,618.9
Less:
Interest, net  (300.5)
Other income (expense)  (15.7)
Income taxes  (1,593.4)
Equity earnings of affiliate  23.1
Non-controlling interest  (3.9)
Net income attributable to SCC $ 728.5
Capital investment $297.6$ 36.5$685.4$ 4.0$1,023.5
Property and mine development, net$5,004.5$366.9$3,389.8$ 338.4$9,099.6
Total assets $8,323.1$889.1$4,314.5$ 253.4$13,780.1
The following table presents information regarding the opening and closing balances of receivables by
reporting segment of the Company for the three years ended December 31, 2019 (in millions):
Mexican
    Mexican    IMMSA    Peruvian    Corporate &    
Open-Pit Unit Operations Elimination Consolidated
As of December 31, 2019:                
Trade receivables $477.8$ 38.0$317.1$ — $ 832.9
Related parties, current  22.1 —  —  7.9 30.0
Related parties, non-current 59.5 — — — 59.5
As of December 31, 2018:                
Trade receivables $505.9$ 50.5$266.0$ — $ 822.4
Related parties  81.6 —  —  19.9 101.5
As of December 31, 2017:                
Trade receivables $556.2$ 79.7$254.7$ — $ 890.6
Related parties  18.0 —  —  8.1 26.1
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
152SALES VALUE PER SEGMENT:
The following table presents information regarding the sales value by reporting segment of the
Company’s significant products for the three years ended December 31, 2019 (in millions):
Year Ended December 31, 2019
    Mexican
Mexican    IMMSA     Peruvian    Corporate, Other &    Total
Open-pit Unit Operations Eliminations Consolidated
Copper $3,314.9$ 42.0$2,535.3$ (46.9)$5,845.3
Molybdenum  341.0 —  208.4 —  549.4
Zinc  —  280.1 —  (2.3) 277.8
Silver  185.9 82.7 85.6 (29.9) 324.3
Other  122.1 60.0 110.8 (4.1) 288.8
Total $3,963.9$464.8$2,940.1$ (83.2)$7,285.6
Year Ended December 31, 2018
    Mexican
Mexican    IMMSA     Peruvian    Corporate, Other &    Total
Open-pit Unit Operations Eliminations Consolidated
Copper $3,459.1$ 45.6$2,251.2$ (48.1)$5,707.8
Molybdenum  342.5 —  167.4 —  509.9
Zinc  —  328.7 —  (0.1) 328.6
Silver  175.3 83.5 69.5 (28.1) 300.2
Other  99.0 70.1 84.1 (3.0) 250.2
Total $4,075.9$527.9$2,572.2$ (79.3)$7,096.7
Year Ended December 31, 2017
    Mexican
Mexican    IMMSA     Peruvian    Corporate, Other &    Total
(in millions) Open-pit Unit Operations Eliminations Consolidated
Copper $3,480.2$ 37.2$1,996.4$ (37.3)$5,476.5
Molybdenum  224.0 —  129.4 —  353.4
Silver  170.7 71.9 70.6 (26.9) 286.3
Zinc  —  327.2 —  (0.6) 326.6
Other  97.8 73.2 47.7 (7.0) 211.7
Total $3,972.7$509.5$2,244.1$ (71.8)$6,654.5
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
153NET SALES AND GEOGRAPHICAL INFORMATION:
The geographic breakdown of the Company’s sales for the three years ended December 31, 2019 was as
follows (in millions):
Year Ended December 31, 2019
Mexican 
Mexican IMMSA Peruvian Corporate & 
    Open-Pit    Unit     Operations    Elimination    Consolidated
The Americas:
Mexico $1,262.2$352.9$ — $ (83.2)$1,531.9
United States  1,054.9 6.2 134.5 —  1,195.6
Peru  1.6 —  338.4 —  340.0
Brazil  —  17.3 194.4 —  211.7
Chile  1.2 —  190.1 —  191.3
Other American countries  37.6 2.2 3.3 —  43.1
Europe:      
Switzerland  780.9 36.7 355.8 —  1,173.4
Italy  45.1 13.3 238.6 —  297.0
Spain  186.1 —  —  —  186.1
Other European countries  92.8 24.9 256.9 —  374.6
Asia:      
Singapore  345.4 10.4 611.1 —  966.9
Japan  59.9 —  440.9 —  500.8
Other Asian countries  96.2 0.9 176.1 —  273.2
Total $3,963.9$464.8$2,940.1$ (83.2)$7,285.6
Year Ended December 31, 2018
Mexican
Mexican IMMSA Peruvian Corporate &
    Open-Pit    Unit     Operations    Elimination    Consolidated
The Americas:
Mexico $1,343.0$385.6$ — $ (79.3)$1,649.3
United States  1,008.0 6.6 244.0 — 1,258.6
Peru  —  —  390.4 — 390.4
Brazil  —  43.8 228.1 — 271.9
Chile  —  —  136.3 — 136.3
Other American countries  60.6 3.8 1.4 — 65.8
Europe:
Switzerland 453.3 43.4 156.7 — 653.4
Italy 20.6 21.7 305.0 — 347.3
Spain 169.4 — — — 169.4
Other European countries 234.8 19.9 124.9 — 379.6
Asia:
Singapore 528.8 2.2 538.2 — 1,069.2
Japan 71.8 — 411.6 — 483.4
Other Asian countries 185.6 0.9 35.6 — 222.1
Total $4,075.9$527.9$2,572.2$ (79.3)$7,096.7
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
154Year Ended December 31, 2017
Mexican
Mexican IMMSA Peruvian Corporate &
    Open-Pit    Unit     Operations    Elimination    Consolidated
The Americas:
Mexico $1,240.0$349.1$ 6.6$ (71.8)$1,523.9
United States  1,001.2 41.7 147.4 — 1,190.3
Peru  —  0.8 373.4 — 374.2
Brazil  —  48.7 191.4 — 240.1
Chile  —  —  103.4 — 103.4
Other American countries  68.1 4.1 19.3 — 91.5
Europe:
Switzerland 473.1 14.3 114.9 — 602.3
Italy 27.7 18.6 286.1 — 332.4
Spain 142.8 — — — 142.8
Other European countries 230.3 30.3 76.6 — 337.2
Asia:
Singapore 547.9 1.4 502.0 — 1,051.3
Japan 93.0 — 386.6 — 479.6
Other Asian countries 148.6 0.5 36.4 — 185.5
Total $3,972.7$509.5$2,244.1$ (71.8)$6,654.5
PROVISIONAL SALES PRICE:
At December 31, 2019, the Company has recorded provisionally priced sales of copper at average
forward prices per pound, and molybdenum at the year-end market price per pound. These sales are
subject to final pricing based on the average monthly copper prices on the London Metal Exchange
(“LME”) or New York Commodities Exchange (“COMEX”) and Dealer Oxide molybdenum prices in the
future month of settlement.
Following are the provisionally priced copper and molybdenum sales outstanding at December 31, 2019:
    Sales volume    Priced at    
(million lbs.)(per pound) Month of settlement
Copper 116.8 2.80January through March 2020
Molybdenum 13.7 9.20January through March 2020
Provisional sales price adjustments included in accounts receivable and net sales were as follows at
December, 31 (in millions):
At December 31, 
    2019     2018
Copper $ 4.0$ (7.6)
Molybdenum  (8.2) (2.4)
Total $ (4.2)$(10.0)
Management believes that the final pricing of these sales will not have a material effect on the
Company’s financial position or results of operations.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
155LONG-TERM SALES CONTRACTS:
The following are the significant outstanding long-term contracts:
In 2019, a three year copper cathodes sales agreement was signed with Mitsui, with shipments beginning
in 2020. Mitsui and the Company will negotiate market terms and conditions for annual contracts no later
than November 30 of the year prior to shipment. The contract considers the following annual volumes of
copper cathodes; 48,000 tons for each of the years from 2020 through 2022. Failure to reach an
agreement on market terms would cancel the annual contract but not the long-term agreement. Under the
terms of the agreement all shipments would be to Asia and there are no exclusivity rights for Mitsui or
commissions included. This contract may be renewed for additional years, upon the agreement of both
parties.
Under the terms of a sales contract with Molymet Group (Molibdenos y Metales, S.A. and Sadaci N.V.),
SPCC Peru Branch is required to supply approximately 70% of the molybdenum concentrates production
from 2019 through 2022. The sale price of the molybdenum concentrate is based on the average of the
High and Low “Daily Dealer Oxide” as published in “Platt’s Metals Daily”. The roasting charge
deduction is agreed based on international market terms.
Under the terms of a sales contract with Molymex, S.A. de C.V., Operadora de Minas de Nacozari, S.A.
de C.V. and Operadora de Minas e Instalaciones Mineras, S.A. de C. V. are required to supply at least the
80% of their molybdenum concentrates production from 2020 through 2023. The sale price of the 
molybdenum concentrate is based on the average of the High and Low “Daily Dealer Oxide” as 
published in “Platt’s Metals Daily”.  The roasting charge deduction is negotiated based on international 
market terms.
NOTE 19—QUARTERLY DATA (unaudited)
2019
(in millions, except per share data)     1st     2nd     3rd     4th     Year
Net sales $1,753.4$1,818.0$1,859.5$1,854.7$7,285.6
Gross profit (1) $727.7$751.9$752.7$682.5$2,914.8
Operating income $693.7$713.6$713.8$631.9$2,753.0
Net income $389.2$404.4$391.3$307.0$1,491.9
Net income attributable to SCC $388.2$402.4$389.6$305.6$1,485.8
Per share amounts attributable to SCC:
Net earnings basic and diluted $0.50$0.52$0.50$0.40$1.92
Dividend per share $0.40$0.40$0.40$0.40$1.60
2018
    1st    2nd    3rd    4th    Year
Net sales $1,841.1$1,837.2$1,723.7$1,694.7$7,096.7
Gross profit (1) $802.6$822.9$729.1$658.8$3,013.4
Operating income $773.3$787.6$696.7$623.6$2,881.2
Net income (loss) $471.9$411.1$370.7$294.5$1,548.2
Net income (loss) attributable to SCC $470.7$409.6$369.4$293.3$1,543.0
Per share amounts attributable to SCC:
Net earnings basic and diluted $0.61$0.53$0.48$0.38$2.00
Dividend per share $0.30$0.30$0.40$0.40$1.40
(1)Gross profit is the result of net sales less cost of sales (excluding depreciation, amortization and
depletion) and less depreciation, amortization and depletion.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
156NOTE 20—SUBSEQUENT EVENTS:
DIVIDENDS:
On February 20, 2020, the Board of Directors authorized a dividend of $0.40 per share to be paid on
March 24, 2020, to shareholders of record at the close of business on March 10, 2020.
Table of Contents
157OTHER COMPANY INFORMATION:
ANNUAL MEETING
The annual stockholders meeting of Southern Copper Corporation will be held on Thursday, April 30,
2020, at 9:00 am, Mexico City time, at Edificio Parque Reforma, Campos Eliseos 400, 9th Floor, Colonia
Lomas de Chapultepec, Delegacion Miguel Hidalgo, C.P. 11000, Mexico City, Mexico.
TRANSFER AGENT, REGISTRAR AND STOCKHOLDERS’ SERVICES
Computershare
480 Washington Boulevard
Jersey City, NJ 07310-1900
Phone: (866) 230-0172
DIVIDEND REINVESTMENT PROGRAM
SCC stockholders can have their dividends automatically reinvested in SCC common shares. SCC pays
all administrative and brokerage fees. This plan is administered by Computershare. For more information,
contact Computershare at (866) 230-0172.
STOCK EXCHANGE LISTING
The principal markets for SCC’s common stock are the NYSE and the Lima Stock Exchange (BVL).
SCC’s common stock symbol is SCCO on both the NYSE and the Lima Stock Exchange.
OTHER SECURITIES
The Branch in Peru has issued, in accordance with Peruvian Law, “investment shares” (formerly named
labor shares) that are quoted on the Lima Stock Exchange under symbols SPCCPI1 and SPCCPI2.
Transfer Agent, registrar and stockholders services are provided by Credicorp Capital, Avenida EI Derby
055, Torre 4, Piso 10, Santiago de Surco, Cod postal 15039, Peru.
Telephone (51-1)416-3333, Extensions 32478 and 32441.
OTHER CORPORATE INFORMATION
For other information on the Company or to obtain, free of charge, additional copies of the Annual
Report on Form 10-K, contact the Investor Relations Department at:
1440 East Missouri Avenue, Suite 160 Phoenix, AZ 85014, USA
Telephone: (602) 264-1375
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION
USA
1440 East Missouri Ave, Suite 160
Phoenix, AZ 85014, USA
Phone: (602) 264-1375
Fax: (602) 264-1397
Mexico
Campos Eliseos 400
Colonia Lomas de Chapultepec
Table of Contents
158Delegacion Miguel Hidalgo
C.P. 11000—MEXICO
Phone: (5255) 1103-5000
Fax: (5255) 1103-5567
Peru
Av. Caminos del Inca 171
Urb. Chacarilla del Estanque
Santiago de Surco
Cod postal 15038—PERU
Phone: (511) 512-0440 Ext 3181
Fax: (511) 512-0492
Website: www.southerncoppercorp.com
Email address: southerncopper@southernperu.com.pe
Table of Contents
159ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNT ON ACCOUNTING AND
FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE
Not applicable.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
As of December 31, 2019, the Company conducted an evaluation under the supervision and with the
participation of the Company’s disclosure committee and the Company’s management, including the
Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of the effectiveness and the design and operation of
the Company’s disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-
15(e). Based on that evaluation, the Chief Executive Officer and the Chief Financial Officer have
concluded that the Company’s disclosure controls and procedures are effective as of December 31, 2019,
to ensure that information required to be disclosed in reports filed or submitted under the Exchange Act
is:
1. Recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the
SEC’s rules and forms, and
2. Accumulated and communicated to management, including the Chief Executive Officer
and Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding
required disclosure.
CHANGES IN INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
There were no changes in the Company’s internal control over financial reporting (as such term is
defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) that
occurred during the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2019 that have materially affected, or are
reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company’s internal controls over financial reporting,
MANAGEMENT’S REPORT ON INTERNAL CONTROL OVER FINANCIAL REPORTING
Management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial
reporting (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) for the Company.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness for future periods are subject to the
risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of
compliance with policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Under the supervision and with the participation of the Company’s management, including the Chief
Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, the Company conducted an evaluation of the effectiveness
of its internal control over financial reporting based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated
Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organization of the Treadway Commission.
Based on the evaluation made under this framework, management concluded that as of December 31,
2019 such internal control over financial reporting is effective.
Our internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019 has been audited by Galaz,
Yamazaki, Ruiz Urquiza, S.C. member of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu Limited, an independent registered
public accounting firm, as stated in their report which is provided below.
Table of Contents
160REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of Southern Copper Corporation
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the internal control over financial reporting of Southern Copper Corporation and
subsidiaries (the “Company”) as of December 31, 2019, based on criteria established in Internal Control
—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission (COSO). In our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal
control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based on the criteria established in Internal
Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight
Board (United States) (PCAOB), the consolidated financial statements and financial statement schedule
as of and for the year ended December 31, 2019 of the Company and our report dated February 28, 2020,
expressed an unqualified opinion on those financial statements and financial statement schedule.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial
reporting and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included
in the accompanying “Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting” appearing in
Item 9A. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial
reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are
required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities
laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the
PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we
plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over
financial reporting was maintained in all material respects. Our audit included obtaining an understanding
of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, testing and
evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk, and
performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our
audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A Company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable
assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for
external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A Company’s internal
control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance
of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the
assets of the Company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to
permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles,
and that receipts and expenditures of the Company are being made only in accordance with
authorizations of management and directors of the Company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance
regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the
Company’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of the effectiveness to future periods are subject to the
risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of
compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Table of Contents
161Galaz, Yamazaki, Ruiz Urquiza, S.C.
Member of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu Limited
/s/ DANIEL TOLEDO ANTONIO
C.P.C. Daniel Toledo Antonio
Mexico City, Mexico
February 28, 2020
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
None.
Table of Contents
PART III
ITEM 10, 11, 12, 13 AND 14
INFORMATION ABOUT OUR EXECUTIVE OFFICERS
Set forth below are the executive officers of the Company, their ages as of January 31, 2020 and their
positions.
Name     Age    Position
German Larrea Mota‑Velasco  66 Chairman of the Board and Director
Oscar Gonzalez Rocha  81 President, Chief Executive Officer and Director
Raul Jacob Ruisanchez  61 Vice President, Finance, Treasurer and Chief Financial Officer
Julian Jorge Lazalde Psihas  51 Secretary
Andres Carlos Ferrero Ghislieri 51 General Counsel
Lina Vingerhoets Vilca  58 Comptroller
Edgard Corrales Aguilar  64 Vice President, Exploration
Raul Vaca Castro  60 General Auditor
German Larrea Mota-Velasco has served as our Chairman of the Board since December 1999, Chief
Executive Officer from December 1999 to October 2004 and as a member of our Board of Directors
since November 1999. He has been Chairman of the board of directors, President and Chief Executive
Officer of Grupo Mexico (holding) since 1994. Mr. Larrea has been Chairman of the board of directors
and Chief Executive Officer of Grupo Ferroviario Mexicano S.A. de C.V (railroad company) since 1997.
Mr. Larrea was previously Executive Vice Chairman of Grupo Mexico and has been a member of the
board of directors since 1981. He is also Chairman of the board of directors and Chief Executive Officer
of Empresarios Industriales de Mexico, S.A. de C.V. (holding) and Fondo Inmobiliario (real estate
company), since 1992. He founded Grupo Impresa, a printing and publishing company in 1978,
remaining as the Chairman and Chief Executive Officer until 1989 when the company was sold. He is a
director of the Consejo Mexicano de Negocios since 1999, was a director of Banco Nacional de
Mexico, S.A. (Citigroup) from 1992 to 2015 and Grupo Televisa, S.A.B. from 1999 to 2014.
Oscar Gonzalez Rocha has served as our President since December 1999 and our President and Chief
Executive Officer since October 21, 2004. He has been our Director since November 1999. Mr. Gonzalez
Rocha has been the President and Chief Executive Officer of Americas Mining Corporation since
November 1, 2014 and the Chief Executive Officer and a director of Asarco LLC (integrated U.S. copper
producer), an affiliate of the Company, since August 2010. Previously, he was our President and General
Director and Chief Operating Officer from December 1999 to October 20, 2004. He has been a director
of Grupo Mexico since 2002. He was General Director of Mexicana de Cobre, S.A. de C.V. from 1986 to
1999 and of Buenavista del Cobre S.A. de C.V. (formerly Mexicana de Cananea, S.A. de C.V.) from 1990
to 1999. He was an alternate director of Grupo Mexico from 1988 to April 2002. Mr. Gonzalez Rocha is a
civil engineer with a degree from the Autonomous National University of Mexico (“UNAM”) in Mexico
City, Mexico. Mr. Gonzalez Rocha has been recognized as Copper man of the year 2015 and was
inducted into the American Mining Hall of Fame in December 2016 in Tucson, Arizona and into the
Mexican Mining Hall of Fame in October 2017 in Guadalajara, Mexico.
Raul Jacob Ruisanchez has served as our Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Officer since
April 18, 2013. He was appointed Treasurer of the Company on April 28, 2016. He was our Comptroller
from October 27, 2011 until April 18, 2013. He has held various positions focused primarily in financial
planning, treasury, corporate finance, investor relations and project evaluation with the Company since
1992. In September 2011, he was appointed Director of Controller and Finance of the Company’s
Peruvian Branch and Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Southern Peru Limited, one of our
subsidiaries. During the last four years (2016 – 2019), Mr. Jacob was considered by Institutional Investor
among the top three Chief Financial Officers of the mining industry of Latin America. In 2010, he was
ranked among the top three Investor Relations executives of the mining industry of Latin America by the
same publication. From 2015 to through January 2017, he was Vice President of the Peruvian National
Mining, Oil and Energy Association and President of its mining chapter. He is currently a member of its
Executive Committee and Board. Mr. Jacob is currently a member of the consulting board of the MBA
program (Finance) of the Universidad del Pacifico in Lima, Peru. Until March of 2010, he was President
of the Strategic Studies Center of IPAE, an entrepreneurial association. Between 2004 and 2006, he was
the President of the Finance Affairs Committee of the
162
Table of Contents
163American Chamber of Commerce of Peru. Mr. Jacob holds an economics degree from Universidad del
Pacifico, a Master’s Degree from the University of Texas (Austin), a Degree in International Business
Management from the Stockholm School of Economics and a Senior Manager Degree by the Instituto de
Empresa Business School (IE) in Madrid.
Julian Jorge Lazalde Psihas, our Secretary, has been a Director, Executive Vice President and General
Counsel of Asarco LLC since December 2009. Since October 2015 he is also General Counsel of
Americas Mining Corporation, both subsidiaries of Grupo Mexico, S.A.B. de C.V., the parent company
of the Company. Mr. Lazalde was General Counsel of Asarco Inc., the predecessor of Asarco LLC, from
September 2006 until December 2009. Mr. Lazalde holds a law degree from the Autonomous Institute of
Mexico, known as ITAM, and has degrees from the Panamerican University in two special areas, tax law
and commercial law.
Andres Carlos Ferrero Ghislieri, our General Counsel, has been a member of the Legal Department of
our Peruvian Branch since December 1995. Prior to this, he served as a Technical Advisor to the World
Bank’s Energy and Mines Technical Assistance Loan (EMTAL) Project assigned to the National Society
of Mining, Energy and Petroleum. He has also worked as a mining law consultant for the South African
Government from May to October 2001. He was elected Superintendent of the Legal Affairs and Legal
Manager of the Peruvian Branch in March 2008 and July 2016 respectively. He is a member of the Board
of Compañía Minera Los Tolmos, S.A. which is a subsidiary of the Company. He holds a law degree
from the University of Lima, Peru and a Master of Law or LLM degree in Resources Law and Policy
from Dundee University, United Kingdom.
Lina Vingerhoets Vilca, our Comptroller, has been the Assistant Comptroller of the Company since
April 2015 and Controller of the Peruvian Branch of the Company since July 2015. Ms. Vingerhoets has
worked for the Company’s Peruvian Branch in various capacities since 1991. From 2013 to 2015, she
was in charge of Internal Control. From 2006 to 2015, she was in charge of Accounting Quality and SEC
reporting. In addition, she has held other positions in Financial Planning, Finance and Accounting with
the Company’s Peruvian Branch. Ms. Vingerhoets is a Peruvian certified public accountant and holds
Accounting and MBA degrees from the Universidad del Pacifico, in Lima, Peru.
Edgard Corrales Aguilar has served as Vice President, Exploration since July 18, 2013. Mr. Corrales
has been working with the Peruvian Branch of SCC since 1983 in various positions, including as senior
geologist of the Toquepala mine, head of the geology department of the Cuajone mine and manager of the
exploration department of the Peruvian Branch of SCC. Currently he is Exploration Director of the
Peruvian Branch of SCC and general manager of SCC’s Branch in Chile. Mr. Corrales has a degree in
geology and engineering from the Universidad Nacional San Agustin, Arequipa, Peru and has followed
specialized studies at the Catholic University of Caracas, Venezuela and the MacKay School of Mines at
the University of Reno, Nevada. He has also completed extensive studies in management at various
universities in Peru.
Raul Vaca Castro was elected as General Auditor, effective July 18, 2019. He has 32 years of experience
with Grupo Mexico. Mr. Vaca Castro has been Director of Internal Audit of Minera México, a subsidiary
of SCC since 2018. Previously, he was Director of Internal Audit of the infrastructure division of Grupo
Mexico, as well as Deputy Director of Internal Control for the mining division of Grupo México. He was
also comptroller of Minera Mexico Internacional and before this, he held several positions in different
companies of Grupo Mexico. Mr. Vaca holds a bachelor’s degree in Accounting from the Universidad
Nacional Autonoma de Mexico (UNAM). He holds an MBA from the Universidad del Valle de México,
with a specialization in finance, having earned an honorable mention award, when receiving his diplomas
in finance and taxes. Mr. Vaca is also an active member of the Colegio de Contadores Publicos de Mexico
and the Institute of Internal Auditors of Mexico. He is also member of the Technical Commission of
Internal Audit of the Colegio de Contadores Publicos de Mexico. He was a professor at the Facultad de
Contaduria y Administracion of Universidad Nacional Autonoma de Mexico (UNAM).
Information in response to the additional disclosure requirements specified by Part III, Items 10, 11, 12,
13 and 14 will be included in a definitive proxy statement, which will be filed pursuant to
Regulation 14A of the 1934 Securities Exchange Act, as amended, prior to April 30, 2020, or will be
provided by amendment to this Form 10-K, also to be filed no later than April 30, 2020.
Table of Contents
The information contained in such definitive proxy statement is incorporated herein by reference,
excluding the information under the caption “Compensation Committee Report,” which shall not be
deemed filed.
PART IV.
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS, FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, SCHEDULE.
The following documents are filed as part of this report:
1. Financial Statements
The following financial statements of Southern Copper Corporation and its subsidiaries are included at
the indicated pages of the document as stated below:
Form 10-
K
Pages
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 160
Consolidated statements of earnings for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 97
Consolidated statements of comprehensive income for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018
and 2017 98
Consolidated balance sheets at December 31, 2019 and 2018 99
Consolidated statements of cash flows for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 100
Consolidated statements of changes in equity for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and
2017 101
Notes to the consolidated financial statements 102 -
156
2. Exhibits:
3.1(a) Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, filed on October 11, 2005.
(b) Certificate of Amendment of Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation dated
May 2, 2006.
(c) Certificate of Amendment of Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation dated
May 28, 2008.
3.2By-Laws, as last amended on January 27, 2011.
4.1(a) Indenture governing $600 million 7.500% Notes due 2035, by and among Southern
Copper Corporation, The Bank of New York and The Bank of New York (Luxembourg) S.A.
(b) Indenture governing $400 million 7.500% Notes due 2035, by and among Southern
Copper Corporation, The Bank of New York, and The Bank of New York
(Luxembourg) S.A.
4.2Form of 6.375% Note (included in Exhibit 4.1).
4.3Form of New 7.500% Note (included in Exhibit 4.2(a)).
4.4Form of New 7.500% Note (included in Exhibit 4.2(b)).
4.5Indenture, dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern Copper Corporation and Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which $400 million of 5.375%
Notes due 2020 and $1.1 billion of 6.750% Notes due 2040 were issued.
4.6First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
5.375% Notes due 2020 were issued.
4.7Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
6.750% Notes due 2040 were issued.
4.8Form of 5.375% Notes due 2020.
4.9Form of 6.750% Notes due 2040.
4.10Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 8, 2012, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
3.500% Notes due 2022 were issued.
4.11Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 8, 2012, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
5.250% Notes due 2042 were issued.
4.12Form of 3.500% Notes due 2022.
164
Table of Contents
1654.13Form of 5.250% Notes due 2042.
4.14Fifth Supplemental Indenture dated as of April 23, 2015, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
3.875% Notes due 2025 were issued.
4.15Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 23, 2015, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
5.875% Notes due 2045 were issued.
4.16Form of 3.875% Notes due 2025.
4.17Form of 5.875% Notes due 2045.
4.18Description of the Company’s securities registered pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
10.1Directors’ Stock Award Plan of the Company, as amended through January 28, 2023.
10.2Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of October 21, 2004, by and among Southern
Copper Corporation, SCC Merger Sub, Inc., Americas Sales Company, Inc., Americas
Mining Corporation and Minera Mexico S.A. de C.V.
10.3Tax Agreement entered into by the Company and Americas Mining Corporation, effective as
of February 20, 2017.
12.1Computation of financial ratios.
14.0Code of Business Conduct and Ethics adopted by the Board of Directors on May 8, 2003 and
amended on April 23, 2015.
21.1Subsidiaries of the Company.
23.1Consent of Registered Public Accounting Firm (Galaz, Yamazaki, Ruiz Urquiza, S.C.,
Member of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu, Limited).
31.1Certification Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.2Certification Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.1Certification Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, 18 U.S.C.,
Section 1350. This document is being furnished in accordance with SEC Release No. 33-
8328.
32.2Certification Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, 18 U.S.C.,
Section 1350. This document is being furnished in accordance with SEC Release No. 33-
8328.
101.INSXBRL Instance Document (submitted electronically with this report). The instance
document does not appear in the Interactive Data File because its XBRL tags are embedded
within the Inline XBRL document.
101.SCHXBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document (submitted electronically with this report).
101.CALXBRL Taxonomy Calculation Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this
report).
101.DEFXBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with
this report).
101.LABXBRL Taxonomy Label Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this report).
101.PREXBRL Taxonomy Presentation Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this
report).
104Cover page Interactive Data File (formatted as Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101.1)
The exhibit listed as 10.1 is the management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement required to be
filed pursuant to Item 15(b) of Form 10-K.
Attached as Exhibit 101 to this report are the following documents formatted in Inline XBRL (Inline
Extensible Business Reporting Language): (i) the Consolidated Statements of Earnings for the years
ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017; (ii) the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income
for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017; (iii) the Consolidated Balance Sheets at
December 31, 2019 and 2018; (iv) the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended
December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017; (v) the Consolidated Statements of changes in equity for the years
ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, and (vi) the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
tagged in detail. Users of this data are advised pursuant to Rule 406T of Regulation S-T that this
interactive data file is deemed not filed or part of a registration statement or prospectus for purposes of
sections 11 or 12 of the Securities Act of 1933, is deemed not filed for purposes of section 18 of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, and otherwise is not subject to liability under these sections.
Table of Contents
1663.    Schedule II
Valuation and Qualifying Accounts and Reserves (in millions):
Additions
    Balance at    Charged to            
beginning ofcosts and Deduction/ Balance at
period expenses AdditionsApplicationend of period
Reserve deducted in balance
sheet to which applicable:
Accounts Receivable:
2019  $ 0.5 — — — $ 0.5
2018  $ 1.1 — — (0.6) $ 0.5
2017  $ 0.7 0.6 — 0.2 $ 1.1
Notes issued under par:
2019  $ 58.8 1.9 12.7 — $ 69.6
2018  $ 60.5 1.7 — — $ 58.8
2017  $ 62.2 1.7 — — $ 60.5
Valuation allowance:
2019 $819.1 277.9 — — $1,097.0
2018 $619.6 199.5 — — $ 819.1
2017 $ — 619.6 — — $ 619.6
Table of Contents
Supplemental information
Southern Copper Corporation
Exhibit Index
Sequential
Exhibit
Number    Document Description     Page
Number
3.1(a) Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, filed on October 11, 2005.
(Filed as Exhibit 3.1 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
third quarter of 2005 and incorporated herein by reference).
(b) Certificate of Amendment of Amended and Restated Certificate of
Incorporation dated May 2, 2006. (Filed as Exhibit 3.1 to Registration Statement
on Form S-4, File No. 333-135170, filed on June 20, 2006 and incorporated
herein by reference).
(c) Certificate of Amendment of Amended and Restated Certificate of
Incorporation dated May 28, 2008. (Filed as Exhibit 3.1 to the Company’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the second quarter of 2008 and incorporated
herein by reference).
3.2By-Laws, as last amended on January 27, 2011. (Filed as Exhibit 3.2 to the
Company’s 2010 Annual Report on Form 10-K and incorporated herein by
reference).
4.1(a) Indenture governing $600 million 7.500% Notes due 2035, by and among
Southern Copper Corporation, The Bank of New York and The Bank of New York
(Luxembourg) S.A. (Filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 1, 2005 and incorporated herein by reference).
(b) Indenture governing $400 million 7.500% Notes due 2035, by and among
Southern Copper Corporation, The Bank of New York, and The Bank of New
York (Luxembourg) S.A. (Filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on August 1, 2005 and incorporated herein by reference).
4.2Form of 6.375% Note (included in exhibit 4.1).
4.3Form of New 7.500% Note (included in Exhibit 4.2(a)).
4.4Form of New 7.500% Note (included in Exhibit 4.2(b))
4.5Indenture, dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern Copper Corporation and
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which
$400 million of 5.375% Notes due 2020 and $1.1 billion of 6.750% Notes due
2040 were issued. (Filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on April 19, 2010 and incorporated herein by reference).
4.6First Supplemental Indenture dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern
Copper Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee,
pursuant to which the 5.375% Notes due 2020 were issued (Filed as an Exhibit to
the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on April 19, 2010 and
incorporated herein by reference).
4.7Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern
Copper Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee,
pursuant to which the 6.750% Notes due 2040 were issued. (Filed as an Exhibit to
the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on April 19, 2010 and
incorporated herein by reference).
4.8Form of 5.375% Notes due 2020. (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on April 19, 2010 and incorporated herein by
reference).
4.9Form of 6.750% Notes due 2040. (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on April 19, 2010 and incorporated herein by
reference).
4.10Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 8, 2012, between Southern
Copper Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee,
pursuant to which the 3.500% Notes due 2022 were issued (Filed as an Exhibit to
the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 9, 2012 and
incorporated herein by reference).
4.11Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 8, 2012, between Southern
Copper Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee,
pursuant to which the 5.250% Notes due 2042 were issued. (Filed as an Exhibit to
167the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 9, 2012 and
incorporated herein by reference).
Table of Contents
4.12Form of 3.500% Notes due 2022. (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 9, 2012 and incorporated herein by
reference).
4.13Form of 5.250% Notes due 2042. (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 9, 2012 and incorporated herein by
reference).
4.14Fifth Supplemental Indenture dated as of April 23, 2015, between Southern
Copper Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee,
pursuant to which the 3.875% Notes due 2025 were issued. (Filed as an Exhibit to
the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on April 24, 2015 and
incorporated herein by reference).
4.15Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 23, 2015, between Southern
Copper Corporation and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee,
pursuant to which the 5.875% Notes due 2045 were issued. (Filed as an Exhibit to
the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on April 24, 2015 and
incorporated herein by reference).
4.16Form of 3.875% Notes due 2025. (Filed as Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.1 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on April 24, 2015 and incorporated
herein by reference).
4.17Form of 5.875% Notes due 2045. (Filed as Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.2 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on April 24, 2015 and incorporated
herein by reference).
4.18Description of the Company’s securities registered pursuant to Section 12 of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (Filed herewith).
10.1Directors’ Stock Award Plan of the Company, as amended through January 28,
2023. (Filed as an exhibit to the Company’s 2018 Proxy Statement and
incorporated herein by reference). The plan expired by its terms on January 30,
2017. A 5-year extension of the plan was approved by the Company’s
stockholders at the 2018 Annual Meeting of Stockholders.
10.2Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of October 21, 2004, by and among
Southern Copper Corporation, SCC Merger Sub, Inc., Americas Sales
Company, Inc., Americas Mining Corporation and Minera Mexico S.A. de C.V.
(Filed as an Exhibit to Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 22, 2004 and
incorporated herein by reference).
10.3Tax Agreement entered into by the Company and Americas Mining Corporation,
effective as of February 20, 2017. (Filed as Exhibit 10.4 to the Company’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the first quarter of 2017 and incorporated
herein by reference).
12.1Computation of financial ratios (Filed herewith).
14.0Code of Business Conduct and Ethics adopted by the Board of Directors on
May 8, 2003 and amended on April 23, 2015. (Filed as Exhibit 14 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 29, 2015 and incorporated
herein by reference).
21.1Subsidiaries of the Company (Filed herewith).
23.1Consent of Registered Public Accounting Firm (Galaz, Yamazaki, Ruiz Urquiza,
S.C.—Member of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu, Limited) (Filed herewith).
31.1Certification Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (Filed
herewith).
31.2Certification Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (Filed
herewith).
32.1Certification Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002,
18 U.S.C., section 1350. This document is being furnished in accordance with
SEC Release No. 33-8238.
32.2Certification Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002,
18 U.S.C., section 1350. This document is being furnished in accordance with
SEC Release No. 33-8238.
101.INSXBRL Instance Document (submitted electronically with this report). The
instance document does not appear in the Interactive Data File because its XBRL
tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL document.
101.SCHXBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document (submitted electronically with
this report).
101.CALXBRL Taxonomy Calculation Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with
this report).
168101.DEFXBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document (submitted
electronically with this report).
101.LABXBRL Taxonomy Label Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this
report).
101.PREXBRL Taxonomy Presentation Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with
this report).
Table of Contents
169The exhibit listed as 10.1 is the management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement required to be
filed pursuant to Item 15(b) of Form 10-K.
Attached as Exhibit 101 to this report are the following documents formatted in Inline XBRL (Inline
Extensible Business Reporting Language): (i) the Consolidated Statements of Earnings for the years
ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017; (ii) the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income
for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017; (iii) the Consolidated Balance Sheets at
December 31, 2019 and 2018; (iv) the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended
December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017; (v) the Consolidated Statements of changes in equity for the years
ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, and (vi) the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
tagged in detail. Users of this data are advised pursuant to Rule 406T of Regulation S-T that this
interactive data file is deemed not filed or part of a registration statement or prospectus for purposes of
sections 11 or 12 of the Securities Act of 1933, is deemed not filed for purposes of section 18 of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, and otherwise is not subject to liability under these sections.
Table of Contents
170Signatures
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended,
the Registrant has duly caused this Report on Form 10-K to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned,
thereunto duly authorized.
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORATION
(Registrant)
By: /s/ OSCAR GONZALEZ ROCHA
Oscar Gonzalez Rocha
President and Chief Executive Officer
Date: February 27, 2020
Pursuant to requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this Report on Form 10-K has
been signed below by the following persons on behalf of the Registrant and in the capacities and on the
dates indicated.
/s/ GERMAN LARREA MOTA-VELASCOChairman of the Board, and DirectorGerman Larrea Mota-Velasco
/s/ OSCAR GONZALEZ ROCHAPresident, Chief Executive Officer and DirectorOscar Gonzalez Rocha
/s/ RAUL JACOB RUISANCHEZ Vice President, Finance, Treasurer and Chief
Financial Officer (Principal Financial Officer) Raul Jacob Ruisanchez
/s/ LINA A. VINGERHOETS VILCAComptroller (Principal Accounting Officer)Lina A. Vingerhoets Vilca
DIRECTORS
s/ GERMAN LARREA MOTA-VELASCO /s/ OSCAR GONZALEZ ROCHA
German Larrea Mota-Velasco Oscar Gonzalez Rocha
/s/ RAFAEL MAC GREGOR ANCIOLA /s/ VICENTE ARIZTEGUI ANDREVE
Rafael Mac Gregor Anciola Vicente Ariztegui Andreve
/s/ ALFREDO CASAR PEREZ /s/ L. MIGUEL PALOMINO BONILLA
Alfredo Casar Perez L. Miguel Palomino Bonilla
/s/ GILBERTO PEREZALONSO CIFUENTES/s/ ENRIQUE CASTILLO SANCHEZ
MEJORADA
Gilberto Perezalonso Cifuentes Enrique Castillo Sanchez Mejorada
/s/ CARLOS RUIZ SACRISTAN /s/ XAVIER GARCIA DE QUEVEDO
Carlos Ruiz Sacristan Xavier Garcia de Quevedo
Date: February 27, 2020
